PART II. 2
THE WIGWAM AND THE CABIN.
THE GIANT'S COFFIN,
OR THE FEUD OF HOLT AND HOUSTON.
A TALE OF REEDY RIVER.
CHAPTER I.
In
1766, the beautiful district of Greenville, in South Carolina,
which is said to have had its name in consequence of the
verdant
aspect which it bore in European eyes,received its first
white settlers from Virginia and Pennsylvania. Among these
early colonists were the families of Holt and Houston,
represented
by two fearless borderers, famous in their day as Indian
hunters;men ready with the tomahawk and rifle, but not less
distinguished, perhaps, for the great attachment which existed
between
them. Long intercourse in trying periodsthe habit of
referring to each other in moments of perilconstant adventures
in companynot to speak of similar tastes and sympathies in
numerous
other respects, had created between them a degree of
affection
,
which it would be difficult, perhaps, to find among persons
of more mild and gentle habits. Each had his familyhis wife
and little onesand, traversing the mountain paths which lie
between
Virginia and the Carolinas, they came in safety to the
more southern of the last-named colonies. Charmed with the
appearance
of the country, they squatted down upon the borders of
Reedy River, not very far from the spot now occupied by the
pleasant town of Greenville. Family division, for the present,
there was none. Congeniality of tastes, the isolation of their
abodes, the necessity of concentration against the neighbouring
Indian nation of Cherokees, kept them together; and, continuing
the life of the hunter, rather than that of the farmer, John Holt
and Arthur Houston pursued the track of bear, deer, and turkey,
as before, with a keenness of zest which, possibly, derived its
impulse
quite as much from attachment to one another, as from any
great fondness for the pursuit itself.
Meanwhile, their families, taking fast hold upon the soil, began
to flourish together after a fashion of their own. Flourish they
did, for the boys thrived, and the girls grew apace. But tradition
has preserved some qualifying circumstances in this history, by
which it would seem that their prosperity was not entirely without
alloy. The sympathies between
Mesdames
Holt and Houston
were not, it appears, quite so warm and active as those which
distinguished the intercourse of their respective husbands. Civil
enough to one another in the presence of the latter, they were not
unfrequently at
dagger-draw
in their absence. The husbands
were not altogether ignorant of this condition of things at home,
but they had their remedy; and there is little doubt that, like
some other famous sportsmen of my acquaintance, they became
happy hunters only when there was no longer any hope that they
could become happy husbands. Now, as quarrels most
commonly
owe their spirit and excellence to the presence of spectators,
we may assume that some portion of the virulence of our two
wives underwent diminution from the absence of those before
whom it might hope to display itself with appropriate eloquence;
and the wrath of the dames, only exhibited before their respective
children, was very apt to exhale in clouds, and slight flashes, and
an under-current of distant thunder. Unhappily, however, the
evil had consequences of which the weak mothers little thought,
and the feud was entailed to the children, who, instead of
assimilating
,
with childish propensities, in childish sports, took up the
cudgels of their parents, and under fewer of the restraints,
arising from prudence, and the recognition of mutual necessities,
by which the dames were kept from extreme issues, they
played
the aforesaid cudgels about their mutual heads, with a degree
of earnestness that very frequently rendered necessary the
interposition
of their superiors.
The miserable evil of this family feud fell most heavily upon
the natures of the two eldest boys, one a Holt, the other a
Houston
,spoiling
their childish tempers, impressing their souls with
fearful passions, and embittering their whole intercourse.
At this period young Houston has reached the age of fourteen,
and Holt of twelve years of age. The former was a tall,
slender
,
and very handsome youth; the latter was short, thickset,
and of rather plain, unpromising appearance. But he was
modest
,
gentle, and subdued in temper, and rather retiring and shy.
The former, on the contrary, was bold, vain, and violentthe
petted boy of his mother, insolent in his demands, and reckless in his
resentmentsa fellow of unbending will, and of unmeasured
impulses
.
He had already gone forth as a hunter with his father;
he had proved his strength and courage; and he longed for an
opportunity to exercise his youthful muscle upon his young
companion
,
with whom, hitherto,he himself could not say how or
whyhis collisions had fallen short of the extremities of personal
violence. For such an encounter the soul of young Houston
yearned; he knew that Holt was not wanting in strengthhe
had felt that in their plays together; but he did not doubt that his
own strength, regularly put forth, was greatly superior.
One day the boys had gone down together to the banks of
Reedy River to bathe. There they met a deformed boy of the
neighbourhood, whose name was Acker. In addition to his
deformity
,
the boy was an epileptic, and such was his nervous
sensibility, that, merely to point a finger at him in mischief, was
apt to produce in him the most painful sensations. Sometimes,
indeed, the pranks of his playmates, carried too far, had thrown
him into convulsions. This unhappy lad had but just recovered
from a sickness produced by some such practices, and this fact
was well known to the boys. Disregarding it, however, John
Houston proceeded to amuse himself with the poor boy. Holt,
however, interposed, and remonstrated with his companion, but
without effect. Houston persisted, until, fairly tired of the sport,
he left the diseased boy in a dreadful condition of mental
excitement
and bodily exhaustion. This done, he proceeded to bathe.
Meanwhile, with that sort of cunning and vindictiveness which
often distinguishes the impaired intellect of persons subject to
such infirmities, the epileptic boy watched his opportunity, and
stole down, unobserved, to the river's edge, among the rocks,
where the boys had placed their clothes. There he remained in
waiting, and when John Houston appeared to dress himself, and
was stooping down for his garments, the epileptic threw himself
violently upon him, bore him to the ground, and, grasping a
heavy rock, would have beaten out the brains of the offending
lad, but for the timely assistance of Arthur Holt, who drew off
the assailant, deprived him of his weapon, and gave his comrade
a chance to recover, and place himself in a situation to defend
himself.
But Acker, the epileptic boy, was no longer in a condition to
justify the hostility of any enemy. His fit of frenzy had been
succeeded by one of weeping, and, prostrate upon the ground,
he lay convulsed under most violent nervous agitation. While
he remained in this state, John Houston, who had now partially
dressed himself, furious with rage at the indignity he had
suffered
,
and the danger he had escaped, prepared to revenge himself
upon him for this last offence; and, but for Arthur Holt, would,
no doubt, have subjected the miserable victim to a severe beating.
But the manly nature of Arthur resented and resisted this
brutality
.
He stood between the victim and his persecutor.
You shall not beat him, Johnit was your own fault. You
begun it.
I will beat you then, was the reply.
No! you shall not beat me, either.
Ha! Take that!
The blow followed on the instant. A first blow, and in the
eye, too, is very apt to conclude an ordinary battle. But this
was to be no ordinary battle. Our young hero was stunned by
the blow;the fire flashed from the injured eye;but the
unfairness
of the proceeding awakened a courage which had its best
sources in the moral nature of the boy; and, though thus taken
at advantage, he closed in with his assailant, and, in this manner,
lessened the odds at which he otherwise must have fought with
one so much taller and longer in the arms than himself. In the
fling that followed, John Houston was on his back. His
conqueror
suffered him to rise.
Let us fight no more, John, he said, on relaxing his hold;
I don't want to fight with you.
The answer, on the part of the other, was a renewal of the
assault
.
Again was he thrown, and this time with a considerable
increase of severity. He rose with pain. He felt his hurts.
The place of battle was stony ground. Fragments of rock
were at hand. Indignant and mortified at the result of the
second
struggleaiming only at vengeancethe furious boy
snatched
up one of these fragments, and once more rushed upon his
companion. But this time he was restrained by a third party
no less than his own fatherwho, unobserved, had emerged from
the neighbouring thicket, and, unseen by the combatants, had
witnessed
the whole proceeding. The honourable nature of the old
hunter recoiled at the conduct of his son. He suddenly took the
lad by the collar, wrested the stone from him, and laying a heavy
hickory rod some half dozen times over his shoulders, with no
moderate emphasis, sent him home, burning with shame, and
breathing nothing but revenge.
CHAPTER II.
In
the space of five years after this event, the two fathers
yielded their scalps to the Cherokees, and upon the young men,
now stretching to manhood, devolved the task of providing for
their families. The patriarchal sway was at an end, and, with
it, all those restraining influences by which the external show of
peace had been kept up. It was to be a household in common no
longer. But a short time had elapsed, when a domestic storm of
peculiar violence determined the dames to separate for ever; and,
while the family of Holt, under the management of young
Arthur
,
remained at the old settlement near Reedy River, the
Houstons
proceeded to Paris Mountain, some seven miles off,in the
neighbourhood of which may be found, at this day, some traces
of their rude retreat. The settlement at Reedy River,
meanwhile
,
had undergone increase. New families had arrived, and
the first foundations were probably then laid of the flourishing
village which now borders the same lovely stream. The sons
grew up, but not after the fashion of their fathers. In one
respect
only did John Houston resemble his parenthe was a hunter.
Arthur Holt, on the other hand, settled down into a methodical,
hard-working farmer, who, clinging to his family fireside, made it
cheerful, and diffused the happiest influences around it. He
grew up strong rather than handsome, good rather than
conspicuous
;
and, under his persevering industry and steady habits, his
mother's family, now his own, reached a condition of comfort
before
unknown. The family of young Houston, by which we
mean his mother, sister, and a younger brother, did not flourish
in like degree. Yet Houston had already acquired great
reputation
as a hunter. In the woods he seemed literally to follow in
his father's footsteps. He had his accomplishments also. He
was certainly the handsomest youth in all the settlements; of a
bold carriage, lofty port, free, open, expressive countenance, tall
of person and graceful of movement.
It was some qualification of these advantages that the
morale
of John Houston was already something more than questionable
in the public opinion of the settlement. His tastes were vicious,
his indulgences in strong drink had more than once subjected
him to humiliating exposures, but as yet they had produced
caution
rather than dislike among his associates. Among the
women
,
however, they were not suspected to exist, or, if known or
suspected, weighed very little against the graces of a fine person,
a dashing, easy carriage, and a free gift of the gab, which
left him quite as unrivalled among the debaters as he was among
the dancers.
Among the families settled down upon Reedy River, was that
of Marcus Heywood, a Virginia cavalier, a fine hearty
gentleman
of the old school, polished and precise, who had seen better
days, and was disposed very much to insist upon them. He
brought with him into the little colony a degree of taste and
refinement, of which, before his coming, the happy little
neighbourhood
knew nothing; but, unhappily for all parties, he
survived
too short a time after his arrival, to affect very favourably,
or very materially, the sentiments and manners of those about
him. He left his widow, a lady of fifty, and an only daughter
of sixteen, to lament his loss. Mrs. Heywood was a good
woman
,
an excellent housewife, a kind matron, and all that is
exemplary
at her time of life; but Leda Heywood, her daughter, was
a paragon;in such high terms is she described by
still-worshiping
tradition, and the story that comes down to us, seems, in some
respects, to justify the warmth of its eulogium. At the period of
her father's death, Leda was only sixteen; but she was tall,
well-grown
,
and thoughtful beyond her years. The trying times in
which she livedfrequent travelthe necessity of vigilance
the duties which naturally fall upon the young in new countries
conspired to bring out her character, and to hurry to maturity
an intellect originally prompt and precocious. Necessity had
forced thought into exercise, and she had become acute,
observant
,
subdued in bearing, modest in reply, gentle, full of
womanly
solicitude, yet so calm in her deportment that, to the
superficial
observer, she wore an aspect,quite false to the fact,
of great coldness and insensibility. Her tastes were excellent;
she sang very sweetlyand when you add to the account of her
merits, that she was really very lovely, a fair, blue-eyed, graceful
creature,you need not wonder that one day she became a
heroine
!
A heroine! poor Leda! Bitterly, indeed, must she have
wept, in after times, the evil fortune that doomed her to be a
heroine!
But Leda was a belle before she become a heroine. This was,
perhaps, the more unfortunate destiny of the two. She was the
belle of Reedy River, called by hunter, and shepherd, and
farmer
,
the blue-eyed girl of Reedy River, to whom all paid an
involuntary tribute, to whom all came as suitors, and, with the
rest, who but our two acquaintances, John Houston and Arthur
Holt. At first they themselves knew not that they were rivals,
but the secret was one of that sort which very soon contrived to
reveal itself. It was then that the ancient hate of John Houston
revived, in all its fury. If Arthur Holt was not conscious of the
same feelings exactly, he was yet conscious of an increased
dislike
of his old companion. With that forbearance which, whether
the fruit of prudence or timidity, Arthur Holt had always been
careful to maintain in his intercouse with his former associate,
he now studiously kept aloof from him as much as possible. Not
that this reserve and caution manifested itself in any unmanly
weakness. On the contrary, no one could have appeared more
composed, when they met, than Arthur Holt. It is true that, in
the actual presence of Leda Heywood, he was rather more
embarrassed
than his rival. The reader will not need to be
reminded
that we have already described him as being naturally
shy. This bashfulness showed badly in contrast with the
deportment
of John Houston. If the difference between the manner of
the two young men, in approaching their mistress, was
perceptible
to herself and others, it was little likely to escape the eyes of
one who, like John Houston, was rendered equally watchful both
by hate and jealousy. But, unconscious of any bashfulness
himself, he could not conceive the influence of this weakness in
another. He committed the grievous error of ascribing the
disquiet
and nervous timidity of Arthur Holt to a very different
origin; and fondly fancied that it arose from a secret dread which
the young man felt of his rival. We shall not say what degree
of influence this notion might have had, in determining his own
future conduct towards his rival.
Some months had passed away, since the death of Colonel
Heywood, in this manner, and the crowd of suitors had gradually
given way to the two to whom our own attention has been more
particularly turned. Events, meanwhile, had been verging
towards
a very natural crisis; and the whisper, on all hands,
determined
that Leda Heywood was certainly engaged, and to John
Houston. This whisper, as a matter of course, soon reached the
ears of the man whom it was most likely to annoy.
Arthur Holt could not be said to hope, for, in truth, Leda
Heywood had given him but little encouragement; still he was not
willing to yield in despair, for, so far as he himself had observed,
she had never given any encouragement to his rival. At all
events, there was a way of settling the matter, which the
stout-hearted
fellow determined to take at the earliest moment. He
resolved to propose to Leda, a measure which he would sooner
have adopted, but for a delicate scruple arising from the fact that
he had made himself particularly useful to her mother, who, in
her widowhood, and in straitened circumstances, was very glad
to receive the help and friendly offices of the young farmer.
These scruples yielded, however, to the strength of his feelings;
and one evening he had already half finished his toilet with more
than usual care, in order to the business of a formal declaration,
when, to his own surprise and that of his family, John Houston
abruptly entered the humble homestead. It was the first visit
which he had paid since the separation of the two families, and
Arthur saw at a glance that it had its particular object. After a
few moments, in which the usual civilities were exchanged,
John Houston, rising as he spoke, said abruptly to Arthur
You seem about to go out, and perhaps we may be walking
in the same direction. If so, I can say what I have to say, while
we're on the road together.
I am about to go to see the Widow Heywood.
Very good! our road lies the same way.
The tones of Houston were more than usually abrupt as he
spoke, and there was a stern contracting of the brow, and a
fierce flashing of the eye, while he looked upon the person he
addressed, which did not escape the observation of Arthur, and
excited the apprehensions of his mother. On some pretence, she
drew her son into her chamber ere he went forth, and in few, but
earnest words, insisted that John Houston meant harm.
If you will go with him, Arthur, take this pistol of your
father's in your bosom, and keep a sharp look-out upon him.
Man never meant evil if John Houston does not mean it now.
We pass over her farther remonstrances. They made little
impression upon Arthur, but, to quiet her, he put the weapon into
his bosomhalf ashamedas he did soof a concession that
seemed to look like cowardice.
The two young men set out together, and the eyes of the
anxious
mother followed them as long as they were in sight. They
took the common path, which led them down to the river, just
below the falls. When they had reached the opposite shore, and
before they had ascended the rocks by which it is lined, John
Houston, who had led, turned suddenly upon his companion, and
thus addressed him:
Arthur Holt, you may wonder at my coming to see you
today
,
for I very well know that there is no love lost between us.
You like me as little as I like you. Nay, for that matter, I don't
care how soon you hear it from my lips,I hate you, and I shall
always hate you! We were enemies while we were boys,we
are enemies now that we are men; and I suppose we shall be
enemies as long as we live. Whether we are to fight upon it, is
for you to say.
Here he paused and looked eagerly into the eyes of his
companion
.
The latter regarded him steadily, but returned no
answer
.
He evidently seemed to await some farther explanation
of the purpose of one who had opened his business with an
avowal so startling and ungracious. After a brief pause, Houston
proceeded:
The talk is that you're a-courting Leda Heywoodthat you
mean to offer yourself to herand when I see how finely you've
rigged yourself out for it to-night, I'm half inclined to believe
you're foolish enough to be thinking of it. Arthur Holt, this
must not be! You must have nothing to do with Leda Heywood.
He paused againhis eyes keenly searching those of his rival.
The latter still met his glance with a quiet sort of determination,
which betrayed nothing of the effect which the words of the other
might have produced upon his mind. Houston was annoyed.
Impatiently, again, he spoke, as follows:
You hear me,you hear what I say?
Yes, I hear you, John Houston.
Well!
Well!you want my answer, I suppose? You shall have
it! This it is. If
you
are a madman or a fool, that is no reason
why I should not do as I please!
The other was about to interrupt him,but Holt persisted:
Let me finish, John Houston. I heard you patientlynow,
hear me! I am no fighting man, and as heaven is above us, I
have no wish to quarrel; but I am ready to fight whenever I
can't do better. As for being bullied by you, that is out of the
question. I am not afraid of you, and never was, as you should
have known before this, and as you may know whenever the
notion suits you to try. I am now, this very moment, going to
see Leda Heywood, and I mean to ask her hand.
That you shall never do! exclaimed the other, whose
passions
had been with difficulty kept down so longThat, by the
Eternal! you shall never do!and as he spoke, drawing a
knife from his belt, he rushed upon Arthur Holt, with a
promptness
and fury that left the latter in no doubt of the bloody and
desperate purposes of his foe. But the coolness of the young
farmer was his safeguard in part, and to the weapon, so
thoughtfully
furnished him by his mother, he was indebted for the rest.
He had kept a wary watch upon the movements of Houston's
eye, and read in its glance the bloody purpose of his soul, the
moment ere he struck. Retreating on one side, he was ready,
when the latter turned a second time upon him, with his
presented
pistol.
It is well for both of us, perhaps, said he, quietly, as he
cocked and held up the weapon to the face of the approaching
Houston, that this pistol was put into my hands by one who
knew you better than I did; or you might this moment have my
blood upon your soul. Let us now part, John Houston. If you
are bent to go from this to Widow Heywood's,the path is open
to you,go! I will return home, and seek some other time,
when there's no chance of our meeting; for I neither wish to kill
you nor to be killed by you. Which will you dogo forward or
return? Take your choiceI yield the path to you.
The fury of the baffled assassin may be imagined. It is not
easy to describe it. But he was in no condition of mind to visit
Leda Heywood, and, after exhausting himself in ineffectual
threatenings, he dashed once more across the foaming torrents of
Reedy River, leaving Arthur Holt free to pursue his way to the
cottage of his mistress. This he did, with a composure which
the whole exciting scene, through which he had passed, had
entirely
failed to disturb. Indeed, the events of this interview
appeared to have the effect, only, of strengthening the resolve of
the young farmer, for, to confess a truth, the good fellow was
somewhat encouragedby certain expressions which had dropped
from Houston, in his fury,to hope for a favourable answer to
his suit. We may as well say, in this place, that the frenzy of
the latter had been provoked by similar stories reaching his ears
to those which had troubled Arthur.
When they separated, and Arthur Holt went forward to the
cottage of Widow Heywood, it was with a new and most
delightful
hope awakened in his bosom.
CHAPTER III.
But
he was doomed to disappointment. He was rejected,
tenderly, but firmly. Leda Heywood was not for him; and
resigning himself to the denial, with the instincts of a man by
nature strong, and inured by trial to disappointments, Arthur
Holt retired from the field of Love, to cultivate more certain
fruits in those of Ceres and Pomona. Had the mind of the young
farmer been morbidly affected, his mortification would have been
heightened by subsequent events. Three days afterwards, Leda
Heywood accepted the hand of his enemy, John Houston!
Philosophers
will continue to seek in vain for the cause of that
strange perversity, by which the tastes, even of the finest women,
are sometimes found to be governed. There is a mystery here
beyond all solution. The tastes and sympathies of Leda Heywood
and John Houston did not run together;there was, in reality,
no common ground, whether of the affections or of the sentiments,
upon which they could meet. But he sought, and wooed, and
won her;they were married; and, to all but Arthur Holt, the
wonder was at an end after the customary limits of the ninth day.
The wonder, in this case, will be lessened to the reader if two or
three things were remembered. Leda Heywood was very young,
and John Houston very handsome. Of the wild passions of the
latter she knew little or nothing. She found him popularthe
favourite of the damsels around her, and this fact, alone, will
account
for the rest. But we must not digress in speculations of
this nature. The parties were married, and the honeymoon, in all
countries and climates, is proverbially rose-coloured. The only
awkward thing is, that, in all countries, it is but a monthly moon.
The wedding took place. The honeymoon rose, but set
somewhat
earlier than usual. With the attainment of his object, the
passion of John Houston very soon subsided, and we shall make
a long story conveniently short by saying, in this place, that it
was not many weeks before Leda Heywood (or as we must now
call her,) Leda Houston, began to weep over the ill-judged
precipitation
with which she had joined herself to a man whose
violent
temper made no allowances for the feelings, the sensibilities,
and tastes of others. No longer restrained by the dread of losing
his object, his brutalities shocked her delicacy, while his fierce
passions awoke her fears. She soon found herself neglected and
abused, and learned to loathe the connection she had formed, and
to weep bitter tears in secret. To all this evil may be added the
pressure of poverty, which now began to be more seriously felt
than ever. The hunter life, always uncertain, was still more so,
in the case of one like John Houston, continually led into
indulgences
which unfitted him, sometimes for days together, to go
into the woods. Carousing at the tavern with some congenial
natures, he suffered himself to be little disturbed by home cares;
and the privations to which his wife had been subjected even,
before
her marriage, were now considerably increased. If will be
remembered that the Widow Heywood was indebted (perhaps
even more than she then knew) to the generous care of Arthur
Holt. Her resources from this quarter were necessarily
withdrawn
on the marriage of her daughter with Houston, not so
much through any diminution of the young farmer's sympathy
for the objects of his bounty, as from a desire to withdraw from
any connexion or communion, direct or indirect, with the family
of his bitterest foe. Knowing the fierce, unreasoning nature of
Houston, he was unwilling to expose to his violence the innocent
victims of his ill habitsa consequence which he very well knew
would follow the discovery of any services secretly rendered
them by Holt. But these scruples were soon compelled to give
way to a sense of superior duty. It soon came to his knowledge
that the unhappy womenmother and daughterwere
frequently
without food. John Houston, abandoned to vicious habits
and associates, had almost entirely left his family to provide for
themselves. He was sometimes absent for weekswould return
home, as it appeared, for no purpose but to vent upon his wife and
mother-in-law the caprices of his ill-ordered moods, and then
depart
,
leaving them hopeless of his aid. In this condition, the
young farmer came again to their rescue. The larder was
provided
regularly and bountifully. But Leda knew not at first
whence this kindly succor came. She might have suspectednay,
did suspectbut Arthur Holt proceeded so cautiously, that his
supplies came to the house with the privity of Widow Heywood
only.
To add to Leda's sorrows, two events now occurred within a
few months of each other, and both in less than sixteen months
after her marriage, which were calculated to increase her
burthen
,
and to lessen, in some respect, her sources of consolation:
the birth of a son and the death of her mother. These events
drew to her the assistance of neighbours, but the most
substantial
help came from Arthur Holt. It was now scarcely possible
to conceal from Leda, as he had hitherto done, his own direct
agency in the support of her family. She was compelled to
know it, andwhich was still more mortifying to her spirit
conscious as she was of the pastshe was compelled to receive
it. Her husband's course was not materially improved by events
which had so greatly increased the claims and the necessities of
his wife. The child, for a time, appealed to his pride. It was
a fine boy, who was supposed and said to resemble himself.
This pleased him for a while, but did not long restrain him from
indulgences, which, grateful to him from the first, had now
acquired over him all the force of habit. He soon disappeared
from his home, and again, for long and weary periods, left the
poor Leda to all the cares and solitude, without the freedom, of
widowhood.
But a circumstance was about to occur, which suddenly drew
his attention to his home. Whether it was that some meddlesome
neighbour informed him of the assistance which his wife derived
from Arthur Holt, or that he himself had suddenly awakened to
the inquiry as to the source of her supplies, we cannot say; but
certain it is that the suspicions of his evil nature were aroused;
and he who would not abandon his low and worthless associates
for the sake of duty and love, was now prompted to do so by his
hate. He returned secretly to the neighbourhood of his home,
and put himself in a place of concealment.
The cottage of the Widow Heywood was within three
quarters
of a mile of Reedy River, on the opposite side of which
stood the farm of Arthur Holt. This space the young farmer
was accustomed nightly to cross, bearing with him the
commodity
,
whether of flour, honey, milk, meat, or corn, which his
benevolence prompted him to place on the threshold of his sad
and suffering neighbour. There was a little grove of chestnut
and other forest trees, that stood about two hundred yards from
Leda's cottage. A part of this grove belonged to their dwelling;
the rest was unenclosed. Through this grove ran one of the lines
of fence which determined the domain of the cottage. On both
sides of the fence, in the very centre of this thicket, there were
steps, gradually rising, from within and without, to its top,a
mode of constructing a passage frequent in the country, which,
having all the facilities of a gateway, was yet more permanent,
and without its disadvantages. To this point came Arthur Holt
nightly. On these steps he laid his tribute, whether of charity
or a still lingering love, or both, and, retiring to the thicket, he
waited, sometimes for more than an hour, until he caught a
glimpse of the figure of Leda, descending through the grove, and
possessing herself of the supply. This done, and she departed;
the young farmer, sighing deeply, would turn away unseen,
unsuspected
,
perhaps, and regain his own cottage.
On these occasions
the two never met
. The Widow Heywood,
on her deathbed, had confided to her daughter the secret of her
own interviews with Arthur, and he, to spare himself as well as
Leda, he pain of meeting, had appointed his own and her hour
of coming, differently. Whether she, at any time, suspected his
propinquity, cannot be conjectured. That she was touched to the
heart by his devotion, cannot well be questioned.
For five weary nights did the malignant and suspicious eyes
of John Houston, from a contiguous thicket, watch these
proceedings
with feelings of equal hate and mortification. Filled with
the most foul and loathsome anticipationsburning to find
victims
to
detect, expose, destroyhe beheld only a spectacle
which increased his mortification. He beheld innocence superior
to misfortunelove that did not take advantage of its powera
benevolence that rebuked his own worthlessness and hardness of
hearta purity on the part of both the objects of his jealousy,
which mocked his comprehension, as it was so entirely above any
capacity of his own, whether of mind or heart, to appreciate.
PART II. 3
It was now the fifth night of his watch. He began to despair
of his object. He had seen nothing to give the least confirmation
to his suspicions. His wife had appeared only as she was, as
pure as an angel;his ancient enemy not less so. He was
furious that he could find no good cause of fury, and weary of a
watch which was so much at variance with his habits. He
determined
that night to end it. With the night, and at the usual
hour, came the unfailing Arthur. He placed his bowl of milk
upon the steps, his sack of meal, a small vessel of butter, and a
neat little basket of apples. For a moment he lingered by the
fence, then slipping back, adroitly ensconced himself in a
neighbouring
thicket, from whence he could see every movement of
the fair sufferer by whom they were withdrawn. This last
movement of the young farmer had not been unseen by the
guilty husband. Indeed, it was this part of the proceeding
which, more than any thing beside, had forced upon him the
conviction that the parties did not meet. She came, and she, too,
lingered by the steps, before she proceeded to remove the
provisions
.
Deep was the sigh that escaped herdeeper than usual
were her emotions. She sank upon one of the stepsshe
clasped
her hands convulsivelyher lips movedshe was evidently
breathing a spontaneous prayer to heaven, at the close of which
she wept bitterly, the deep sobs seeming to burst from a heart
that felt itself relieved by this mournful power of expression.
Was it the echo of her own sighsher sobsthat came to her
from the thicket? She started, and with wild eye gazing around
her, proceeded with all haste to gather up her little stores. But
in this she was prevented. The answering sigh, the sob,
coming
from the lips of his hated rival and ancient enemy, had gone,
hissingly, as it were, into the very brain of John Houston. He
darted from his place of concealment, dashed the provisions from
the hands of his wife, and, with a single blow, smote her to the
earth, while he cried out to Holt in the opposite thicket, some
incoherent
language of insults and opprobrium. The movement
of the latter was quite as prompt, though not in season to
prevent
the unmanly blow. He sprang forward, and, grasping the
offender about the body, lifted him with powerful effort from the
earth, upon which he was about to hurl him again with all the
fury of indignant manhood, when Leda leapt to her feet, and
interposed. At the sound of her voice, the very tones of which
declared her wish, Arthur released his enemy, but with no easy
effort. The latter, regaining his feet, and recovering in some
degree his composure, turned to his wife and commanded her
absence.
I cannot goI will notwhile there is a prospect of
blood-shed
,
was her firm reply.
What! you would see it, would you? Doubtless, the sight
of my blood would delight your eyes! But hope not for it!
Arthur Holt, are you for ever to cross my path, and with
impunity
?
Shall there never be a settlement between us? Is the day
of reckoning never to come? Speak! Shall we fight it out here,
in the presence of this woman, or go elsewhere, where there will
be no tell-tale witnesses? Will you follow me?
Go not,follow him not,Arthur Holt. Go to your home!
I thank you, I bless you for what you have done for me and
mine;for the mother who looks on us from heaven,for the
child that still looks to me on earth. May God bless you for
your charity and goodness! Go now, Arthur Holtgo to your
own homeand look not again upon mine. Once more, God's
blessings be upon you! May you never want them.
There was a warmth, an earnestness, almost a violence in the
tone and manner of this adjuration, so new to the usually meek
and calm deportment of his wife, that seemed, on a sudden, to
confound the brutal husband. He turned on her a vacant look
of astonishment. He was very far from looking for such
boldness
such
audacityin that quarter. But his forbearance was
not of long duration, and he was already beginning a fierce and
almost frenzied repetition of his blasphemies, when the subdued,
but firm answer of Arthur Holt again diverted his attention. The
good sense of the young farmer made him at once sensible of the
danger to the unhappy woman of using any language calculated
to provoke the always too prompt brutality of the husband, and,
stifling his own indignation with all his strength, he calmly
promised
compliance with her requisitions.
There are many reasons, he added, why there should be
no strife between John Houston and myself; we were boys
together
,
our fathers loved one another; we have slept in the same
bed.
That shall not be your excuse, Arthur Holt, exclaimed the
other, interrupting him; you shall not escape me by any such
pretences. My father's name shall not shelter your cowardice.
Cowardice!
Ay, cowardice! cowardice! What are you but an unmanly
coward!
There was a deep, but quiet struggle, in the breast of Arthur,
to keep down the rising devil in his mood; but he succeeded,
and turning away, he contented himself with saying simply:
You
know that I am no coward, John Houstonnobody
better
than yourself. You will take good heed how you approach
such cowardice as mine.
Do you dare me!
Yes!
No! no! cried the wife, again flinging herself between
them. Away, Arthur Holt, why will you remain when you see
what I am doomed to suffer?
I go, Leda, but I dread to leave you in such hands. God
have you in his holy keeping!
CHAPTER IV.
We
pass over a period of eighteen months. In this time John
Houston had sold out the little cottage near Reedy River, and
had removed his wife to the residence of his mother near Paris
Mountain. Why he had not adopted this measure on the demise
of Widow Heywood is matter of conjecture only. His own mother
was now dead, and it was the opinion of those around, that it
was only after this latter event that he could venture upon a step
which might seem to divide the sceptre of household authority
a point about which despotical old ladies are apt to be very
jealous. His household was as badly provided for as ever, but
some good angel, whose presence might have been suspected,
still watched over the wants of the suffering wife, and the hollow
of an ancient chestnut now received the stores which we have
formerly seen placed upon the rude blocks near the thicket fence
in Greenville. Whether John Houston still suspected the
interference
of his hated playmate we cannot say. The prudent
caution of the latter availed so that they did not often meet, and
never under circumstances which could justify a quarrel. But
events were ripening which were to bring them unavoidably into
collision. We are now in the midst of the year 1776. The
strife had already begun, of Whig and Tory, in the upper part
of South Carolina. It happened some time in 1774 that the
afterwards
notorious Moses Kirkland stopped one night at the dwelling
of John Houston. This man was already busy in stirring up
disaffection to the popular party of the State. He was a man of
loose, vicious habits, and irregular propensities. He and John
Houston were kindred spirits; and the hunter was soon enlisted
under his banners. He was out with Kirkland in the campaign
of 1775, when the Tories were dispersed and put down by the
decisive measures of General Williamson and William Henry
Drayton. It so happened that Arthur Holt made his appearance
in the field, also for the first time, in the army of Williamson.
The two knew that they were now opponents as they had long
been enemies. But they did not meet. The designs of Kirkland
were baffled, his troops dispersed, and the country settled down
into a condition of seeming quiet. But it was a seeming quiet
only. The old wounds festered, and when, in 1780, the
metropolis
of the State fell into the hands of the British, yielding to
captivity nearly the whole of its military power, the Tories
resumed
their arms and impulses with a fury which long
forbearance
had heightened into perfect madness. Upon the long and
melancholy history of that savage warfare which followed, we
need not dwell. The story is already sufficiently well known.
It is enough to say that John Houston distinguished himself by his
cruelties. Arthur Holt threw by the plough, and was one of
Butler's men for a season. With the decline of British power in
the lower, the ascendancy in the upper country finally passed
over to the Whigs. Both parties were now broken up into little
squads of from ten to fifty persons;the Tories, the better to
avoid pursuit, the Whigs, the better to compass them in all their
hiding-places.
It was a cold and cheerless evening in the month of November
that Arthur Holt, armed to the teeth, stopped for the night, with a
party of eleven men, at a cottage about fourteen miles from his
own dwelling on the banks of Reedy River.
An hour had not well elapsed, before Arthur Holt found some
one jerking at his shoulder. He opened his eyes and recognised
the epileptic of whom mention was made in the early part of our
narrative. Acker was still an epileptic, and still, to all
appearance
,
a boy;he was small, decrepit, pale, and still liable to the
shocking disease, the effects of which were apparent equally in
his withered face and shrivelled person. But he was not without
intelligence, and his memory was singularly tenacious of benefits
and injuries. Eagerly challenging the attention of Arthur Holt,
he proceeded to tell him that John Houston had only two hours
before been seen with a party of seven, on his way to the farm at
Paris Mountain, where, at that very moment, he might in all
probability be found. By this time the troopers, accustomed to
sudden rousings, were awake and in possession of the intelligence.
It was greedily listened to by all but Arthur Holt. John Houston
was particularly odious in his own neighbourhood. Several of
the inhabitants had fallen victims to his brutality and hate. To
take him, living or dead,to feed the vengeance for which they
thirsted,was at once the passion of the party. It was with
some surprise that they found their leader apathetic and disposed
to fling doubt upon the information.
I know not how you could have seen John Houston, Peter
Acker, with seven men, when we left him behind us, going
below
,
and crossing at Daniel's Ford on the Ennoree, only two days
ago.
'Twas him I seed, Captain, and no other. Don't you think I
knows John Houston? Oughtn't I to know him? Wasn't it he
that used to beat me, and duck me in the water? I knows him.
'Twas John Houston, I tell you, and no other person.
You are mistaken, Peteryou must be mistaken. No horse
could have brought him from the Ennoree so soon.
He's on his own horse, the great bay. 'Tis John Houston,
and you must catch him and hang him.
One of the party, a spirited young man, named Fletchall, now
said:
Whether it's Houston and his men or not, Captain Holt, we
should see who the fellows are. Acker ought to know Houston,
and though we heard of him on the Ennoree, we may have
heard wrong. It's my notion that Acker is right; and every
man of Reedy River, that claims to be a man, ought to see to it.
There was a sting in this speech that made it tell. They did
not understand the delicacy of their Captain's situation, nor could
he explain it. He could only sigh and submit. Buckling on his
armour, he obeyed the necessity, and his eager troop was soon in
motion for the cottage of Houston at Paris Mountain. There, two
hours before, John Houston had arrived. He had separated from
his companions. It was not affection for his wife that brought
Houston to his home. On the contrary, his salutation was that
of scorn and suspicion. He seemed to have returned, brooding
on some dark imagination or project. When his wife brought
his child, and put him on his knees, saying with a mournful look
of reproach, You do not even ask for your son! the reply,
betraying
the foulest of fanciesHow know I that he is! showed
too plainly the character of the demon that was struggling in his
soul. The miserable woman shrunk back in horror, while his
eyes, lightened by a cold malignant smile, pursued her as if in
mockery. When she placed before him a little bread and meat,
he repulsed it, exclaiming: Would you have me fed by your
Arthur? And when she meekly replied by an assurance that
the food did not come from him, his answer, Ay, but I am not
so sure of the sauce! indicated a doubt so horrible, that the poor
woman rushed from the apartment with every feeling and fibre
of her frame convulsed. Without a purpose, except to escape
from suspicions by which she was tortured, she had turned the
corner of the enclosure, hurrying, it would seem, to a little thicket,
where her sorrows would be unseen, when she suddenly
encountered
Arthur Holt, with a cocked pistol in his grasp. The
troopers
had dismounted and left their horses in the woods. They
were approaching the house cautiously, on foot, and from
different
quarters. The object was to effect a surprise of the Tory;
since, armed and desperate, any other more open mode of
approach
might, even if successful, endanger valuable life. The
plan had been devised by Arthur. He had taken to himself that
route which brought him first to the cottage. His object was
explained in the few first words with Leda Houston.
Arthur Holt!you here! was her exclamation, as she
started at his approach.
Ay; and your husband is here!
No, no! was the prompt reply.
Nay, deny not! I would save himaway! let him fly at
once. We shall soon be upon him!
A mute but expressive look of gratitude rewarded him, while,
forgetting the recent indignities to which she had been subjected,
Leda hurried back to the cottage and put Houston in possession
of the facts. He started to his feet, put the child from his knee,
though still keeping his hand upon its shoulder, and glaring upon
her with eyes of equal jealousy and rage, he exclaimed
Woman! you have brought my enemy upon me!
To this charge the high-souled woman made no answer, but
her form became more erect, and her cheek grew paler, while
her exquisitely chiselled lips were compressed with the effort to
keep down her stifling indignation. She approached him as if
to relieve him of the child; but he repulsed her, and grasping
the little fellow firmly in his hands, with no tenderness of hold,
he lifted him to his shoulder, exclaiming
No! he shares my danger! he goes with me. He is at least
your
childhe shall protect me from your
The sentence was left unfinished as he darted through the
door! With a mother's scream she bounded after him, as he
took his way to the edge of the little coppice in which his horse
was fastened. The agony of a mother's soul lent wings to her
feet. She reached him ere he could undo the fastenings of his
horse, and, seizing him by his arm, arrested his progress.
What! he exclaimed; you would seizeyou would
deliver
me!
My child! my child! was her only answer, as she clung
to his arm, and endeavoured to tear the infant from his grasp.
He goes with me! He shall protect me from the shot!
You will not, cannot risk his precious life.
Do I not risk mine?
My sonyour son!
Were I sure of that!
God of heaven! help me! Save him! save him!
But there was no time for parley. A pistol-shot was fired
from the opposite quarter of the house, whether by accident, or
for the purpose of alarm, is not known, but it prompted the
instant movement of the ruffian, who, in order to extricate
himself
from the grasp of his wife, smote her to the earth, and in
the midst of the child's screams hurried forward with his prize.
To reach the coppice, to draw forth and mount his horse, was
the work of an instant only. The life of the hunter and the
partisan had made him expert enough in such performances.
Mounted on a splendid bay, of the largest size and greatest
speed, he lingered but a moment in sight, the child conspicuously
elevated in his grasp, its head raised above his left shoulder, while one
of its little arms might be seen stretching towards his motner, now
rising from the earth. At this instant Arthur Holt made his
appearance
.
From the wood, where he had remained as long as he
might, he had beheld the brutal action of his enemy. It was the
second time that he had witnessed such a deed, and his hand now
convulsively grasped and cocked his pistol, as he rushed forward
to revenge it. But the unhappy woman rose in time to prevent
him. Her extended arms were thrown across his path. He
raised the deadly weapon above them.
Would you shoot! oh, my God! would you shoot! Do you
not see my child! my child!
The action of Arthur was suspended at the mother's words;
and, lifting the child aloft with a powerful arm, as if in triumph
and defiance, the brutal father, putting spurs to his horse, went
off at full speed. A single bound enabled the noble animal to
clear the enclosure, and, appearing but a single moment upon the
hillside, the mother had one more glimpse of her child, whose
screams, in another moment, were drowned in the clatter of the
horse's feet. She sunk to the ground at the foot of Arthur, as his
comrades leapt over the surrounding fence.
CHAPTER V.
Pursuit
under present circumstances was pretty much out of
the questionyet Arthur Holt determined upon it. John
Houston
was mounted upon one of the most famous horses of the
country. He had enjoyed a rest of a couple of hours before the
troopers came upon him. The steeds of the latter, at all times
inferior, were jaded with the day's journey. Any attempt at
direct pursuit would, therefore, in all probability, only end in
driving the Tory out of the neighbourhood, thus increasing the
chances of his final escape. This was by no means the object
of the party, and when Arthur ordered the pursuit, some of his
men remonstrated by showing, or endeavouring to show, that such
must be the effect of it. Arthur Holt, however, had his own
objects. But his commands were resisted by no less a person
than Leda herself.
Do not pursue, Arthur, for my sake, do not pursue. My
child!he will slay my child if you press him hard. He is
desperate
.
You know him not. Press him not, for my sake,for
the child's sake,but let him go free.
The entreaty, urged strenuously and with all those tears and
prayers which can only flow from a mother's heart, was
effectual
at
least to prevent that direct pursuit which Arthur had
meditated. But, though his companions favoured the prayers of
the wife and mother, they were very far from being disposed to
let the Tory go free. On the contrary, when, a little after, they
drew aside to the copse for the purpose of farther consultation,
Arthur Holt found, to his chagrin, that his course with regard
to Houston was certainly suspected. His comrades assumed a
decision in the matter which seemed to take the business out of
his hands. Young Fletchall did not scruple to say, that he was
not satisfied with the spirit which Arthur had shown in the
pursuit
;
and the hints conveyed by more than one, in the course of
the discussion, were of such a nature, that the mortified Arthur
threw up his command; a proceeding which seemed to occasion
no regret or dissatisfaction. Fletchall was immediately invested
with it, and proceeded to exercise it with a degree of acuteness
and vigour which soon satisfied the party of his peculiar fitness
for its duties. His plan was simple but comprehensive. He
said: We cannot press the pursuit, or we drive him off; but
we can so fix it as to keep him where he is. If we do not press
him, he will keep in the woods, near abouts, till he can find some
chance of getting the child to the mother again. There's no
doubt an understanding between them. She knows where to find
him in the woods, or he'll come back at night to the farm. We
must put somebody to watch over all her movements. Who will
that be?
The question was answered by the epileptic, Acker, who,
unasked
,
had hung upon the skirts of the party.
I will watch her!
You!
Yes! I'm as good a one as you can get.
Very well! but suppose you have one of your fits, Acker!
I won't have one now for two weeks. My time's over for
this month.
Well, in two weeks, I trust, his time will be over too. We
will get some twenty more fellows and make a ring round him.
That's my plan. Don't press, for I wouldn't have him hurt the
child; but mark him when he aims to pass the ring.
The plan thus agreed on, with numerous details which need
not be given here, was immediately entered upon by all parties.
Arthur Holt alone took no share in the adventure. The design
was resolved upon even without his privity, though the general
object could not be concealed from his knowledge. On throwing
up his commission he had withdrawn from his comrades, under a
show of mortification, which was regarded as sufficiently natural
by those around him to justify such a course. He returned to
his farm on Reedy River, but he was no indifferent or inactive
spectator of events.
Meanwhile, John Houston had found a temporary retreat some
six miles distant from the dwelling of his wife. It was a spot
seemingly impervious, in the density of its woods, to the steps of
man. A small natural cavity in a hillside had been artificially
deepened, in all probability, by the bear, who had left it as a
heritage to the hunter to whom he had yielded up his ears.
The retreat was known to the hunter only. He had added, from
time to time, certain little improvements of his own. Cells were
opened on one side, and then the other. These were strewn with
dried leaves and rushes, and, at the remote inner extremity,
a fourth hollow had been prepared so as to admit of fire, the
smoke finding its way through a small and simple opening
at the top. All around this rude retreat the woods were dense,
the hunter being at particular pains to preserve it as a place of
secrecy and concealment. Its approach was circuitous, and the
very entrance upon it, one of those happy discoveries, by which
nature is made to accomplish the subtlest purposes of art. Two
gigantic shafts, shooting out from the same root, had run up in
diverging but parallel lines, leaving between them an opening
through which, at a moderate bound, a steed might make his
way. On each side of this mighty tree the herbage crowded
closely; the tree itself seemed to close the passage, and behind
it care was taken, by freely scattering brush and leaves, to
remove
any traces of horse or human footsteps. In this place
John Houston found refuge. To this place, in the dead of night,
the unhappy Leda found her way. How she knew of the spot
may be conjectured only. But, prompted by a mother's love
and a mother's fears, she did not shrink from the task of
exploring
the dreary forest alone. Here she found her miserable
husband, and was once more permitted to clasp her infant to
her bosom. The little fellow slept soundly upon the rushes, in
one of the recesses of the cave. The father sat at the entrance,
keeping watch over him. His stern eye looked upon the
embrace
of mother and child with a keen and painful interest; and
when the child, awakened out of sleep, shrieking with joy, clung
to the neck of the mother, sobbing her name with a
convulsive
delight, he turned from the spectacle with a single sentence,
muttered through his closed teeth, by which we may see what
his meditations had beenHad the brat but called me father!
The words were unheard by the mother, too full of joy to be
conscious of any thing but her child and her child's recovery.
When, however, before the dawn of day, she proposed to leave
him and take the child with her, she was confounded to meet
with denial.
No! said the brutal father. He remains with me. If he
is my child, he shall remain as my security and yours. Hear
me, woman! Your ruffians have not pursued me; your Arthur
Holt knows better than to press upon me; but I know their aims.
They have covered the outlets. They would make my captivity
secure. I wish but three days; in that time, Cunningham will
give them employment, and I shall walk over them as I please.
But, during that time, I shall want food for myself and horse
perhaps you will think there is some necessity for bringing food
to the child. I do not object to that. Bring it then yourself,
nightly, and remember, the first show of treachery seals his
fate!
He pointed to the child as he spoke.
Great God! she exclaimed. Are you a man, John
Houston! Will you keep the infant from me!
Ay!you should thank heaven that I do not keep you from
him also. But away! Bring the provisions! Be faithful, and
you shall have the child. But, remember! if I am entrapped,
he dies!
We pass over the horror of the mother. At the dawn of day,
as she was hurrying, but not unseen, along the banks of Reedy
River, she was encountered by Arthur Holt.
I went to your house at midnight, Leda, to put you on your
guard, was the salutation of the farmer. I know where you
have bee, and can guess what duty is before you. I must also
tell you its danger.
He proceeded to explain to her the watch that was put upon
her movements, and the
cordon militaire
by which her husband
was surrounded.
What am I to do! was her exclamation, as, wringing her
hands, the tears for the first time flowed freely from her eyes.
I will tell you! Go not back to your cottage, till you can
procure the child. Go now to the stone heap on the river bank
below, which they call the `Giant's Coffin.' There, in an hour
from now, I will bring you a basket of provisions. The place
is very secret, and before it is found out that you go there, you
will have got the child. Nightly, I will fill the basket in the
same place, which, at the dawn, you can procure. Go now,
before
we are seen, and God be with you!
They separatedthe young farmer for his home, and Leda
for the gloomy vault which popular tradition had dignified with
the title of the Giant's Coffin. This was an Indian giant, by
the way, whose exploits, in the erection of Table Mountain, for
gymnastic purposes, would put to shame the inferior feats of the
devil, under direction of Merlin or Michael Scott. But we have
no space in this chapter for such descriptions. Enough if we
give some idea of the sort of coffin and the place of burial which
the giant selected for himself, when he could play his mountain
pranks no longer. The coffin was a vaulted chamber of stone,
lying at the river's edge, and liable to be overflowed in seasons
of freshet. It took its name from its shape. Its area was an
oblong square, something more than twelve feet in length, and
something less than five in breadth. Its depth at the upper end
was about six feet, but it sloped gradually down, until, at the
bottom, the ends lay almost even with the surrounding rocks.
The inner sides were tolerably smooth and uprightthe outer
presented the appearance of huge boulders, in no way differing
from the ordinary shape and externals of such detached masses.
The separate parts had evidently, at one period, been united.
Some convulsion of nature had fractured the mass, and left the
parts in a position so relative, that tradition might well be
permitted
to assume the labours of art in an achievement which was
really that of nature alone. To complete the fancied
resemblance
of this chamber to a coffin, it had a lid; a thin layer of
stone, detached from the rest, which, as the earth around it had
been loosened and washed away by the rains, had gradually
slid down from the heights above, and now in part rested upon
the upper end of the vault. The boys at play, uniting their
strength, had succeeded in forcing it down a foot or more, so
that it now covered, securely from the weather, some four or
five feet of the Giant's Coffin. It was at this natural chamber
that Arthur Holt had counselled Leda Houston to remain, until
he could bring the promised supply of provisions. This he did,
punctually, at the time appointed, and continued to do until it
ceased to be necessary; to this spot did the wretched wife and
mother repair before dawn of every morning, bearing her burden
with all the uncomplaining meekness of a broken heart. We
must suppose, in the meantime, that the cordon has been drawn
around the tract of country in which it was known that Houston
harboured. The news was spread, at the same time, that an
attack might be expected from Bloody Bill Cunningham, or
some of his men; and the consequence was, that the country
was every where in arms and vigilant. A feeling of pity for
Leda Houston, who was generally beloved, alone prevented the
more daring young men from pressing upon the fugitive,
hunting
him, with dog and fire, and bringing the adventure to a fierce
and final issue. Meanwhile, the epileptic, Acker, was active
in the business which he had undertaken. He was partially
successfulbut of his proceedings we must speak at another
moment.
The situation of Leda Houston was in no ways improved by
the diligence, the patience, the devotion which she displayed in
her servitude. She did not seem to make any progress in
subduing
the inexorable nature of her husband. She was permitted
to be with and to feed her child; to clasp him to her bosom
when she slept, and to watch over his sleep with that mixed
feeling of hope and fear, which none but a mother knows. But
these were all her privileges. The brutal father, still insinuating
base and unworthy suspicions, declared that the child should
remain, a pledge of her fidelity, and a partial guaranty for his
own safety.
Four days had now elapsed in this manner. On the morning
of the fifth, at a somewhat later hour than usual, she re-appeared
with her basket, and, having set down her stores, proceeded to
tell her husband of the arrival of a certain squad of troopers,
Butler's men, known for the fierce hostility with which they
hunted the men of Cunningham. The tidings gave him some
concern. He saw in it the signs of a dogged determination
of the neighbourhood to secure him at all hazards; since, from
what he knew of the present condition of the war, these men
could be required in that quarter only for some such purpose.
They were wanted elsewhere. Did you see them? was the
question, which she answered in the negative. Who told
you then of their arrival? She was silent! Her
countenance
underwent a change. Woman! you have spoken with
Holt! These are his provisions! With a blow of his foot he
struck the basket from her hand, and, in his fury, trampled
upon the scattered stores. It was with difficulty that the
unhappy
woman gathered up enough to pacify the hunger of the
child. That day was passed in sullen and ferocious silence on
his parton hers in mute caresses of her boy. His darker
suspicions were in full force, and darker thoughts came with
them. Could I but know! he muttered. The child has
my mouth and nose; but the forehead, the hair, the eyes,are
his!
Convulsed with terrible fancies, the miserable man
hurried
to the entrance of the cavern, and throwing himself upon
the earth, leaned back, and looked up through the leafy openings
at the bits of sky that were suffered to appear above. In this
gloomy mood and posture, hours passed by as moments. It was
midnight. A change of weather was at hand. The stars were
hiddenthe sky overcast with clouds, while the winds, seeming
to subside, were moaning through the woods as one in a deep
and painful sleep. The sound, the scene, were congenial with
the outlaw's soul. It was full of angry elements that only
waited the signal to break forth in storm. Suddenly, he was
roused from his meditations by the cessation of all sounds from
within the cave. The mother slept there, she had been playing
with the child, and he upon her bosom. Nature, in her case,
had sunk, in spite of sorrow, under fatigue. And she slept
deeply, her slumbers broken only by a plaintive moaning of
those griefs that would not sleep. With a strange curiosity
Houston seated himself quietly beside the pair, while his eyes
keenly perused the calm and innocent features of the child.
Long was the study, and productive of conflicting emotions. It
was interrupted with a start, and his eyes involuntarily turned,
with even a less satisfied expression, upon the features of his
wife.
But it was not to watch or to enjoy the beauty which he beheld,
that John Houston now bent his dark brows over the sleeping
PART II. 4
countenance of his wife. The expression in his looks was that
of a wild and fearful curiosity suddenly aroused. She had
spoken
in her sleep. She had uttered a worda namewhich, of
all others, was most likely, from any lips, to awaken his most
angry emotions,from her lips, most terrible. The name was
that of Arthur Holt,and she still murmured. The ears of the
suspicious husband were placed close to her lips, that none of
the whispered sounds might escape him. He heard enough to open
to him a vista, at the extremity of which his diseased imagination
saw the worst shapes of hate and jealousy. With the pressing
thought in her memory of the tasks before her, she spoke of the
little basketthe breadthe bottle of milk, the slender slices of
ham or venisonwhich she had been accustomed to receive and
bring. Then came the two words, Giant's Coffin, and the
quick fancy of the outlaw, stimulated by hate and other passions,
immediately reached, at a bound, the whole narrative of her
dependence
upon Holt and her meetings with him at the Giant's
Coffin!
A dark smile passed over his countenance. It was the smile
of a demon, who is at length, after long being baffled, in possession
of his prey. Leda slept onsoundly sleptfor nature had at
length coerced the debtor, and compelled her rightsand the
hour was approaching when it was usual for her to set out on
her nightly progress. The resolution came, quick as lightning,
to the mind of the ruffian. He rose stealthily from the rushes,
drew his pistols from his belt, silently examined the flints, and,
looking at the knife in his bosom, stole forth from the cavern.
With a spirit exulting with the demonaic hope of assuring
himself
of a secret long suspected, and of realizing a vengeance
long delayed,and familiar, night and day, with every step in
his progress, he hurried directly across the country to the banks
of Reedy River. The night, by this time, had become
tempestuous
.
Big drops of rain already began to fall; but these caused
no delay to the hardy outlaw. He reached the river, and,
moving now with cautious steps from rock to rock, he
approached
the Giant's Coffin with the manner of one who
expects
to find a victim and an enemy. One hand grasped a pistol,
the other a knife!and, stealing onward with the pace of the Indian,
he hung over the sides of the Coffin, and peered into its dark
chamber with his keenest eyes. It was untenanted. I am too
soon, he muttered. Well! I can wait! And where better
to await the victimwhere more secure from detectionthan in
the vault which lay before him!one half covered from the
weather and shut in from all inspection,that alone excepted, for
which he had come prepared. The keen gusts of wind which
now came across the stream laden with rain, was an additional
motive to this movement. He obeyed the suggestion, passed into
the mouth of the Coffin; and, crouching from sight, in a
sitting
posture, in the upper or covered part of the chamber, he sat
with the anxiety of a passion which did not, however, impair its
patience, awaiting for his foe.
He had not reached this position unseen or unaccompanied.
We have already intimated that Acker, the epileptic, had made
some progress in his discoveries. With the singular cunning,
and the wonderful acuteness which distinguish some of the
faculties, where others are impaired in the same individual, he
had contrived, unseen and unsuspected, to track Leda Houston
to the place of her husband's concealment. He had discovered
the periods of her incoming and departure, and, taking his rest
at all other periods, he was always prepared to renew his
surveillance
at those moments when the wife was to go forth. He had
barely resumed his watch, on the night in question, when he
was surprised to see Houston himself and not his wife emerging
from the cave. He followed cautiously his footsteps. Light of
foot, and keeping at convenient distance, his espionage was
farther assisted by the wind, which, coming in their faces,
effectually kept all sounds of pursuit from the ears of the outlaw.
His progress was not so easy when the latter emerged from the
woods, and stood upon the banks of the river. His approach
now required more caution; but, stealing on from shrub to shrub,
and rock to rock, Acker at length stoodor rather crouched
upon the brink of the river also, and at but small distance from
the other. But of this distance he had ceased to be conscious.
He was better informed, however, when, a moment after, he
heard a dull, clattering, but low sound, which he rightly
conjectured
to have been caused by some pressure upon the lower lid
of the Coffin, which, being somewhat pendulous, was apt to
vibrate slightly, in spite of its great length and weight, under
any pressure from above. This sound apprised Acker of the
exact whereabouts of the outlaw, and his keen eyes at length
detected the dim outline of the latter's form, as he stood upon
the lid of the Coffin, the moment before he disappeared within its
recesses. Encouraged to advance, by the disappearance of the
other, the Epileptic did so with extreme caution. He was
favoured by the hoarse tumbling of the water as it poured its
way among the rocks, and by the increasing discords of the
wind and rain, which now came down in heavy showers. As
he crawled from rock to rock, with the stealthy movement of a
cat along some precipitous ledge, shrinking and shivering beneath
the storm, his own desire for shelter led him suddenly to the
natural conclusion that Houston had found his within the vault.
The ideas of Acker came to him slowly; but, gradually, as he
continued to approach, he remembered the clattering of the
Coffin-lid
,he
remembered how, in his more youthful days, the boys,
with joint strength, had forced it to its present place, and he
conceived the sudden purpose of making the Coffin of the Giant,
that also of the deadly enemy whose boyish persecutions he had
neither forgot nor forgiven. To effect his present object, which,
suddenly conceived, became for the time an absorbing thirst, a
positive frenzy, in his breast,he concentrated all his faculties,
whether of mind or of body, upon his task. His pace was
deliberate, and, so stealthy, that he reached the upper end of
the Coffin, laid himself down beside it, and, applying his ear to
one of the crevices, distinctly heard the suppressed breathings of
the man within. Crawling back, he laid his hands lightly and
with the greatest care upon the upper and heavier end of the
stone. His simple touch, so nicely did it seem to be balanced,
caused its vibration; and with the first consciousness of its
movement, Houston, whom we must suppose to have been lying
down, raising his pistol with one hand, laid the other on one of
the sides of the vault, with the view, as it was thought, to lift
himself from his recumbent position. He did so just as the
huge plate of stone was set in motion, and the member was
caught and closely wedged between the mass and the side of the
Coffin upon which it rested. A slight cry broke from the outlaw.
The fingers were crushed, the hand was effectually secured. But
for this, so slow was the progress of the stone, that it would
have been very easy for Houston to have scrambled out before the
vault was entirely closed in. Slowly, but certainly, the lid went
down. Ignorant of the peculiar occasion of the outlaw's groans,
the Epileptic answered them with a chuckle, which, had the
former been conscious, would have taught him his enemy. But
he had fainted. The excruciating agony of his hurt had been
too much for his strength. Acker finished his work without
interruption; then piling upon the plate a mountain of smaller
stones, he dashed away in the direction of Holt's cottage. Here
he encountered the young farmer, busy, as was usual about that
hour, in making up his little basket of provisions. A few words
from the Epileptic sufficed to inform him that they were no longer
necessarythat Houston was gonefledutterly escaped, and
now, in all probability, beyond pursuit. Such was the tale he
told. He had his policy in it. The characteristic malignant
cunning which had prompted him to the fearful revenge which
he had taken upon his enemy, was studious now to keep it
from being defeated. To have told the truth, would have been
to open the Giant's Coffin, to undo all that had been done,
and once more let free the hated tyrant upon whose head he had
visited the meditated retribution of more than twenty years.
Acker well knew the generous nature of the young farmer, and
did not doubt that, if he declared the facts, Arthur would have
proceeded at once to the rescue of the common enemy. He
suppressed all show of exultation, made a plausible storyit
matters not of what sortby which to account for the flight of
Houston; and, the consequence was, that, instead of proceeding
as before to the Giant's Coffin, Arthur Holt now prepared to
set out for the Hunter's Cave. But the day had broke in
tempest. A fearful storm was raging. The windows of heaven
were opened, the rain came down in torrents, and the wind went
forth with equal violence, as if from the whole four quarters of
the earth. The young farmer got out his little wagon, and
jumping in, Acker prepared to guide him to the place of retreat.
The river is rising fast, Peter, was the remark of Arthur
as he caught a glimpse of the swollen stream as it foamed along
its way.
Yes! said the other, with a sort of hiccough, by which he
suppressed emotions which he did not venture to declare: Yes!
I reckon 'twon't be many hours afore it fills the `Coffin.'
If it keeps on at this rate, returned the other, one hour
will be enough to do that.
Only one, you think?
Yes! one will do!
Another hiccough of the Epileptic appropriately finished the
dialogue.
CHAPTER VI.
Leda
awakened from her deep sleep to find herself alone with
the child. She was startled and alarmed at the absence of her
husband; but as the child was leftthe great, and we may add,
the only, object for which she could have borne so muchshe
was satisfied. On assuring herself of the departure of Houston
from the cave, she would unhesitatingly have taken hers also
but the storm was now raging without, and, persuaded that her
husband had taken advantage of its violence to cross the barriers,
she gathered up the fragments of the last night's supper, and
was busy in giving her boy his little breakfast, when roused by
the voice of Arthur Holt. The story of the Epileptic was soon
toldas he had related it to Arthur. In this story, as there was
nothing improbable, both parties put implicit faith; and, cloaking
mother and child as well as he might, the young farmer bore
them through the close thicket to the place, some three hundred
yards without, where, on account of the denseness of the wood,
he had been compelled to leave the wagon. The horse of
Houston, the Big Bay, was next brought forth, but as Acker
could neither be persuaded to mount, or take him in charge, he
was restored to the covert until a better opportunity for removing
him. To the surprise of the young farmer, the Epileptic was
equally firm in refusing to go with him in the wagon. I don't
mind the rain, said he, it can't hurt me. He will get his
death, said Leda. Not he, replied Arthur, as Acker
scampered
through the woods; the water always helps him in his
fits. While the wagon took one course, he took another.
Little did they suspect his route. A terrible feeling carried him
back to Reedy Riverto a pitiless watch above that natural tomb
in which he had buried his living victim.
Meanwhile, what of Houston? When he recovered his
consciousness
,
the vault had been closed upon him; the flat mass,
once set in motion, had slid down the smooth edges of the
upright sides with uninterrupted progress, and now lay above
him, shutting out light almost equally with hope. But a faint
glimmering reached the interior of the cell, from a crevice on
one side, where, in consequence of some inequality of the edges,
the lid had not settled fairly down upon it. It was the side
opposite to that in which his fingers had been crushed, and
where the stone still maintained its hold upon the mutilated
member. He heard the whistling of the wind, the hoarse rush
of the waters, and the heavy fall of the rain without, and a
shuddering
sense of his true situation rushed instantly upon his soul.
For a moment he sank back, appalled, oppressed; but the
numbing pain of his injured hand and wrist, up to his elbow,
recalled him to the necessity of effort. Houston was a man of
strong will and great energies. Though at the first moment of
consciousness oppressed and overcome, the outlaw soon
recovered
himself. It was necessary that he should do something
for his extrication. The light shut out, if not entirely the air,
is one of those fearful facts to rouse a man in his situation and
of his character, to all his energies. But the very first
movement
was one to awaken him still more sensibly to his dangers.
Having arisen to grasp the sides of the vault, which, in the place
where he had laid his hand was fully five feet high, his position
when fixed there, was that of a man partially supended in the
air. His right hand could barely touch the floor of the chamber.
His left was utterly useless. In this position he could not even
exert the strength which he possessed; and, after an ineffectual
effort, he sank back again in momentary consternation. The
horror of that moment, passed in thought,the despair which it
occasionedwas the parent of new strength. He came to a
terrible decision. To avail himself of his right hand, it was
necessary that he should extricate the other. He had already
tried to do so, by a vain effort at lifting the massive lid of his
coffin. The heavy plate no longer vibrated upon a pivot. It
had sunk into a natural position, which each upright evenly
maintained. The hand was already lost to him. He resolved
that it should not render the other useless. With a firmness
which might well excite admiration, he drew the
couteau de
chasse
from his bosom, and deliberately smote off the mutilated
fingers at the joints; dividing the crushed partsbone and tendon,
from the uninjured,falling heavily back upon the stone floor
the moment the hand was freed. But this time he had not
fainted, though the operation tended to restore the hand, which
had been deadened by the pressure and pain of its position, to
something like sensibility. But such pain was now but slightly
felt; and, wrapping the hand up in his handkerchief, he prepared
with due courage for the difficult task before him. But the very
first effort almost convinced him of its hopelessness. In vain
did he apply the strength of his muscular arm, the force of his
broad shoulders, his sinewy and well-supported frame. Forced
to crouch in his narrow limits, it was not possible for him to
apply, to advantage, the strength which he really possessed; and,
from the extreme shallowness of his cell in the lower extremity,
he was unable to address his efforts to that part where the stone
was thinnest. At the upper part, where he
could
labour, the
mass was greatly thicker than the rest; and it was the weight
of this mass, rather than the strength of Acker,the momentum
once given it from above,that carried the plate along to the foot
of the plane. His exertions were increased as his strength
diminishedthe cold sweat poured from his brow,and, toiling
against convictionin the face of his increasing terrors,he at
length sunk back in exhaustion. From time to time, at brief
intervals, he renewed his toils, each time with new hope, each
time with a new scheme for more successful exertion. But the
result was, on each occasion, the same; and, yielding to despair,
he threw himself upon the bottom of his cell and called death to
his relief.
While thus prostrate, with his face pressed upon the chilling
pavement, he suddenly starts, almost to his feet, and a new terror
seizes upon his soul. He is made conscious of a new and
pressing danger. Is it the billows of the riverthe torrents
swollen above their boundsthat beat against the walls of his
dungeon? Is it the advancing waters that catch his eye
glimmering
faint at his feet, as they penetrate the lower crevice of
the coffin? A terrible shudder shook his frame! He cannot
doubt this new danger, and he who, a moment before, called
upon death to relieve him from his terrors, now shouts, under
worse terrors, at the prospect of his near approach in an
unexpected
shape. It is necessary that he should employ all his
strengththat he should make other and more desperate efforts.
He rises, almost erect. He applies both armsthe maimed as
well as the sound,almost unconscious of the difference, to the
lid of his tomb. Buried alive! he cries aloudBuried
alive! and at each cry, his sinewy arms shoot uphis broad
shoulders are raised:his utmost powers, concentrated upon the
one point, in the last effort of despair, must surely be successful.
His voice shouts with his straining sinews. He feels the mass
above him yielding. Once moreand once again,and still he
is encouraged. The lid vibrateshe could not be deceived,
but oh! how slightly. Another trialhe moves it as before,
but as his strength fails, his efforts relax,and it sinks down
heavily in its place. Breathless, he crouches in his cell. He
listens! Is it a footstep?It is a movement!the stones
fall about the roof of his narrow dwelling. A human agency
is above. Hurrah! he criesHurrah! Throw off the
stonecrush itcrush it! There is no time to be lost!
For a moment he fancies that the movement above is one
intended
for his relief. But what mean these rolling stones? A
new apprehension possesses him in the very moment of his
greatest hope. He rises. Once more he extends his arms, he
applies his shoulders; but he labours now in vain. His strength
is not lesshis efforts are not more feeblerin this than in
his former endeavours. He cannot doubt the terrible truth!
New stones have been piled above his head. He is doomed!
His utmost powers fail to move the mass from its place. His
human enemy is unrelenting. He cries to him in a voice of
equal inquiry and anguish.
Who is there? what enemy? who? Speak to me! who is
above me? Who? Who!
Can it be? He is answered by a chucklea fell, fiendish
laughthe most terrible sort of answer. Can it be that a
mortal would so laugh at such a moment? He tries to recall
those to whom he has given most occasion for vindictiveness and
hate. He names Arthur Holt! He is again answered by a
chuckle, and now he knows his enemy.
God of heaven! he exclaims, in the bitter anguish of his
discovery, and can it be that I am doomed to perish by this
most miserable of all my foes!
Once more he rushes against the mass above him, but this
time with his head alone. He sinks down stunned upon the
floor, and is aroused by the water around him. Inch by inch
it rises. He knows the character of the stream. It will be
above him, unless he is relieved, in less than an hour. The proud
and reckless outlaw is humbled. He condescends to entreat
the wretched creature to whom he owes his situation. He
implores
forgivenesshe promises reward. He begshe threatens
he execrates. He is answered by a chuckle as before; the
Epileptic sits upon his coffin-lid, and the doomed man can hear
his heels without, as they beat time with the winds and waters,
against the sides of his tomb. Meanwhile, the water presses in
upon himhe feels its advance around himit is now about his
kneesin another moment it is every where. It has gradually
ascended the planeit now spreads over the entire floor of his
dungeon. He grasps his pistols, which he had laid down beside
him, and applies their muzzles to his head. He is too late.
They are covered with water, and refuse fire. His knife is
no longer to be found. It had dropped from his right hand
when he smote off the fingers of the left, and had probably
rolled down the plane to the bottom, where, covered with water,
it is impossible to recover it. Hope within, and hope from
without, have failed him equally; and, except in prayer, there
is no refuge from the pang of death. But prayer is not easy to
him who has never believed in the efficacy of its virtues. How
can he pray to be forgiven, who has never been taught to
forgive
.
He tries to pray! The Epileptic without, as he stoops
his ear, can catch the fragmentary plea, the spasmodic
adjuration
,
the gasping, convulsive utterance, from a throat around
which the waters are already wreathing with close and
unrelaxing
grasp. Suddenly the voice ceasesthere is a hoarse
murmurthe struggle of the strong man among the waters,
which press through the crevices between the lid and the sides
of the dungeon. As the convulsion ceases, the Epileptic starts to
his feet, with a terror which he had not felt before; and, looking
wildly behind him as he ran, bounded up the sides of the
neighbouring
hills.
Thus ends our legend of the Giant's Coffin. Tradition does
not tell us of the farther fortunes of Leda Houston. Some pages
of the chronicle have dropped. It is very certain, however, that
Arthur Holt, like Benedick, lived to be a married man, and died
the father of several childrenthe descendants of some of whom
still live in the same region. Of the Coffin itself, some
fragments
,
and, it is thought, one of the sides, may be shown, but it
was blown up by the very freshet which we have described,
and the body of Houston drifted down to the opposite shore. It
was not till long after that Acker confessed the share which he
had in the manner of his death and burial.
SERGEANT BARNACLE,
OR THE RAFTSMAN OF THE EDISTO.
CHAPTER I.
Short be the shrift and sure the cord.
Scott
.
The
pretty little settlement of Orangeburg, in South Carolina,
was an old and flourishing establishment before the Revolution.
It was settled, as well as the contiguous country, by successive
troops of German Palatines, who brought with them all the sober
industry, and regular perseverance, characteristic of their
country
.
They carried the cultivation of indigo in Carolina to a
degree
of perfection, on which they prospered, thriving, without
much state, and growing great in wealth, without provoking the
attention
of their neighbours to the fact. To this day their
descendants
maintain some of these characteristics, and, in a time
of much cry and little wool, when it is no longer matter of
mortification
for a vain people to confess a want of money, they are
said to respond to the I O U, of their more needy
acquaintance
,
by knocking the head out of a flour barrel, and unveiling a
world of specie, which would renovate the credit of many a
mammoth bank. The good old people, their ancestors, were
thrifty in other respects; clean and comfortable in their houses;
raising abundance of pigs and poultry; rich in numerous
children
,
whom they reared up in good works and godliness, with
quite as much concern, to say no more, as they addressed to
worldly objects. They lived wellknew what surprising moral
benefits accure from a due attention to creature comforts; and,
if they spent little money upon foreign luxuries, it was only
because
they had learned to domesticate so many of their own.
Home, indeed, was emphatically their world, and they found a
world in it. Frank hospitality, and the simple sorts of
merriment
which delight, without impairing the unsophisticated nature,
were enjoyed among them in full perfection; and, from Four
Holes to Poplar Springs, they were emphatically one and the
same, and a very happy people.
Our present business lies in this region, at a period which we
may state in round numbers, as just five years before the
Revolution
.
The ferment of that event, as we all know, had even then
begunthe dispute and the debate, and the partial preparation
but the details and the angry feeling had been slow in reaching
our quiet farmers along the Upper Edisto. The people were not
good English scholars, preserving, as they did in many places,
the integrity of the unbroken German. Here and there, it had
suffered an English cross, and, in other places, particularly in the
village, the English began to assert the ascendancy. But of
newspapers they saw nothing, unless it were the venerable South
Carolina Gazette, which did little more than tell them of the
births, marriages and deaths in the royal family, and, at
melancholy
intervals, of the arrival in Charleston of some
broad-bottomed
lugger from Bremen, or other kindred ports in Faderland.
The events which furnished materials to the village publican and
politician, were of a sort not to extend their influence beyond
their own ten-mile horizon. Their world was very much around
them, and their most foreign thoughts and fancies still had a
savour of each man's stable-yard. They never interfered in the
slightest degree with the concerns of Russia or Constantinople, and
I verily believe that if they had happened to have heard that
the Great Mogul were on his last legs, and knew the secret of
his cure, they would have hesitated so long before advising him
of its nature, that the remedy would come too late to be of any
service. And this, understand me, not because of any lack of
Christian bowels, but simply because of a native modesty, which
made them reluctant to meddle with any matters which did not
obviously and immediately concern themselves. They were,
certainly, sadly deficient in that spirit of modern philanthropy
which seems disposed to meddle with nothing else. Their hopes
and fears, strifes and excitements, were all local. At worst a
village scandal, or farm-yard jealousya squabble between two
neighbours touching a boundary line, or cattle pound, which
ended
in an arbitration and a feast, in which cherry and domestic
grapeby no means the simple juice of eitherdid the duty of
peacemakers, and were thrice blessed accordingly. Sometimes
a more serious matterthe tall lad of one household would fail
to make the proper impression upon the laughing damsel of
another
,
and this would produce a temporary family estrangement,
until Time, that great consoler, would furnish to the injured
heart of the sufferer, that sovereignest of all emollients
indifference
!
Beyond such as these, which are of occurrence in the
best regulated and least sophisticated of all communities, there
were precious few troubles among our people of the North Edisto,
which they could not easily overcome.
But the affair which I am about to relate, was an exception to
the uniform harmlessness and simplicity of events among them,
and the better to make the reader understand it, I must take him
with me this pleasant October evening, to a snug farm-house in
the Forks of Edistoa part of the country thus distinguished, as
it lies in the crotch formed by the gradual approach of the two
branches of Edisto river, a few miles above the spot of their final
junction. Our farmer's name is Cole. He is not rich, but not
poorone of those substantial, comfortable men of the world,
who has just enough to know what to do with it, and just
little enough to fancy that if he could get more he should
know what to do with that also. His farm, consisting of five or
six hundred acres, is a competence, but a small part of which is
cleared and in cultivation. He has but two slaves, but he has
two strapping sons, one of twelve, the other of fourteen, who
work with the slaves, and upon whom, equally with them, he
bestows
the horse-whip when needed, with as bountiful a hand as
he bestows the hommony. But if he counts but precious little
of gold and silver among his treasures, he has some treasures
which, in those days of simplicity, were considered by many to
be much more precious than any gold or silver. Like Jephthah,
Judge of Israel, he has a daughternay, for that matter, he has
two of them, and one of them, the eldest, is to be married this
very evening. Philip Cole was no Judge of Israel, but he loved
his daughters not the less, and the whole country justified his
love. The eyes of the lads brightened, and their mouths
watered
at the bare mention of their names, and the sight of them
generally
produced such a commotion in the hearts of the
surrounding
swains, that, as I have heard averred a hundred times by
tradition, they could, on such occasions, scarcely keep their feet.
Keep their feet they could not, on such nights as the present,
when they were not only permitted to see the lasses, but to dance
it with them merrily. Dorothy Cole, the eldest, was as fine a
specimen
of feminine mortality, as ever blossomed in the eyes of
love; rather plumpish, but so well made, so complete, so brightly
eyed, and so rosily cheeked, that he must be a cold critic indeed,
who should stop to look for flawsto say, here something might
be pared off, and here something might be added. Such fine
women were never made for such foolish persons. But Margaret,
the younger, a girl of sixteen, was unexceptionable. She was
her sister in miniature. She was beautiful, and faultless in her
beauty, and so graceful, so playful, so pleasantly arch, and
tenderly
mischievousso delightful, in short, in all her ways, that
in looking upon her you ceased to remember that Eve had fallen
you still thought of her in Eden, the queen of its world of
flowers, as innocent and beautiful as the very last budding rose
amongst them. At all events, this was the opinion of every body
for ten miles round, from Frank Leichenstein, the foreign
gentleman
a
German on his travelsto Barnacle Sam, otherwise
Samuel Moore, a plain raftsman of the Edisto.
The occasion, though one of gaiety, which brought the
company
together, was also one of gloom. On this night the fair
Dorothy would cease to be a belle. All hopes, of all but one,
were cut off by her lately expressed preference for a farmer
from a neighbouring district, and the young men assembled to
witness nuptials which many of them looked on with envy and
regret. But they bore, as well as they might, with the
mortification
which they felt. Love does not often kill in modern
periods, and some little extra phlegm may be allowed to a
community
with an origin such as ours. The first ebullitions of
public
dissatisfaction had pretty well worn off before the night of the
wedding, and, if the beauty of the bride, when she stood up that
night to receive the fatal ring, served to reawaken the ancient
flame in the breasts of any present, its violence was duly
overcome
in the reflection that the event was now beyond recall, and
regrets utterly unavailing. The frolic which succeeded, the
good cheer, the uproar, and the presence of numerous other
damsels, all in their best, helped in no small degree to lessen the
discontent and displeasure of the disappointed. Besides, there
was the remaining sister, Margaret, a host in herself, and so gay,
and so good-natured, so ready to dance and sing, and so
successful
in the invention of new modes of passing time merrily, that,
before the bride disappeared for the night, she was half chagrined
to discover that nobodyunless her new-made husbandnow
looked to where she stood. Her sway was at an end with the
hopes of her host of lovers.
PART II. 5
CHAPTER II.
The
revels were kept up pretty late. What with the ceremony,
the supper, the dancing, and the sundry by-plays which are
common
to all such proceedings, time passed away without the
proper
consciousness of any of the parties. But all persons present
were not equally successful or equally happy. It was found,
after
a while, that though Margaret Cole smiled, and talked, and
played
,
and danced with every body, there was yet one young fellow
who got rather the largest share of her favours. What rendered
this discovery particularly distressing was the fact that he was a
stranger and a citizen. His name was Wilson Hurst, a genteel
looking youth, who had recently made his appearance in the
neighbourhood, and was engaged in the very respectable business
of a country store. He sold calicoes and ribbons, and combs,
and dimity, and the thousand other neat, nice matters, in which
the thoughts and affections of young damsels are supposed to be
quite too much interested. He was no hobnail, no coarse
unmannered
clown; but carried himself with an air of decided
ton,
as
if he knew his position, and was resolute to make it known to
all around him. His manner was calculated to offend the more
rustic of the assembly, who are always, in every country, rather
jealous of the citizen; and the high head which he carried, the
petty airs of fashion which he assumed, and his singular success
with the belle of the Forks, all combined to render the conceited
young fellow decidedly odious among the male part of the
assembly
.
A little knot of these might have been seen, toward the
small hours, in earnest discussion of this subject, while sitting in
the piazza they observed the movements of the unconscious pair,
through a half opened window. We will not listen at present to
their remarks, which we may take for granted were sufficiently
bitter; but turn with them to the entrance, where they have
discovered
a new arrival. This was a large man, seemingly rather
beyond the season of youth, who was now seen advancing up
the narrow avenue which led to the house.
It's Barnacle Sam! said one.
I reckon, was the reply of another.
It's he, by thunder! said a third, wonder what he'll say
to see Margaret and this city chap? He's just in time for it.
They're mighty close.
Reckon he'll bile up again. Jest be quiet now, till he comes.
From all this we may gather that the person approaching is an
admirer of the fair Margaret. His proximity prevented all
further
discussion of this delicate subject, and the speakers at once
surrounded the new comer.
Well, my lads, how goes it? demanded this person, in a
clear, manly accent, as he extended a hand to each. Not too
late, I reckon, for a fling on the floor; but I had to work hard for
it, I reckon. Left Charleston yesterday when the sun was on the
turn; but I swore I'd be in time for one dash with Margaret.
Reckon you've walked for nothing, then, said one with a
significant shake of the head to his fellows.
For nothing! and why do you think so?
Well, I don't know, but I reckon Margaret's better satisfied
to sit down jest now. She don't seem much inclined to foot it
with any of us.
That's strange for Margaret, said the new comer; but I'll
see how my chance stands, if so be the fiddle has a word to say
in my behalf. She aint sick, fellows?
Never was betterbut go in and try your luck.
To be sure I will. It'll be bad luck, indeed, when I set my
heart on a thing, and walk a matter of seventy miles after it, if I
couldn't get it then, and for no reason that I can see; so here
goes.
With these words, the speaker passed into the house, and was
soon seen by his companionswho now resumed their places by
the windowin conversation with the damsel. There was a
frank, manly something in the appearance, the face, carriage and
language of this fellow, that, in spite of a somewhat rude exterior
and coarse clothing, insensibly commanded one's respect. It was
very evident that those with whom he had spoken, had accorded
him theirsthat he was a favourite among themand indeed, we
may say, in this place, that he was a very general favourite. He
was generous and good natured, bold, yet inoffensive, and so
liberal that, though one of the most industrious fellows in the
world, and constantly busy, he had long since found that his
resources never enabled him to lay by a copper against a rainy
day. Add to these moral qualities, that he was really a fine
looking fellow, large and well made, with a deep florid complexion,
black hair, good forehead and fine teeth, and we shall wonder to
find that he was not entirely successful with the sex. That he
was not an economist, and was a little over the frontier line of
forty, were perhaps objections, and then he had a plain, direct
way of speaking out his mind, which was calculated, sometimes,
to disturb the equanimity of the very smoothest temper.
It was perceived by his companions that Margaret answered
him with some evident annoyance and embarrassment, while they
beheld, with increasing aversion, the supercilious air of the
stranger youth, the curl of his lips, the simpering, half-scornful
smile which they wore, while their comrade was urging his
claims to the hand of the capricious beauty. The application of
the worthy raftsmanfor such was the business of Barnacle Sam
proved unavailing. The maiden declined dancing, pleading
fatigue. The poor fellow said that he too was fatigued, tired
down, Miss Margaret, with a walk of seventy miles, only to have
the pleasure of dancing with you. The maiden was inexorable,
and he turned off to rejoin his companions. The immoderate
laughter in which Margaret and the stranger youth indulged,
immediately after Barnacle Sam's withdrawal, was assumed by
his companions to be at his expense. This was also the secret
feeling of the disappointed suitor, but the generous fellow
disclaimed
any such conviction, and, though mortified to the very
heart, he studiously said every thing in his power to excuse the
capricious girl to those around him. She had danced with several
of them, the hour was late, and her fatigue was natural enough.
But the malice of his comrades determined upon a test which
should invalidate all these pleas and excuses. The fiddle was
again put in requisition, and a Virginia reel was resolved upon.
Scarcely were the parties summoned to the floor, before Margaret
made her appearance as the partner of young Hurst. Poor
Barnacle
walked out into the woods, with his big heart ready to break.
It was generally understood that he was fond of Margaret, but
how
fond, nobody but himself could know. She, too, had been
supposed willing to encourage him, and, though by no means a
vain fellow, he was yet very strongly impressed with the belief
that he was quite as near to her affections as any man he knew.
His chagrin and disappointment may be imagined; but a lonely
walk in the woods enabled him to come back to the cottage, to
which he was drawn by a painful sort of fascination, with a face
somewhat calmed, and with feelings, which, if not subdued, were
kept in proper silence and subjection. He was a strong-souled
fellow, who had no small passions. He did not flare up and make
a fuss, as is the wont of a peevish nature, but the feeling and
the pain were the deeper in due proportion to the degree of
restraint which he put upon them. His return to the cottage was
the signal to his companions to renew their assaults upon his
temper
.
They found a singular satisfaction in making a hitherto
successful suitor partake of their own frequent mortifications.
But they did not confine their efforts to this single object. They
were anxious that Barnacle Sam should be brought to pluck a
quarrel with the stranger, whose conceited airs had so ruffled the
feathers of self-esteem in all of their crests. They dilated
accordingly
on all the real or supposed insolences of the new comer
his obvious triumphhis certain successand that unbearable
volley of merriment, which, in conjunction with Margaret Cole,
he had discharged at the retreating and baffled applicant for her
hand. Poor Barnacle bore with all these attempts with great
difficulty. He felt the force of their suggestions the more readily,
because the same thoughts and fancies had already been
traversing
his own brain. He was not insensible to the seeming
indignity
which the unbecoming mirth of the parties had betrayed on
his retiring from the field, and more than once a struggling devil
in his heart rose up to encourage and enforce the suggestions
made by his companions. But love was stronger in his soul than
hate, and served to keep down the suggestions of anger. He
truly loved the girl, and though he felt very much like trouncing the
presumptuous stranger, he subdued this inclination entirely on her
account.
No! no! my lads, said he, finally, Margaret's her own
mistress, and may do as she pleases. She's a good girl and
a kind one, and if her head's turned just now by this stranger,
let's give her time to get it back in the right place. She'll come
right, I reckon, before long. As for him, I see no fun in licking
him, for that's a thing to be done just as soon as said. If he
crosses me, it'll do thenbut so long as she seems to have a
liking
for him, so long I'll keep my hands off him, if so be he'll
let me.
Well, said one of his comrades, I never thought the time
would come when Barnacle Sam would take so much from any
man.
Oh hush! Peter Stahlen; you know I take nothing that I
don't choose to take. All that know me, know what I am, and
they'll all think rightly in the matter; and those that don't know
me may think just what they please. So good night, my lads.
I'll take another turn in the woods to freshen me.
CHAPTER III.
We
pass over much of the minor matter in this history. We
forbear the various details, the visitings and wanderings, the
doings
of the several parties, and the scandal which necessarily kept
all tongues busy for a season. The hope so confidently expressed
by Barnacle Sam, that the head of his beauty, which had been
turned by the stranger, would recover its former sensible position
after
certain days, did not promise to be soon realized. On the
contrary
,
every succeeding week seemed to bring the maiden and her
city lover more frequently together; to strengthen his assurance,
and increase his influence over her heart. All his leisure time
was consumed either at her dwelling or in rambles with her
alone, hither and thither, to the equal disquieting of maid and
bachelor.
They,
however, had eyes for nobody but one another
lived, as it were, only in each other's regards, and, after a
month of the busiest idleness in which he had ever been engaged,
Barnacle Sam, in very despair, resumed his labours on the river
by taking charge of a very large fleet of rafts. The previous
interval
had been spent in a sort of gentlemanly watch upon the heart
and proceedings of the fair Margaret. The result was such as to
put the
coup de grace
to all his own fond aspirations. But this effect
was not brought about but at great expense of pride and feeling.
His heart was sore and soured. His temper underwent a change.
He was moody and irritablekept aloof from his companions,
and discouraged and repulsed them when they approached him.
It was a mutual relief to them and himself when he launched upon
the river in his old vocation. But his vocation, like that of
Othello, was fairly gone. He performed his duties punctually,
carried his charge in safety to the city, and evinced, in its
management
,
quite as much skill and courage as before. But his
performances were now mechanicaltherefore carried on
doggedly
,
and with no portion of his former spirit. There was now
no catch of song, no famous shout or whistle, to be heard by the
farmer
on the bank, as the canoe or the raft of Barnacle Sam
rounded
the headlands. There was no more friendly chat with the
wayfarerno more kind, queer word, such as had made him the
favourite of all parties before. His eye was now avertedhis
countenance troubledhis words fewhis whole deportment, as
well as his nature, had undergone a change; and folks pointed
to the caprice of Margaret Cole as the true source of all his
misfortunes
.
It is, perhaps, her worst reproach that she seemed to
behold them with little concern or commiseration, and, exulting in
the consciousness of a new conquest over a person who seemed to
rate himself very much above his country neighbours, she suffered
herself to speak of the melancholy which had seized upon the
soul of her former lover with a degree of scorn and irreverence
which tended very much to wean from her the regard of the most
intimate and friendly among her own sex.
Months passed away in this manner, and but little of our
raftsman
was to be seen. Meanwhile, the manner of Wilson Hurst
became more assured and confident. In his deportment toward
Margaret Cole there was now something of a lordly
condescension
,
while, in hers, people were struck with a new expression of
timidity and dependence, amounting almost to suffering and grief.
Her face became pale, her eye restless and anxious, and her step
less buoyant. In her father's house she no longer seemed at
home. Her time, when not passed with her lover, was wasted
in the woods, and at her return the traces of tears were still to be
seen upon her cheeks. Suspicion grew active, scandal busied
herself, and the young women, her former associates, were the
first to declare themselves not satisfied with the existing condition
of things. Their interest in the case soon superseded their
charity;
For every wo a tear may claim,
Except an erring sister's shame.
Conferences ensued, discussions and declarations, and at length
the bruit reached the ears of her simple, unsuspecting parents.
The father was, when roused, a coarse and harsh old man.
Margaret
was his favourite, but it was Margaret in her glory, not
Margaret in her shame. His vanity was stung, and in the
interview
to which he summoned the unhappy girl, his anger, which
soon discovered sufficient cause of provocation, was totally
without
the restraints of policy or humanity.
A traditionary accountover which we confess there hangs
some doubtis given of the events that followed. There were
guests in the dwelling of the farmer, and the poor girl was
conducted
to a neighbouring outhouse, probably the barn. There,
amid the denunciations of the father, the reproaches of the
mother
,
and the sobs, tears and agonies of the victim, a full
acknowledgment
was extorted of her wretched state. But she preserved
one secret, which no violence could make her deliver. She
withheld the name of him to whom she owed all her misfortunes.
It is true, this name was not wanting to inform any to whom her
history was known, by whom the injury was done; but of all
certainty on this head, derived from her own confession, they
were wholly deprived. Sitting on the bare floor, in a state of
comparative stupor, which might have tended somewhat to blunt
and disarm the nicer sensibilities, she bore, in silence, the torrent
of bitter and brutal invective which followed her developments.
With a head drooping to the ground, eyes now tearless, hands
folded upon her lapself-abandoned, as it wereshe was suffered
to remain. Her parents left her and returned to the dwelling,
having closed the door, without locking it, behind them. What
were their plans may not be said; but, whatever they were, they
were defeated by the subsequent steps taken, in her desperation
of soul, by the deserted and dishonoured damsel.
CHAPTER IV.
We
still continue to report the tradition, though it does not
appear
that the subsequent statements of the affair were derived from
any acknowledged witness. It appears that, after the night had
set in, Margaret Cole fled from the barn in which she had been
left by her parents. She was seen, in this proceeding, by her
little
brother, a lad of eight years old. Catching him by the arm
as they met, she exclaimedOh, Billy, don't tell, don't tell, if
you love me! The child kept the secret until her flight was
known, and the alarm which it occasioned awakened his own
apprehensions
.
He described her as looking and speaking very
wildly; so much so as to frighten him. The hue and cry was
raised, but she was not found for several hours after, and then
but we must not anticipate.
It appearsand we still take up the legend without being able
to show the authoritiesit appears that, as soon as she could
hope for concealment, under cover of the night, she took her way
through unfrequented paths in the forest, running and walking,
toward the store of Wilson Hurst. This person, it appears, kept
his store on the road-side, some four miles from the village of
Orangeburg, the exact spot on which it stood being now only
conjectured
.
A shed-room, adjoining the store, he occupied as his
chamber. To this shed-room she came a little after midnight,
and tapping beneath the window, she aroused the inmate. He
rose, came to the window, and, without opening it, demanded who
was there. Her voice soon informed him, and the pleading,
pitiful
,
agonizing tones, broken and incoherent, told him all her
painful
story. She related the confession which she had made to her
parents, and implored him at once to take her in, and fulfil those
promises by which he had beguiled her to her ruin. The night
was a cold and cheerless one in Februaryher chattering teeth
appealed to his humanity, even if her condition had not invoked
his justice. Will it be believed that the wretch refused her?
He seemed to have been under the impression that she was
accompanied
by her friends, prepared to take advantage of his
confessions
;
and, under this persuasion, he denied her asseverations
told her she was madmocked at her pleadings, and finally
withdrew once more, as if to his couch and slumbers.
We may fancy what were the feelings of the unhappy woman.
It is not denied to imagination, however it may be to speech, to
conjecture the terrible despair, the mortal agony swelling in her
soul, as she listened to the cold-blooded and fiendish answer to
her poor heart's broken prayer for justice and commiseration.
What an icy shaft must have gone through her soul, to hearken
to such words of falsehood, mockery and scorn, from those lips
which had once pleaded in her ears with all the artful eloquence
of loveand how she must have cowered to the earth, as if the
mountains themselves were falling upon her as she heard his
retiring
footstepshe going to seek those slumbers which she has
never more to seek or find. That was deaththe worst death
the final death of the last hope in her doomed and desolated heart.
But one groan escaped herone gasping sighthe utterance, we
may suppose, of her last hope, as it surrendered up the ghost
and then, all was silence!
CHAPTER V.
That
one groan spoke more keenly to the conscience of the
miserable wretch within than did all her pleadings. The deep,
midnight silence which succeeded was conclusive of the despair
of the wretched girl. It not only said that she was alone,
abandoned
of all othersbut that she was abandoned by herself. The
very forbearance of the usual reproachesher entire submission
to her fatestung and goaded the base deceiver, by compelling
his own reflections, on his career and conduct, to supply the place
of hers. He was young, and, therefore, not entirely reckless.
He felt that he lacked manlinessthat courage which enables a
man to do right from feeling, even where, in matters of principle,
he does not appreciate the supremacy of virtue. Some miserable
fears that her friends might still be in lurking, and, as he could
not conjecture the desperation of a big heart, full of feeling,
bursting
with otherwise unutterable emotions, he flattered himself with
the feeble conclusion, that, disappointed in her attempts upon him,
the poor deluded victim had returned home as she came. Still,
his conscience did not suffer him to sleep. He had his doubts.
She might be still in the neighbourhoodshe might be swooning
under his window. He rose. We may not divine his intentions.
It may have beenand we hope so for the sake of man and
humanity
it
may have been that he rose repentant, and determined
to take the poor victim to his arms, and do all the justice to her
love and sufferings that it yet lay in his power to do. He went
to the window, and leant his ear down to listen. Nothing reached
him but the deep soughing of the wind through the branches, but
even this more than once startled him with such a resemblance
to human moaning that he shuddered at his place of watch. His
window was one of those unglazed openings in the wall, such as
are common in the humbler cottages of a country where the cold
is seldom of long duration, and where the hardy habits of the
people
render them comparatively careless of those agents of comfort
which would protect against it. It was closed, not very snugly,
by a single shutter, and fastened by a small iron hook within.
Gradually, as he became encouraged by the silence, he raised
this hook, and, still grasping it, suffered the window to expand so
as to enable him to take into his glance, little by little, the
prospect
before him. The moon was now rising above the trees, and
shedding a ghastly light upon the unshadowed places around.
The night was growing colder, and in the chill under which his
own frame shivered, he thought of poor Margaret and her
cheerless
walk that night. He looked down for her immediately
beneath
the window, but she was not there, and for a few moments
his eyes failed to discover any object beyond the ordinary shrubs
and trees. But as his vision became more and more accustomed
to the indistinct outlines and shadowy glimpses under which, in
that doubtful light, objects naturally presented themselves, he
shuddered to behold a whitish form gleaming fitfully, as if waving
in the wind, from a little clump of woods not forty yards from
the house. He recoiled, closed the window with trembling
hands, and got down upon his kneesbut it was to cower, not to
prayand he did not remain in this position for more than a
second
.
He then dressed himself, with hands that trembled too much
to allow him, without much delay, to perform this ordinary office.
Then he hurried into his shopopened the door, which he as
instantly
bolted again, then returned to his chamberhalf undressed
himself, as if again about to seek his bedresumed his garments,
re-opened the window, and gazed once more upon the indistinct
white outline which had inspired all his terrors. How long he
thus stood gazing, how many were his movements of incertitude,
what were his thoughts and what his purposes, may not be said
may scarcely be conjectured. It is very certain that every effort
which he made to go forth and examine more closely the object
of his sight and apprehensions, utterly failedyet a dreadful
fascination
bound him to the window. If he fled to the interior and
shut his eyes, it was only for a moment. He still returned to the
spot, and gazed, and gazed, until the awful ghost of the unhappy
girl spoke out audibly, to his ears, and filled his soul with the
most unmitigated horrors.
CHAPTER VI.
But
the sound of horses' feet, and hurrying voices, aroused him
to the exercise of his leading instinctthat of self-preservation.
His senses seemed to return to him instantly under the pressure of
merely human fears. He hurried to the opposite apartment, silently
unclosed the outer door, and stealing off under cover of the woods,
was soon shrouded from sight in their impenetrable shadows.
But the same fascination which had previously led him to the fatal
window, now conducted him into that part of the forest which
contained
the cruel spectacle by which his eyes had been fixed and
fastened. Here, himself concealed, crouching in the thicket, he
beheld the arrival of a motley crowdwhite and blackold Cole,
with all the neighbours whom he could collect around him and
gather in his progress. He saw them pass, without noticing, the
object of their search and his own attentionsurround his
dwelling
heard
them shout his name, and finally force their way into
the premises. Torches were seen to glare through the seams
and apertures of the house, and, at length, as if the examination
had been in vain, the party reappeared without. They gathered
in a group in front of the dwelling, and seemed to be in
consultation
.
While they were yet in debate, the hoofs of a single horse,
at full speed, were heard beating the frozen ground, and another
person was added to the party. It did not need the shout with
which this new comer was received by all, to announce to the
skulking fugitive that, in the tall, massive form that now alighted
among the rest, he beheld the noble fellow whose love had been
rejected by Margaret for his ownBarnacle Sam. It is
remarkable
that, up to this moment, a doubt of his own security had not
troubled the mind of Hurst; but, absorbed by the fearful
spectacle
which, though still unseen by the rest, was yet ever waving
before his own spell-bound eyes, he had foregone all farther
considerations
of his own safety. But the appearance of this man,
of whose character, by this time, he had full knowledge, had dis
pelled this confidence; and, with the instinct of hate and fear,
shuddering and looking back the while, he silently rose to his feet,
and stealing off with as much haste as a proper caution would
justify, he made his way to one of the landings on the river, where
he found a canoe, with which he put off to the opposite side. For
the present, we leave him to his own course and conscience, and
return to the group which we left behind us, and which, by this
time, has realized all the horrors natural to a full discovery of the
truth.
The poor girl was found suspended, as we have already in part
described, to the arm of a tree, but a little removed from the
dwelling
of her guilty lover, the swinging boughs of which had been
used commonly for fastening horses. A common handkerchief,
torn in two, and lengthened by the union of the parts, provided the
fatal means of death for the unhappy creature. Her mode of
procedure
had been otherwise quite as simple as successful. She had
mounted the stump of a tree which had been left as a horse-block,
and which enabled her to reach the bough over which the kerchief
was thrown. This adjusted, she swung from the stump, and passed
in a few momentswith what remorse, what agonies, what fears,
and what struggles, we will not sayfrom the vexing world of
time to the doubtful empire of eternity! We dare not condemn
the poor heart, so young, so feeble, so wronged, and, doubtless, so
distraught! Peace to her spirit!
It would be idle to attempt to describe the tumult, the wild
uproar
and storm of rage, which, among that friendly group,
seemed
for a season to make them even forgetful of their grief.
Their sorrow seemed swallowed up in fury. Barnacle Sam
was alone silent. His hand it was that took down the lifeless
body from the accursed treeupon his manly bosom it was borne.
He spoke but once on the occasion, in reply to those who proposed
to carry it to the house of the betrayer. No! not there! not
there! was all he said, in tones lowalmost whisperedyet so
distinctly heard, so deeply felt, that the noisy rage of those around
him was subdued to silence in the sterner grief which they
expressed
.
And while the noble fellow bore away the victim, with arms
as fond, and a solicitude as tender, as if the lifeless form could still
feel, and the cold defrauded heart could still respond to love, the
violent hands of the rest applied fire to the dwelling of the
seducer
,
and watched the consuming blaze with as much delight as
they would have felt had its proprietor been involved within its
flaming perils. Such, certainly, had he been found, would have
been the sudden, and perhaps deserved judgment to which their
hands would have consigned him. They searched the woods for
him, but in vain. They renewed the search for him by daylight,
and traced his footsteps to the river. The surrounding country
was aroused, but, prompted by his fears, and favoured by his
fortune
,
he had got so completely the start of his enemies that he
eluded all pursuit; and time, that dulls even the spirit of revenge,
at length served to lessen the interest of the event in the minds
of most of the survivors. Months went by, years followedthe
old man Cole and his wife sunk into the grave; hurried prematurely,
it was thought, by the dreadful history we have given; and of all
that group, assembled on the fatal night we have just described,
but one person seemed to keep its terrible aspect forever fresh
before
his eyesand that was Barnacle Sam.
He was a changed man. If the previous desertion and caprice
of the wretched Margaret, who had paid so heavy a penalty for
the girlish injustice which she had inflicted on his manly heart,
had made him morose and melancholy, her miserable fate
increased
this change in a far more surprising degree. He still, it is
true, continued the business of a raftsman, but, had it not been for
his known trustworthiness, his best friends and admirers would
have certainly ceased altogether to give him employment. He
was now the creature of a moodiness which they did not scruple
to pronounce madness. He disdained all sort of conference with
those about him, on ordinary concerns, and devoting himself to the
Bible, he drew from its mystic, and to him unfathomable,
resources
,
constant subjects of declamation and discussion. Its thousand
dark prophecies became unfolded to his mind. He denounced the
threatened wrath of undesignated ages as already at the door
called upon the people to fly, and shouted wildly in invocation of
the storm. Sometimes, these moods would disappear, and, at such
times, he would pass through the crowd with drooping head and
hands, the humbled and resigned victim to a sentence which
seemed
destined for his utter annihilation. The change in his
physical
nature had been equally great and sudden. His hair, though
long and massive, suddenly became white as snow; and though
his face still retained a partial fulness, there were long lines and
heavy seams upon his cheeks, which denoted a more than
common
struggle of the inner life with the cares, the doubts, and the
agonies of a troubled and vexing existence. After the lapse of a
year, the more violent paroxysms of his mood disappeared, and
gave place to a settled gloom, which was not less significant than
his former condition of an alienated mind. He was still devoted
to religionthat is to say, to that study of religious topics, which,
among ignorant or thoughtless people, is too apt to be mistaken
for religion. But it was not of its peace, its diffusing calm, its
holy promise, that he read and studied. His favourite themes
were to be found among the terrible judgments, the fierce
vengeances
,
the unexampled woes, inflicted, or predicted, in the
prophetic
books of the Old Testament. The language of the prophets,
when they denounced wrath, he made his own language; and
when his soul was roused with any one of these subjects, and
stimulated by surrounding events, he would look the Jeremiah that
he spokehis eyes glancing with the frenzy of a flaming spirit
his lips quivering with his deep emotionshis hands and arms
spread abroad, as if the phials of wrath were in them ready to be
emptiedhis foot advanced, as if he were then dispensing
judgment
his
white hair streaming to the wind, with that
meteor-likeness
which was once supposed to be prophetic of change,
perplexing monarchs. At other times, going down upon his
rafts, or sitting in the door of his little cabin, you would see him
with the Bible on his kneehis eyes lifted in abstraction, but his
mouth working, as if he then busied himself in calculation of those
wondrous problems, contained in the times and half times, the
elucidation of which, it is supposed, will give us the final limit
accorded to this exercise of our human toil in the works of the
devil.
PART II. 6
CHAPTER VII.
It
was while his mind was thus occupied, that the ferment of
colonial patriotism drew to a head. The Revolution was begun,
and the clamours of war and the rattle of arms resounded through
the land. Such an outbreak was the very event to accord with
the humours of our morbid raftsman. Gradually, his mind had
grasped the objects and nature of the issue, not as an event simply
calculated to work out the regeneration of a decaying and
impaired
government, but as a sort of purging process, the great
beginning
of the end, in fact, by which the whole world was to be again
made new. The exaggerated forms of rhetoric in which the
orators
of the time naturally spoke, and in which all stump orators are apt to speak, when liberty and the rights of man are the
themesand what themes, in their hands, do not swell into these?
happily chimed in with the chaotic fancies and confused thoughts
which filled the brain of Barnacle Sam. In conveying his rafts
to Charleston, he took every opportunity of hearing the great
orators
of that cityGadsden, Rutledge, Drayton and othersand
imbued with what he had heard, coupling it, in singular union,
with what he had readhe proceeded to propound to his
wondering
companions, along the road and river, the equally exciting
doctrines of patriotism and religion. In this way, to a certain
extent, he really proved an auxiliary of no mean importance to a
cause, to which, in Carolina, there was an opposition not less
serious
and determined, as it was based upon a natural and not
discreditable
principle. Instead now of avoiding the people, and of
dispensing his thoughts among them only when they chanced to
meet, Barnacle Sam now sought them out in their cabins.
Returning
from the city after the disposal of his rafts, his course
lay, on foot, a matter of seventy miles through the country. On
this route he loitered and lingered, went into by-places, and sought
in lonely nooks, and every bosky bower, from side to side,
the rustics of whom he either knew or heard. His own history,
by this time, was pretty well known throughout the country, and
he was generally received with open hands and that sympathy,
which was naturally educed wherever his misfortunes were
understood
.
His familiarity with the Bible, his exemplary life, his
habits of self-denial, his imposing manner, his known fearlessness
of heart; these were all so many credentials to the favour of a
simple and unsophisticated people. But we need dwell on this
head no longer. Enough, in this place, to say that, on the first
threat of the invader against the shores of Carolina, Barnacle
Sam leapt from his rafts, and arrayed himself with the regiment
of William Thompson, for the defence of Sullivan's Island. Of
his valour, when the day of trial came, as little need be said.
The important part which Thompson's riflemen had to play at the
eastern end of Sullivan's Island, while Moultrie was rending
with iron hail the British fleet in front, is recorded in another
history. That battle saved Carolina for two years, but, in the
interregnum
which followed, our worthy raftsman was not idle.
Sometimes on the river with his rafts, earning the penny which
was necessary to his wants, he was more frequently engaged in
stirring up the people of the humbler classes, by his own peculiar
modes of argument, rousing them to wrath, in order, as he
conclusively
showed from Holy Writ, that they might escape from
the wrath to come. This logic cost many a tory his life; and,
what with rafting, preaching and fighting, Barnacle Sam was as
busy a prophet as ever sallied forth with short scrip and heavy
sandal on the business of better people than himself.
During the same period of repose in Carolina from the
absolute
pressure of foreign war, and from the immediate presence
of the foreign enemy, the city of Charleston was doing a peculiar
and flourishing business. The British fleets covering all the
coast, from St. Augustine to Martha's Vineyard, all commerce by
sea was cut off, and a line of wagons from South, and through
North Carolina, to Virginia and Pennsylvania, enabled the
enterprising
merchants of Charleston to snap their fingers at the
blockading squadrons. The business carried on in this way,
though a tedious, was yet a thriving one; and it gave many a
grievous pang to patriotism, in the case of many a swelling
tradesman, when the final investment of the Southern States
compelled
its discontinuance. Many a Charleston tory owed his
defection
from principle, to this unhappy turn in the affairs of local
trade. It happened on one occasion, just before the British army
was ordered to the South, that General Huger, then in command
of a fine regiment of cavalry, somewhere near Lenud's Ferry on
the Santee, received intelligence which led him to suspect the
fidelity of a certain caravan of wagons which had left the city
some ten or twelve days before, and was then considerably
advanced
on the road to North Carolina. The intelligence which
caused this suspicion, was brought to him by no less a person
than our friend Barnacle Sam, who was just returning from one
of his ordinary trips down the Edisto. A detachment of twenty
men was immediately ordered to overtake the wagons and sift
them thoroughly, and under the guidance of Barnacle, the
detachment
immediately set off. The wagons, eleven in number,
were overhauled after three days' hard riding, and subjected to
as close a scrutiny as was thought necessary by the vigilant
officer
in command. But it did not appear that the intelligence
communicated by the raftsman received any confirmation. If
there were treasonable letters, they were concealed securely, or
seasonably destroyed by those to whom they were entrusted; and
the search being over, and night being at hand, the troops and
the persons of the caravan, in great mutual good humour, agreed
to encamp together for the night. Fires were kindled, the
wagons
wheeled about, the horses were haltered and fed, and all
things being arranged against surprise, the company broke up into
compact groups around the several fires for supper and for sleep.
The partisan and the wagoner squatted, foot to foot, in circles the
most equal and sociable, and the rice and bacon having been
washed down by copious draughts of rum and sugar, of which
commodities the Carolinas had a copious supply at the time of the
invasionnothing less could follow but the tale and the song,
the jest and the merry cackle, natural enough to hearty fellows,
under such circumstances of equal freedom and creature comfort.
As might be guessed from his character, as we have described it,
Barnacle Sam took no part in this sort of merriment. He mixed
with none of the several groups, but, with his back against a tree,
with crossed hands, and chin upon his breast, he lay soundly
wrapt in contemplation, chewing that cud of thought, founded
upon memory, which is supposed to be equally sweet and bitter.
In this position he lay, not mingling with any of the parties,
perhaps
unseen of any, and certainly not yielding himself in any
way to the influences which made them temporarily happy. He
was in a very lonely and far removed land of his own. He had
not supped, neither had he drank, neither had he thirsted, nor
hungered, while others indulged. It was one peculiarity of his
mental infirmities that he seemed, whenever greatly excited by
his own moods, to suffer from none of the animal wants of
nature
.
His position, however, was not removed from that of the
rest. Had his mind been less absorbed in its own thoughts
had he willed to hearhe might have been the possessor
of all the good jokes, the glees and every thoughtless or
merry word, which delighted those around him. He lay
between
two groups, a few feet only from one, in deep shadow,
which was only fitfully removed as some one of those around
the fire bent forward or writhed about, and thus suffered the
ruddy glare to glisten upon his drooping head or broad manly
bosom. One of these groupsand that nearest himwas
composed
entirely of young men. These had necessarily found each
other out, and, by a natural attraction, had got together in the
same circle. Removed from the restraints and presence of their
elders, and after the indulgence of frequent draughts from the
potent beverage, of which there was always a supply adequate to
the purposes of evil, their conversation soon became licentious;
and, from the irreverent jest, they soon gave way to the obscene
story. At length, as one step in vice, naturally and inevitably,unless promptly resistedimpels anotherthe thoughtless
reprobates
began to boast of their several experiences in sin. Each
strove to outdo his neighbour in the assertion of his prowess, and
while some would magnify the number of their achievements,
others would dilate in their details, and all, at the expense of poor,
dependent woman. It would be difficult to saynor is it
important
at
what particular moment, or from what particular
circumstance
,
Barnacle Sam was induced to give any attention to
what was going on. The key-note which opened in his own soul
all its dreadful remembrances of horror, was no doubt to be found
in some one word, some tone, of undefinable power and import,
which effectually commanded his continued attention, even though
it was yielded with loathing and against the stomach of his sense.
He listened with head no longer drooping, eyes no longer shut,
thought no longer in that far and foreign world of memory.
Memory, indeed, was beginning to recover and have a present
life and occupation. Barnacle Sam was listening to accents
which were not unfamiliar to his ear. He heard one of the
speakers, whose back was turned upon him, engaged in the narrative
of his own triumphs, and every syllable which he uttered was
the echo of a dreadful tale, too truly told already. The story
was not the samenot identical in all its particularswith that
of poor Margaret Cole; but it was her story. The name of the
victim was not givenand the incidents were so stated, that,
without altering the results, all those portions were altered which
might have placed the speaker in a particularly base or odious
position. He had conquered, he had denied his victim the only
remedy in his powerfor was he to confide in a virtue, which he
had been able to overcome?and she had perished by her own
hands. This was the substance of his story; but this was not
enough for the profligate, unless he could show how superior were
his arts of conquest, how lordly his sway, how indifferent his
love, to the misery which it could occasion; a loud and hearty
laugh followed, and, in the midst of the uproar, while every tongue
was conceding the palm of superiority to the narrator, and his
soul was swelling with the applause for which his wretched
vanity
had sacrificed decency and truth, a heavy hand was laid upon
his shoulder, and his eyes, turning round upon the intruder,
encountered
those of Barnacle Sam!
Well, what do you want? demanded the person addressed.
It was evident that he did not recognize the intruder. How could
he? His own mother could not have known the features of
Barnacle
Sam, so changed as he was, from what he had been, by wo
and misery.
You! I want you! You are wanted, come with me!
The other hesitated and trembled. The eye of the raftsman
was upon him. It was the eye of his masterthe eye of fate.
It was not in his power to resist it. It moved him whither it
would. He rose to his feet. He could not help but rise. He
was stationary for an instant, and the hand of Barnacle Sam
rested upon his wrist. The touch appeared to smite him to the
bone. He shuddered, and it was noted that his other arm was
extended, as if in appeal to the group from which he had risen.
Another look of his fate fixed him. He shrunk under the full,
fierce, compelling glance of the other. He shrunk, but went
forward in silence, while the hand of the latter was still slightly
pressed upon his wrist.
CHAPTER VIII.
Never
was mesmeric fascination more complete. The
raftsman
seemed to have full confidence in his powers of compulsion,
for he retained his grasp upon the wrist of the profligate, but a
single moment after they had gone from the company.
Come! Follow! said the conductor, when a few moments
more had elapsed, finding the other beginning to falter.
Where must I go? Who wants me? demanded the
criminal
,
with a feeble show of resolution.
Where must you gowho wants you; oh! man of little
faithdoes the soldier ask of the officer such a questiondoes
the sinner of his judge? of what use to ask, Wilson Hurst, when
the duty must be donewhen there is no excuse and no appeal.
Come!
Wilson Hurst! Who is it calls me by that name? I will
go no farther.
The raftsman who had turned to proceed, again paused, and
stooping, fixed his keen eyes upon those of the speaker so closely
that their mutual eyebrows must have met. The night was
star-lighted
,
and the glances from the eyes of Barnacle Sam flashed
upon the gaze of his subject, with a red energy like that of
Mars. Come! he said, even while he looked. Come,
miserable
man, the judgment is given, the day of favour is past, and
lo! the night comeththe night is here.
Oh, now I know you, now I know youBarnacle Sam!
exclaimed
Hurst, falling upon his knees. Have mercy upon me
have mercy upon me!
It is a good prayer, said the other, a good prayerthe
only prayer for a sinner, but do not address it to me. To the
Judge, man, to the Almighty Judge himself! Pray, pray! I will
give you time. Pour out your heart like water. Let it run upon
the thirsty ground. The contrite heart is blessed though it be
doomed. You cannot pray too muchyou cannot pray enough.
In the misery of the sinner is the mercy of the Judge.
And will you spare me? Will you let me go if I pray?
demanded the prostrate and wretched criminal with eagerness.
How can I? I, too, am a sinner. I am not the judge. I
am but the officer commanded to do the will of God. He has
spoken this command in mine ears by day and by night. He has
commanded me at all hours. I have sought for thee, Wilson
Hurst, for seven weary years along the Edisto, and the Congaree
and Santee, the Ashley, and other rivers. It has pleased God to
weary me with toil in this search, that I might the better
understand
how hard it is for the sinner to serve him as he should be
served! `For l thy God am a jealous God!' He knew how
little I could be trusted, and he forced me upon a longer search
and upon greater toils. I have wearied and I have prayed; I have
toiled and I have travelled; and it is now, at last, that I have seen
the expected sign, in a dream, even in a vision of the night. Oh,
Father Almighty, I rejoice, I bless thee, that thou hast seen fit to
bring my labours to a closethat I have at length found this
favour in thy sight. Weary have been my watches, long have
I prayed. I glad me that I have not watched and prayed vainly,
and that the hour of my deliverance is at hand. Wilson Hurst,
be speedy with thy prayers. It is not commanded that I shall
cut thee off suddenly and without a sign. Humble thyself with
speed, make thyself acceptable before the Redeemer of souls, for
thy hour is at hand.
What mean you? gasped the other
Judgment! Death! And, as he spoke, the raftsman looked
steadfastly to the tree overhead, and extended his arm as if to
grasp the branches. The thought which was in his mind was
immediately comprehended by the instinct of the guilty man. He
immediately turned to fly. The glimmering light from the fires
of the encampment could still be seen fitfully flaring through
the forest.
Whither would you go? demanded the raftsman, laying his
hand upon the shoulder of the victim. Do you hope to fly from
the wrath of God, Wilson Hurst? Foolish man, waste not the
moments which are precious. Busy thyself in prayer. Thou
canst not hope for escape. Know that God hath sent me against
thee, now, on this very expedition, after, as I have told thee, after
a weary toil in search of thee for a space of seven years. Thou
hast had all that time for repentance while I have been tasked
vainly to seek thee even for the same period of time. But late,
as I went out from the city, there met me one near Dorchester,
who bade me set forth in pursuit of the wagon-train for the north,
but I heeded not his words, and that night, in a vision, I was yet
farther commanded. In my weak mind and erring faith,
methought
I was to search among these wagons for a traitor to the
good cause of the colony. Little did I think to meet with thee,
Wilson Hurst. But when I heard thy own lips openly denounce
thy sins; when I heard thee boastful of thy cruel deed to her
who was the sweetest child that ever Satan robbed from God's
blessed vineyardthen did I see the purpose for which I was sent
then did I understand that my search was at an end, and that
the final judgment was gone forth against thee. Prepare thyself,
Wilson Hurst, for thy hour is at hand.
I will not. You are mad! I will fight, I will halloo to our
people, said the criminal, with more energetic accents and a
greater show of determination. The other replied with a coolness
which was equally singular and startling.
I have sometimes thought that I
was
mad; but now, that the
Lord hath so unexpectedly delivered thee into my hands, I know
that I am not. Thou may'st fight, and thou may'st halloo, but I
cannot think that these will help thee against the positive
commandment
of the Lord. Even the strength of a horse avails not
against him for the safety of those whom he hath condemned.
Prepare thee, then, Wilson Hurst, for thy hour is almost up.
He laid his hand upon the shoulder of the criminal as he spoke.
The latter, meanwhile, had drawn a large knife from his pocket,
and though Barnacle Sam had distinguished the movement and
suspected the object, he made no effort to defeat it.
Thou art armed, said he, releasing, as he spoke, his hold
upon the shoulder of Hurst. Now, shalt thou see how certainly
the Lord hath delivered thee into my hands, for I will not strive
against thee until thou hast striven. Use thy weapon upon me.
Lo! I stand unmoved before thee! Strike boldly and see what
thou shalt do, for I tell thee thou hast no hope. Thou art
doomed
,
and I am sent this hour to execute God's vengeance against
thee.
The wretch took the speaker at his word, struck with tolerable
boldness and force, twice, thrice upon the breast of the raftsman,
who stood utterly unmoved, and suffering no wound, no hurt of
any sort. The baffled criminal dropped his weapon, and
screamed
in feeble and husky accents for help. In his tremour and
timidity
,
he had, after drawing the knife from his pocket, utterly
forgotten to unclasp the blade. He had struck with the blunted
handle of the weapon, and the result which was due to so simple
and natural a cause, appeared to his cowardly soul and excited
imagination as miraculous. It was not less so to the mind of
Barnacle
Sam.
Did I not tell thee! Look here, Wilson Hurst, look on this,
and see how slight a thing in the hand of Providence may yield
defence against the deadly weapon. This is the handkerchief by
which poor Margaret Cole perished. It has been in my bosom
from the hour I took her body from the tree. It has guarded my
life against thy steel, though I kept it not for this. God has
commanded
me to use it in carrying out his judgment upon thee.
He slipt it over the neck of the criminal as he spoke these
words. The other, feebly struggling, sunk upon his knees. His
nerves had utterly failed him. The coward heart, still more
enfeebled
by the coward conscience, served completely to paralyze the
common instinct of self-defence. He had no strength, no
manhood
.
His muscles had no tension, and even the voice of
supplication
died away, in sounds of a faint and husky terror in his
throata half-stifled moan, a gurgling breathand
CHAPTER IX.
When
Barnacle Sam returned to the encampment he was
alone. He immediately sought the conductor of the wagons, and,
without apprising him of his object, led him to the place of final
conference between himself and Hurst. The miserable man was
found suspended to a tree, life utterly extinct, the body already stiff
and cold. The horror of the conductor almost deprived him of
utterance
.
Who has done this? he asked.
The hand of God, by the hand of his servant, which I am!
The judgment of Heaven is satisfied. The evil thing is removed
from among us, and we may now go on our way in peace. I
have brought thee hither that thou may'st see for thyself, and be
a witness to my work which is here ended. For seven weary
years have I striven in this object. Father, I thank thee, that at
the last thou hast been pleased to command that I should behold
it finished!
These latter words were spoken while he was upon his knees,
at the very feet of the hanging man. The conductor, availing
himself of the utter absorption in prayer of the other, stole away
to the encampment, half-apprehensive that he himself might be
made to taste of the same sharp judgment which had been
administered
to his companion. The encampment was soon roused,
and the wagoners hurried in high excitement to the scene. They
found Barnacle Sam still upon his knees. The sight of their
comrade suspended from the tree, enkindled all their anger. They
laid violent hands upon his executioner. He offered no resistance,
but showed no apprehension. To what lengths their fury would
have carried them may only be conjectured, but they had found
a rope, had fitted the noose, and in a few moments more they
would, in all probability, have run up the offender to the same
tree from which they had cut down his victim, when the timely
appearance of the troopers saved him from such a fate. The
esprit de corps
came in seasonably for his preservation. It was
in vain that the wagoners pointed to the suspended manin vain
that Barnacle Sam avowed his handiworkHe is one of us,
said the troopers; and the slightest movement of the others toward
hostility was resented with a handling so rough, as made it only
a becoming prudence to bear with their loss and abuses as they
best might. The wonder of all was, as they examined the body
of the victim, how it was possible for the executioner to effect his
purpose. Hurst was a man of middle size, rather stoutly built,
and in tolerably good case. He would have weighed about one
hundred and thirty. Barnacle Sam was of powerful frame and
great muscle, tall and stout, yet it seemed impossible, unless
endued
with superhuman strength, that, unaided, he could have
achieved his purpose; and some of the troopers charitably
surmised
that the wagoner had committed suicide; while the
wagoners
,
in turn, hurried to the conclusion that the executioner had
found assistance among the troopers. Both parties overlooked
the preternatural strength accruing, in such a case, from the
excited
moral and mental condition of the survivor. They were not
philosophers enough to see that, believing himself engaged upon
the work of God, the enthusiast was really in possession of
attributes
,
the work of a morbid imagination, which seemed almost to
justify his pretensions to a communion with the superior world.
Besides, they assumed a struggle on the part of the victim. They
did not conjecture the influence of that spell by which the
dominant
spirit had coerced the inferior, and made it docile as the
squirrel which the fascination of the snake brings to its very jaws,
in spite of all the instincts which teach it to know how fatal is the
enemy that lurks beneath the tree. The imbecile Hurst,
conscious
as it were of his fate, seems to have so accorded to the
commands of his superior, as to contribute, in some degree, to his
designs. At all events, the deed was done; and Barnacle Sam
never said that the task was a hard one.
It was reserved for an examination of the body to find a full
military justification for the executioner, and to silence the
clamours
of the wagoners. A screw bullet was found admirably folded
in the knot of his neck kerchief, which, it seems, was not
withdrawn
from his neck when the kerchief of Margaret Cole was
employed for a more deadly purpose. In this bullet was a note
in cypher, addressed to Clinton, at New York, describing the
actual
condition of Savannah, evidently from the hands of some one
in that quarter. In a few months after this period Savannah was
in possession of the British.
Barnacle Sam was tried for the murder of Hurst before a civil
tribunal, and acquitted on the score of insanity; a plea put in for
him, in his own spite, and greatly to his mortification. He
retired
from sight, for a space after this verdict, and remained quiet
until a necessity arose for greater activity on the part of the patriots
at home. It was then that he was found among the partisans,
always
bold and fearless, fighting and suffering manfully to the
close of the war.
It happened, on one occasion, that the somewhat celebrated
Judge Burke, of South Carolina, was dining with a pleasant party
at the village of Orangeburg. The judge was an Irish
gentleman
of curious humour, and many eccentricities. He had more
wit than genius, and quite as much courage as wisdom. The
bench, indeed, is understood to have been the reward of his
military
services during the Revolution, and his bulls in that situation
are even better remembered than his deeds in the other. But his
blunders were redeemed by his humour, and the bar overlooked
his mistakes in the enjoyment of his eccentricities. On the
present occasion the judge was in excellent mood, and his
companions
equally happy, if not equally humorous with himself.
The cloth had been removed, and the wine was in lively
circulation
,
when the servant announced a stranger, who was no other
than Barnacle Sam. Our ancient was known to the judge and
to several of the company. But they knew him rather as the
brave soldier, the successful scout, the trusty spy and courier,
than as the unsuccessful lover and the agent of God's judgment
against the wrong doer. His reception was kind; and the judge,
taking for granted that he came to get a certificate for bounty
lands, or a pension, or his seven years' pay, or something of that
sort, supposed that he should get rid of him by a prompt
compliance
with his application. No such thing. He had come to get
a reversal of that judgment of the court by which he had been
pronounced insane. His acquittal was not an object of his
concern
.
In bringing his present wish to the knowledge of the
judge he had perforce to tell his story. This task we have
already
sufficiently performed. It was found that, though by no
means obtrusive or earnest, the good fellow was firm in his
application
,
and the judge, in one of his best humours, saw no
difficulty
in obliging him.
Be plaised, gentlemen, said he, to fill your glasses. Our
revision of the judgment in the case of our excellent friend,
Sergeant
Barnacle, shall be no dry joke. Fill your glasses, and be
raisonably ripe for judgment. Sit down, Sergeant Barnacle, sit
down, and be plaised to take a drhap of the crathur, though you
leave no other crathur a drhap. It sames to me, gentlemen of
the jury, that our friend has been hardly dealt with. To be found
guilty of insanity for hanging a tory and a spya fellow actually
bearing despatches to the enemysames a most extraordinary
judgment; and it is still more extraordinary, let me tell you, that
a person should be suspected of any deficiency of sense who
should lay hands on a successful rival. I think this hanging a
rival out of the way an excellent expadient; and the only
mistake
which, it sames to me, our friend Sergeant Barnacle has
made, in this business, was in not having traed him sooner than
he did.
I sought him, may it please your honour, but the Lord did not
deliver him into my hands until his hour had come, was the
interruption
of Barnacle Sam.
Ah! I see! You would have hung him sooner if you could.
Gentlemen of the jury, our friend, the sergeant, has shown that
he would have hung him sooner if he could. The only ground,
then,
upon which, it sames to me, that his sanity could have been
suspected, is thus cleared up; and we are made to say that our
worthy friend was not deficient in that sagacity which counsels
us to execute the criminal before he is guilty, under the good old
rule that prevention is better than curethat it is better to hang
thirty rogues before they are proved so, rayther than to suffer one
good man to come to avil at their hands.
It is needless to say that the popular court duly concurred with
the judge's humorous reversal of the former decision; and
Barnacle
Sam went his way, perfectly satisfied as to the removal of
all stain from his sanity of mind.
THOSE OLD LUNES!
OR, WHICH IS THE MADMAN?
CHAPTER I.
I am but mad, NorthNorth-West: when the wind is southerly, I know
a hawk from a handsaw.
Hamlet
.
We
had spent a merry night of it. Our stars had paled their
not
ineffectual fires, only in the daylight; and while Dan Phbus
was yet rising, jocund on the misty mountain's top, I was busy
in adjusting my foot in the stirrup and mounting my good steed
Priam, to find my way by a close cut, and through narrow
Indian trails, to my lodgings in the little town of C.,on the very
borders of Mississippi. There were a dozen of us, all merry
larks, half mad with wine and laughter, and the ride of seven
miles proved a short one. In less than two hours, I was snugly
snoozing in my own sheets, and dreaming of the twin daughters
of old Hansford Owens.
Well might one dream of such precious damsels. Verily, they
seemed, all of a sudden, to have become a part of my existence.
They filled my thoughts, excited my imagination, and,if it be
not an impertinence to say any thing of the heart of a roving lad
of eighteen,then were they at the very bottom of mine.Both of
them, let me say,for they were twins, and were endowed with
equal rights by nature. I was not yet prepared to say what was
the difference, if any, between their claims. One was fair, the
other brown; one pensive, the other merry as the cricket of
Venus. Susannah was meek as became an Elder's daughter;
Emmeline so mischievous, that she might well have worried the
meekest of the saints in the calendar from his propriety and
position
.
I confess, though I thought constantly of Susannah, I
always
looked after Emmeline the first. She was the brunette
one of your flashing, sparkling, effervescing beauties,
perpetually
running over with exultationbrimfull of passionate fancies
that tripped, on tiptoe, half winged, through her thoughts. She
was a creature to make your blood bound in your bosom,to
take you entirely off your feet, and fancy, for the moment, that
your heels are quite as much entitled to dominion as your head.
Lovely too,brilliant, if not absolutely perfect in featuresshe
kept you always in a sort of sunlight. She sung well, talked
well, danced wellwas always in airseemed never herself to
lack repose, and, it must be confessed, seldom suffered it to any
body else. Her dancing was the crowning grace and glory. She
was no Taglioninot an EllslerI do not pretend that. But she
was a born
artiste
. Every motion was a study. Every look
was life. Her form subsided into the sweetest luxuriance of
attitude
,
and rose into motion with some such exquisite buoyancy,
as would become Venus issuing from the foam. Her very
affectations
were so naturally worn, that you at length looked for them
as essential to her charm. I confessbut no! Why should I
do any thing so foolish?
Susannah was a very different creature. She was a fair girl
rather pale, perhaps, when her features were in repose. She
had rich soft flaxen hair, and dark blue eyes. She looked rather
than spoke. Her words were few, her glances many. She was
not necessarily silent in silence. On the contrary, her very
silence
had frequently a significance, taken with her looks, that
needed no help from speech. She seemed to look through you at
a glance, yet there was a liquid sweetness in her gaze, that
disarmed
it of all annoyance. If Emmeline was the glory of the
sunlightSusannah was the sovereign of the shade. If the song
of the one filled you with exultation, that of the other awakened
all your tenderness. If Emmeline was the creature for the
dance,Susannah was the wooing, beguiling Egeria, who could
snatch you from yourself in the moments of respite and repose.
For my part, I felt that I could spend all my mornings with the
former, and all my evenings with the latter. Susannah with her
6
large, blue, tearful eyes, and few, murmuring and always gentle
accents, shone out upon me at nightfall, as that last star that
watches in the vault of night for the coming of the sapphire dawn.
So much for the damsels. And all these fancies, not to say
feelings, were the fruit of but three short days acquaintance with
their objects. But these were days when thoughts travel merrily
and fastwhen all that concerns the fancies and the affections,
are caught up in a moment, as if the mind were nothing but a
congeries of instincts, and the sensibilities, with a thousand
delicate
antenn, were ever on the grasp for prey.
Squire Owens was a planter of tolerable condition. He was a
widower, with these two lovely and lovable daughtersno more.
But, bless you! Mine was no calculating heart. Very far from
it. Neither the wealth of the father, nor the beauty of the girls,
had yet prompted me to think of marriage. Life was pleasant
enough as it was. Why burden it? Let well enough alone, say
I. I had no wish to be happier. A wife never entered my
thoughts. What might have come of being often with such
damsels
,
there's no telling; but just then, it was quite enough to
dance with Emmeline, and muse with Susannah, and
vive la
bagatelle!
I need say nothing more of my dreams, since the reader
sufficiently
knows the subject. I slept late that day, and only rose in
time for dinner, which, in that almost primitive region, took place
at 12 o'clock, M. I had no appetite. A herring and soda water
might have sufficed, but these were matters foreign to the manor.
I endured the day and headache together, as well as I could,
slept soundly that night, with now the most ravishing fancies of
Emmeline, and now the pleasantest dreams of Susannah, one or
other of whom still usurped the place of a bright particular star in
my most capacious fancy. Truth is, in those heydey days, my
innocent heart never saw any terrors in polygamy. I rose a new
man, refreshed and very eager for a start. I barely swallowed
breakfast when Priam was at the door. While I was about to
mount, with thoughts filled with the meek beauties of Susannah,
I was arrested by the approach of no less a person than Ephraim
Strong, the village blacksmith.
You're guine to ride, I see.
Yes.
To Squire Owens, I reckon.
Right.
Well, keep a sharp look out on the road, for there's news
come down that the famous Archy Dargan has broke Hamilton
gaol.
And who's Archy Dargan?
What! don't know Archy? Why, he's the madman that's
been shut up there, it's now guine on two years.
A madman, eh?
Yes, and a mighty sevagerous one at that. He's the
cunningest
white man going. Talks like a book, and knows how to
get out of a scrape,is jest as sensible as any man for a time,
but, sudden, he takes a start, like a shying horse, and before you
knows where you are, his heels are in your jaw. Once he blazes
out, it's knife or gun, hatchet or hickoryany thing he can lay
hands on. He's kill'd two men already, and cut another's throat
a'most to killing. He's an ugly chap to meet on the road, so look
out right and left.
What sort of man is he?
In looks?
Yes!
Well, I reckon, he's about your heft. He's young and tallish,
with a fair skin, brown hair, and a mighty quick keen blue eye,
that never looks steddily nowhere. Look sharp for him. The
sheriff with his `spose-you-come-and-take-us'is out after him,
but he's mighty cute to dodge, and had the start some twelve hours
afore they missed him.
CHAPTER II.
The
information thus received did not disquiet me. After the
momentary reflection that it might be awkward to meet a madman,
out of bounds, upon the highway, I quickly dismissed the matter
from my mind. I had no room for any but pleasant meditations.
The fair Susannah was now uppermost in my dreaming fancies,
and, reversing the grasp upon my whip, the ivory handle of which,
lined with an ounce or two of lead, seemed to me a sufficiently
effective weapon for the worst of dangers, I bade my friendly
blacksmith farewell, and dashed forward upon the high road. A
smart canter soon took me out of the settlement, and, once in the
woods, I recommended myself with all the happy facility of youth,
to its most pleasant and beguiling imaginings. I suppose I had
ridden a mile or morethe story of the bedlamite was gone
utterly from my thoughtwhen a sudden turn in the road showed
me a person, also mounted, and coming towards me at an easy
trot, some twenty-five or thirty yards distant. There was nothing
remarkable in his appearance. He was a plain farmer or
woodman
,
clothed in simple homespun, and riding a short heavy chunk
of an animal, that had just been taken from the plough. The
rider was a spare, long-legged person, probably thirty years or
thereabouts. He looked innocent enough, wearing that simple,
open-mouthed sort of countenance, the owner of which, we
assume, at a glance, will never set any neighbouring stream on
fire. He belonged evidently to a class as humble as he was
simple
,but
I had been brought up in a school which taught me that
the claims of poverty were quite as urgent upon courtesy as those
of wealth. Accordingly, as we neared each other, I prepared to
bestow upon him the usual civil recognition of the highway.
What is it Scott saysI am not sure that I quote him rightly
When men in distant forests meet,
They pass not as in peaceful street.
And, with the best of good humour, I rounded my lips into a smile,
and got ready my salutation. To account somewhat for its effect
when uttered, I must premise that my own personal appearance
at this time, was rather wild and impressive. My face was full
of laughter and my manners of buoyancy. My hair was very
long, and fell in masses upon my shoulder, unrestrained by the
cap which I habitually wore, and which, as I was riding under
heavy shade trees, was grasped in my hand along with my riding
whip. As the stranger drew nigh, the arm was extended, cap
and whip lifted in air, and with free, generous lungs, I shouted
good morning, my friend,how wags the world with you
to-day?
The effect of this address was prodigious. The fellow gave no
answer,not a word, not a syllablenot the slightest nod of the
head,
mais, tout au contraire
.
But for the dilating of his amazed
pupils, and the dropping of the lower jaw, his features might have
been chiselled out of stone. They wore an expression amounting
to consternation, and I could see that he caught up his bridle with
increased alertness, bent himself to the saddle, half drew up his
horse, and then, as if suddenly resolved, edged him off, as closely
as the woods would allow, to the opposite side of the road. The
undergrowth was too thick to allow of his going into the wood at
the spot where we encountered, or he certainly would have done
so. Somewhat surprised at this, I said something, I cannot now
recollect what, the effect of which was even more impressive upon
him than my former speech. The heads of our horses were
now nearly parallelthe road was an ordinary wagon track, say
twelve feet wideI could have brushed him with my cap as we
passed, and, waving it still aloft, he seemed to fancy that such
was my intention,for, inclining his whole body on the off side
of his nag, as the Cumanche does when his aim is to send an
arrow
at his enemy beneath his neckhis heels thrown back, though
spurless, were made to belabour with the most surprising rapidity,
the flanks of his drowsy animal. And, not without some effect.
The creature dashed first into a trot, then into a canter, and
finally into a gallop, which, as I was bound one way and he the
other, soon threw a considerable space between us.
The fellow's mad! was my reflection and speech, as,
wheeling
my horse half about, I could see him looking backward, and
driving his heels still into the sides of his reluctant hack. The
next moment gave me a solution of the matter. The simple
countryman had heard of the bedlamite from Hamilton jail. My
bare head, the long hair flying in the wind, my buoyancy of
manner, and the hearty, and, perhaps, novel form of salutation
with which I addressed him, had satisfied him that I was the
person
.
As the thought struck me, I resolved to play the game out,
and, with a restless love of levity which has been too frequently
my error, I put the whip over my horse's neck, and sent him
forward
in pursuit. My nag was a fine one, and very soon the space
was lessened between me and the chase. As he heard the
foot-falls
behind, the frightened fugitive redoubled his exertions. He
laid himself to it, his heels paddling in the sides of his donkey
with redoubled industry. And thus I kept him for a good mile,
until the first houses of the settlement grew visible in the
distance
.
I then once more turned upon the path to the Owens',
laughing merrily at the rare chase, and the undisguised
consternation
of the countryman. The story afforded ample merriment
to my fair friends Emmeline and Susannah. It was so
ridiculous
that one of my appearance should be taken for a madman.
The silly fellow deserved the scare. On these points we were
all perfectly agreed. That night we spent charmingly. The
company did not separate till near one o'clock. We had fun and
fiddles. I danced by turns with the twins, and more than once
with a Miss Gridley, a very pretty girl, who was present. Squire
Owens was in the best of humours, and, no ways loth, I was made
to stay all night.
CHAPTER III.
A new
day of delight dawned upon us with the next. Our
breakfast made a happy family picture, which I began to think it
would be cruel to interrupt. So snugly did I sit beside
Emmeline
,
and so sweetly did Susannah minister at the coffee urn, and
so patriarchally did the old man look around upon the circle,
that my meditations were all in favour of certain measures for
perpetuating the scene. The chief difficulty seemed to be, in the
way of a choice between the sisters.
How happy could one be with either,
Were t'other dear charmer away.
I turned now from one to the other, only to become more
bewildered
.
The lively glance and playful remark of Emmeline, her
love smiling visage, and buoyant, unpremeditative air, were
triumphant
always while I beheld them; but the pensive, earnest
look of Susannah, the mellow cadences of her tones, seemed
always
to sink into my soul, and were certainly remembered
longest
.
Present, Emmeline was irresistible; absent, I thought
chiefly of Susannah. Breakfast was fairly over before I came
to a decision. We adjourned to the parlour,and there, with
Emmeline at the piano, and Susannah with her Coleridge in hand
her favourite poetI was quite as much distracted as before.
The bravura of the one swept me completely off my feet. And
when I pleaded with the other to read me the touching poem of
Genevieveher low, subdued and exquisitely modulated
utterance
,
so touching, so true to the plaintive and seductive
sentiment
,
so harmonious even when broken, so thrilling even when
most checked and hushed, was quite as little to be withstood.
Like the ass betwixt two bundles of hay, my eyes wandered from
one to the other uncertain where to fix. And thus passed the
two first hours after breakfast.
The third brought an acquisition to our party. We heard the
trampling of horses' feet in the court below, and all hurried to the
windows, to see the new comer. We had but a glimpse of him
a tall, good-looking personage, about thirty years of age, with
great whiskers, and a huge military cloak. Squire Owens met
him in the reception room, and they remained some half hour or
three quarters together. It was evidently a business visit. The
girls were all agog to know what it was about, and I was
mortified
to think that Emmeline was now far less eager to interest me
than before. She now turned listlessly over the pages of her
music
book, or strummed upon the keys of her piano, with the air of
one whose thoughts were elsewhere. Susannah did not seem so
much disturbed,she still continued to draw my attention to the
more pleasing passages of the poet; but I could see, or I fancied,
that even she was somewhat curious as to the coming of the
stranger
.
Her eyes turned occasionally to the parlour door at the
slightest
approaching sound, and she sometimes looked in my face with
a vacant eye, when I was making some of my most favourable
points of conversation.
At length there was a stir within, a buzz and the scraping of
feet. The door was thrown open, and, ushered by the father, the
stranger made his appearance. His air was rather
distingu
.
His person was well made, tall and symmetrical. His face was
martial and expressive. His complexion was of a rich dark
brown; his eye was grey, large, and restlesshis hair thin, and
dishevelled. His carriage was very erect; his coat, which was
rather seedy, was close buttoned to his chin. His movements were
quick and impetuous, and seemed to obey the slightest sound,
whether of his own, or of the voices of others. He approached
the company with the manner of an old acquaintance; certainly,
with that of a man who had always been conversant with the best
society. His ease was unobtrusive,a polite deference
invariably
distinguishing his deportment whenever he had occasion to
address the ladies. Still, he spoke as one having authority.
There was a lordly something in his tones,an emphatic
assurance
in his gesture,that seemed to settle every question; and,
after a little while, I found that, hereafter, if I played on any
fiddle
at all, in that presence, it was certainly not to be the first.
Emmeline and Susannah had ears for me no longer. There was
a something of impatience in the manner of the former whenever
I spoke, as if I had only interrupted much pleasanter sounds;
and, even Susannah, the meek Susannah, put down her Coleridge
upon a stool, and seemed all attention, only for the imposing
stranger.
The effect upon the old man was scarcely less agreeable. Col.
Nelson,so was the stranger calledhad come to see about the
purchase of his upper mill-house tracta body of land containing
some four thousand acres, the sale of which was absolutely
necessary
to relieve him from certain incumbrances. From the
conversation which he had already had with his visitor, it
appeared
that the preliminaries would be of easy adjustment, and
Squire Owens was in the best of all possible humours. It was
nothing but Col. Nelson,Col. Nelson. The girls did not seem
to need this influence, though they evidently perceived it; and,
in the course of the first half hour after his introduction, I felt
myself rapidly becoming
de trop
. The stranger spoke in
passionate
bursts,at first in low tones,with halting, hesitating
manner
,
then, as if the idea were fairly grasped, he dilated into a
torrent
of utterance, his voice rising with his thought, until he
started
from his chair and confronted the listener. I cannot deny
that there was a richness in his language, a warmth and colour in
his thought, which fascinated while it startled me. It was only when
he had fairly ended that one began to ask what had been the
provocation
to so much warmth, and whether the thought to which we
had listened was legitimately the growth of previous suggestions.
But I was in no mood to listen to the stranger, or to analyze what
he said. I found my situation quite too mortifyinga mortification
which was not lessened, when I perceived that neither of the two
damsels said a word against my proposed departure. Had they
shown but the slightest solicitude, I might have been reconciled
to my temporary obscuration. But no! they suffered me to rise
and declare my purpose, and made no sign. A cold courtesy
from them, and a stately and polite bow from Col. Nelson,
acknowledged
my parting salutation, and Squire Owens attended
me to the threshold, and lingered with me till my horse was got
in readiness. As I dashed through the gateway, I could hear the
rich voice of Emmeline swelling exultingly with the tones of her
piano, and my fancy presented me with the images of Col.
Nelson
,
hanging over her on one hand, while the meek Susannah on
the other, was casting those oblique glances upon him which had
so frequently been addressed to me. Ah! pestilent jades, I
exclaimed in the bitterness of a boyish heart; this then is the
love of woman.
CHAPTER IV.
Chewing
such bitter cud as this, I had probably ridden a good
mile, when suddenly I heard the sound of human voices, and
looking up, discovered three men, mounted, and just in front of
me. They had hauled up, and were seemingly awaiting my
approach
.
A buzzing conversation was going on among them.
That's he! said one. Sure? was the question of another.
A whistle at my very side caused me to turn my head, and as I
did so, my horse was caught by the bridle, and I received a
severe
blow from a club above my ears, which brought me down,
almost unconscious, upon the ground. In an instant, two stout
fellows were upon me, and busy in the praiseworthy toil of roping
me, hands and feet, where I lay. Hurt, stung, and utterly
confounded
by the surprise, I was not prepared to suffer this indignity
with patience. I made manful struggle, and for a moment succeeded
shaking off both assailants. But another blow, taking effect upon
my temples, and dealt with no moderate appliance of hickory,
left me insensible. When I recovered consciousness, I found
myself
in a cart, my hands tied behind me, my head bandaged with
a red cotton handkerchief, and my breast and arms covered with
blood. A stout fellow rode beside me in the cart, while another
drove, and on each side of the vehicle trotted a man, well armed
with a double-barrelled gun.
What does all this mean? I demanded. Why am I here?
Why this assault? What do you mean to do with me?
Don't be obstropolous, said one of the men. We don't
mean to hurt you; only put you safe. We had to tap you on
the head a little, for your own good.
Indeed! I exclaimed, the feeling of that unhappy tapping
upon the head, making me only the sorer at every momentbut
will you tell me what this is for, and in what respect did my good
require that my head should be broken?
It might have been worse for you, where you was onbeknown,
replied the spokesman,but we knowd your situation, and
sarved you off easily. Be quiet now, and
What do you meanwhat is my situation?
Well, I reckon we know. Only you be quiet, or we'll have
to give you the skin.
And he held aloft a huge wagon whip as he spoke. I had
sufficient
proof already of the unscrupulousness with which my
companions acted, not to be very chary of giving them farther
provocation, and, in silent misgiving, I turned my head to the
opposite
side of the vehicle. The first glance in this quarter
revealed
to me the true history of my disaster, and furnished an
ample
solution of the whole mystery. Who should I behold but the
very fellow whom I had chased into town the day before. The
truth was now apparent. I had been captured as the stray
bed-lamite
from Hamilton jail. It was because of this that I had been
tapped on the headonly for my own good. As the
conjecture
flashed upon me, I could not avoid laughter, particularly as
I beheld the still doubtful and apprehensive visage of the man
beside
me. My laughter had a very annoying effect upon all
parties
.
It was a more fearful sign than my anger might have been.
The fellow whom I had scared, edged a little farther from the
cart, and the man who had played spokesman, and upon whom
the whole business seemed to have devolved, now shook his whip
againNone of that, my lad, said he, or I'll have to bruise
you again. Don't be obstroplous.
You've taken me up for a madman, have you? said I.
Well, I reckon you ought to know what you are. There's
no disputing it.
And this silly fellow has made you believe it?
Reckon!
You've made a great mistake.
Don't think it.
But you have: Only take me to C, and I'll prove it by
General Cocke, himself, or Squire Humphries, or any body in
the town.
No! no! my friend,that cock won't fight. We aint
misdoubting
at all, but you're the right man. You answer all the
descriptions, and Jake Sturgis here, has made his affidavy that
you chased him, neck and neck, as mad as any blind puppy in a
dry September, for an hour by sun yesterday. We don't want
no more proof.
And where do you mean to carry me? I enquired, with
all the coolness I was master of.
Well, we'll put you up in a pen we've got a small piece
from here; and when the sheriff comes, he'll take you back to
your old quarters at Hamilton jail, where I reckon they'll fix you
a little tighter than they had you before. We've sent after the
sheriff, and his `spose-you-come-and-take-us,' and I reckon they'll
be here about sun-down.
CHAPTER V.
Here
was a sitiation indeed. Burning with indignation, I
was yet sufficiently master of myself to see that any ebullition of
rage on my part, would only confirm the impressions which they
had received of my insanity. I said little therefore, and that
little
was confined to an attempt to explain the chase of yesterday,
which Jake Sturgis had made the subject of such a mischievous
affidavy. But as I could not do this without laughter, I
incurred
the danger of the whip. My laugh was ominous.Jake
edged off once more to the roadside; the man beside me, got his
bludgeon in readiness, and the potent wagon whip of the leader
of the party, was uplifted in threatening significance. Laughter
was clearly out of the question, and it naturally ceased on my
part, as I got in sight of the
pen
in which I was to be kept
secure
.
This structure is one well known to the less civilized
regions
of the country. It is a common place of safe keeping in
the absence of gaols and proper officers. It is called technically
a bull pen, and consists of huge logs, roughly put together,
crossing at right angles, forming a hollow square,the logs too
massy to be removed, and the structure too high to be climbed,
particularly if the prisoner should happen to be, like myself,
fairly
tied up hand and foot together. I relucted terribly at being
put into this place. I pleaded urgently, struggled fiercely, and
was thrust in neck and heels without remorse; and, in sheer
hopelessness
and vexation, I lay with my face prone to the earth, and
half buried among the leaves, weeping, I shame to confess it, the
bitter tears of impotence and mortification.
Meantime, the news of my capture went through the country;
not
my
capture, mark me, but that of the famous madman,
Archy Dargan, who had broke Hamilton jail. This was an
event, and visitors began to collect. My captors, who kept watch
on the outside of my den, had their hands full in answering
questions
.
Man, woman and child, Squire and ploughboy, and, finally,
dames and damsels, accumulated around me, and such a throng
of eyes as pierced the crevices of my log dungeon, to see the
strange monster by whom they were threatened, now disarmed of
his terrors, were,to use the language of one of my keepersa
power to calkilate. This was not the smallest part of my
annoyance
.
The logs were sufficiently far apart to suffer me to
see and to be seen, and I crouched closer to my rushes, and buried
my face more thoroughly than ever, if possible, to screen my
dishonoured
visage from their curious scrutiny. This conduct
mightily offended some of the visitors.
I can't see his face, said one.
Stir him with a long pole!and I was greatly in danger of
being treated as a surly bear, refusing to dance for his keeper;
since one of mine seemed very much disposed to gratify the
spectator
,
and had actually begun sharpening the end of a ten foot
hickory, for the purpose of pricking me into more sociableness.
He was prevented from carrying his generous design into effect
by the suggestion of one of his companions.
Better don't, Bosh; if ever he should git out agen, he'd put
his ear mark upon you.
Reckon you're right, was the reply of the other, as he laid
his rod out of sight.
Meanwhile, the people came and went, each departing visitor
sending others. A couple of hours might have elapsed leaving
me in this humiliating situation, chained to the stake, the beast of
a bear garden, with fifty greedy and still dissatisfied eyes upon me.
Of these, fully one fourth were of the tender gender; some pitied
me, some laughed, and all congratulated themselves that I was
safely laid by the heels, incapable of farther mischief. It was not
the most agreeable part of their remarks, to find that they all
universally
agreed that I was a most frightful looking object.
Whether
they saw my face or not, they all discovered that I glared
frightfully upon them, and I heard one or two of them ask in
under
tones, did you see his teethhow sharp! I gnashed them
with a vengeance all the while, you may be sure.
CHAPTER VI.
The
last and worst humiliation was yet to comethat which
put me for a long season out of humour with all human and
woman
nature. Conscious of an unusual degree of bustle without, I
was suddenly startled by sounds of a voice that had been once
pleasingly familiar. It was that of a female, a clear, soft,
transparent
sound, which, till this moment, had never been associated
in my thoughts with any thing but the most perfect of all mortal
melodies. It was now jangled harsh, like sweet bells out of
tune. The voice was that of Emmeline. Good heavens! I
exclaimed to myself`can she be here? In another instant, I
heard that of Susannahthe meek Susannah,she too was among
the curious to examine the features of the bedlamite, Archy
Dargan
.
Dear me, said Emmeline, is he in that place?
What a horrid place! said Susannah.
It's the very place for such a horrid creature, responded
Emmeline.
Can't he get out, papa? said Susannah. Isn't a mad
person
very strong?
Oh! don't frighten a body, Susannah, before we have had a
peep, cried Emmeline; I declare I'm afraid to lookdo, Col.
Nelson, peep first and see if there's no danger.
And there was the confounded Col. Nelson addressing his eyes
to my person, and assuring his fair companions, my Emmeline,
my Susannah, that there was no sort of danger,that I was
evidently
in one of my fits of apathy.
The paroxysm is off for the moment, ladies,and even if he
were violent, it is impossible that he should break through the
pen. He seems quite harmlessyou may look with safety.
Yes, he's mighty quiet now, Miss,said one of my keepers
encouragingly, but it's all owing to a close sight of my whip.
He was a-guine to be obstroplous more than once, when I shook
it over himhe's usen to it, I reckon. You can always tell when
the roaring fit is coming onfor he breaks out in such a dreadful
sort of laughing.
Ha! Ha!he laughs does heHa! Ha! such was the
somewhat wild interruption offered by Col. Nelson himself. If my
laugh produced such an effect upon my keeper, his had a very
disquieting
effect upon me. But, the instinctive conviction that
Emmeline and Susannah were now gazing upon me, prompted
me with a sort of fascination, to lift my head and look for them.
I saw their eyes quite distinctly. Bright treacheries! I could
distinguish between themand there were those of Col. Nelson
beside themthe three persons evidently in close propinquity.
What a dreadful looking creature! said Susannah.
Dreadful! said Emmeline, I see nothing so dreadful in
him. He seems tame enough. I'm sure, if that's a madman, I
don't see why people should be afraid of them.
Poor man, how bloody he is! said Susannah.
We had to tap him, Miss, a leetle upon the head, to bring him
quiet. He's tame and innocent now, but you should see him
when he's going to break out. Only just hear him when he
laughs.
I could not resist the temptation. The last remark of my
keeper
fell on my ears like a suggestion, and suddenly shooting up my
head, and glaring fiercely at the spectators, I gave them a yell of
laughter as terrible as I could possibly make it.
Ah! was the shriek of Susannah, as she dashed back from
the logs. Before the sounds had well ceased, they were echoed
from without, and in more fearful and natural style from the
practised
lungs of Col. Nelson. His yells following mine, were
enough to startle even me.
What! he cried, thrusting his fingers through the crevice,
you would come out, would you,you would try your strength
with mine. Let him out,let him out! I am ready for him,
breast to breast, man against man, tooth and nail, forever and
forever
.
You can laugh too, butHa! Ha! Ha!what do you say
to that? Shut up, shut up, and be ashamed of yourself. Ha!
Ha! Ha!
There was a sensation without. I could see that Emmeline
PART II. 8
recoiled from the side of her companion. He had thrown himself
into an attitude, had grappled the logs of my dungeon, and
exhibited a degree of strange emotion, which, to say the least,
took every body by surprise. My chief custodian was the first to
speak.
Don't be scared, Mr.there's no dangerhe can't get out.
But I say let him outlet him out. Look at him, ladies
look at him. You shall see what a madman isyou shall see
how I can manage him. Hark ye, fellow,out with him at once.
Give me your whipI know all about his treatment. You shall
see me work him. I'll manage him,I'll fight with him, and
laugh with him toohow we shall laughHa! Ha! Ha!
His horrible laughter,for it was horriblewas cut short by
an unexpected incident. He was knocked down as suddenly as
I had been, with a blow from behind, to the astonishment of all
around. The assailant was the sheriff of Hamilton jail, who had
just arrived and detected the fugitive, Archy Darganthe most
cunning of all bedlamites, as he afterwards assured me,in the
person of the handsome Col. Nelson.
I knew the scamp by his laughI heard it half a mile, said
the sheriff, as he planted himself upon the bosom of the prostrate
man, and proceeded to leash him in proper order. Here was a
concatenation accordingly.
Who hev' I got in the pen? was the sapient inquiry of my
captorthe fellow whose whip had been so potent over my
imagination
.
Who? Have you any body there? demanded the sheriff.
I reckon!We cocht a chap that Jake made affidavy was
the madman.
Let him out then, and beg the man's pardon. I'll answer for
Archy Dargan.
My appearance before the astonished damsels was gratifying to
neither of us. I was covered with mud and blood,and they
with confusion.
Oh! Mr., how could we think it was you, such a
fright as they've made you.
Such was Miss Emmeline's speech after her recovery.
Susannah's
was quite as characteristic.
I am so very sorry, Mr..
Spare your regrets, ladies, I muttered ungraciously, as I
leapt on my horse. I wish you a very pleasant morning.
Ha! Ha! Ha! yelled the bedlamite, writhing and bounding
in his leasha very pleasant morning.
The damsels took to their heels, and went off in one direction
quite as fast as I did in the other. Since that day, dear reader, I
have never suffered myself to scare a fool, or to fall in love with
a pair of twins; and if ever I marry, take my word for it, the
happy woman shall neither be a Susannah, nor an Emmeline.
THE LAZY CROW.
A STORY OF THE CORNFIELD.
CHAPTER I.
We
were on the Savannah river when the corn was coming
up; at the residence of one of those planters of the middle
country
,
the staid, sterling, old-time gentlemen of the last century,
the stock of which is so rapidly diminishing. The season was
advanced and beautiful; the flowers every where in odour, and
all things promised well for the crops of the planter. Hopes and
seed, however, set out in March and April, have a long time to
go before ripening, and when I congratulated Mr. Carrington on
the prospect before him, he would shake his head, and smile and
say, in a quizzical inquiring humour, wet or dry, cold or warm,
which shall it be? what season shall we have? Tell me that,
and I will hearken with more confidence to your congratulations.
We can do no more than plant the seed, scuffle with the grass,
say our prayers, and leave the rest to Him without whose
blessing
no labour can avail.
There is something more to be done, and of scarcely less
importance
it would seem, if I may judge from the movements of
Scipiokill or keep off the crows.
Mr. Carrington turned as I spoke these words; we had just left
the breakfast table, where we had enjoyed all the warm comforts
of hot rice-waffles, journey-cake, and glowing biscuit, not to
speak of hominy and hoe-cake, without paying that passing
acknowledgment
to dyspeptic dangers upon which modern physicians
so earnestly insist. Scipio, a sleek, well-fed negro, with a round,
good-humoured face, was busy in the corner of the apartment;
one hand employed in grasping a goodly fragment of bread,
half-concealed
in a similar slice of fried bacon, which he had just
received
from his young mistress;while the other carefully
selected
from the corner, one of half-a-dozen double-barrelled guns,
which he was about to raise to his shoulder, when my remark
turned the eye of his master upon him.
How now, Scipio, what are you going to shoot? was the
inquiry
of Mr. Carrington.
Crow, sa; dere's a dratted ugly crow dat's a-troubling me,
and my heart's set for kill 'um.
One only; why Scip, you're well off if you hav'n't a
hundred
.
Do they trouble you very much in the pine land field?
Dare's a plenty, sa; but dis one I guine kill, sa, he's wuss
more nor all de rest. You hab good load in bote barrel, mossa?
Yes, but small shot only. Draw the loads, Scip, and put in
some of the high duck; you'll find the bag in the closet. These
crows will hardly let you get nigh enough, Scipio, to do them any
mischief with small shot.
Ha! but I will trouble dis black rascal, you see, once I set
eye 'pon um. He's a cussed ugly nigger, and he a'n't feared.
I can git close 'nough, mossa.
The expression of Scipio's face, while uttering the brief
declaration
of war against the innumerable, and almost licensed
pirates
of the cornfield, or rather against one in particular, was
full of the direst hostility. His accents were not less marked by
malignity, and could not fail to command our attention.
Why, you seem angry about it, Scipio; this crow must be
one of the most impudent of his tribe, and a distinguished
character
.
I'll 'stinguish um, mossa,you'll see. Jist as you say, he's
a mos' impudent nigger. He no feared of me 't all. When I
stan' and look 'pon him, he stan' and look 'pon me. I tak' up
dirt and stick, and trow at um, but he no scare. When I chase
um, he fly dis way, he fly dat, but he nebber gone so far, but he
can turn round and cock he tail at me, jist when he see me 'top.
He's a mos' cussed sassy crow, as ebber walk in a cornfield.
But Scip, you surprise me. You don't mean to say that it is
one crow in particular that annoys you in this manner.
De same one ebbery day, mossa; de same one; was the reply.
How long has this been?
Mos' a week now, massa; ebber sence las' Friday.
Indeed! but what makes you think this troublesome crow
always
the same one, Scipio? Do you think the crows never
change their spies?
Enty, I know um, mossa; dis da same crow been trouble me,
ebber since las' Friday. He's a crow by hese'f, mossa. I
nebber see him wid t'oder crows he no hab complexion ob t'oder
crow, yet he's crow, all de same.
Is he not black like all his tribe?
Yes, he black, but he ain't black like de t'oder ones. Dere's
someting like a grey dirt 'pon he wing. He's black, but he no
pot blackno jet;he hab dirt, I tell you, mossa, on he wing,
jis' by de skirt ob he jacketjis yer; and he lifted the lappel
of his master's coat as he concluded his description of the bird
that troubled him.
A strange sort of crow indeed, Scipio, if he answers your
description. Should you kill him, be sure and bring him to me.
I can scarcely think him a crow.
How, no crow, mossa? Enty, I know crow good as any
body! He's a crow, mossa,a dirty, black nigger ob a crow,
and I'll shoot um t'rough he head, sure as a gun. He trouble
me too much; look hard 'pon me as ef you bin gib um wages
for obersee. Nobody ax um for watch me, see wha' I do!
Who mak' him obersheer?
A useful crow, Scipio; and now I think of it, it might be just
as well that you shouldn't shoot him. If he does such good
service
in the cornfield as to see that you all do your work, I'll
make him my overseer in my absence!
This speech almost astounded the negro. He dropped the butt
of the gun upon the floor, suffered the muzzle to rest in the
hollow
of his arm, and thus boldly expostulated with his master
against so strange a decision.
No shoot um, mossa; no shoot crow dat's a-troubling you.
Dickens, mossa, dat's too foolish now, I mus' tell you; and
to tell you de blessed trut', ef you don't shoot dis lazy crow
I tell you ob, or le' me shoot 'um, one or t'oder, den you
mus' take Scip out ob de cornfiel', and put 'noder nigger in
he place. I can't work wid dat ugly ting, looking at me so
sassy. When I turn, he turn; if I go to dis hand, why, he's
dere; if I change 'bout, and go t'oder hand, dere's de
critter
,
jis de same. He nebber git out ob de way, 'till I run at um
wid stick.
Well, well, Scipio, kill your crow, but be sure and bring him
in when you do so. You may go now.
I hab um to-night for you, mossa, ef God spare me. Look
ya, young missis, you hab any coffee lef' in de pot; I tanks
you.
Jane Carrington,a gentle and lovely girl of seventeenwho
did the honours of the table, supplied Scipio's wants, and leaving
him to the enjoyment of his mug of coffee, Mr. C. and myself
walked forth into the plantation.
The little dialogue just narrated had almost entirely passed out
of my mind, when, at evening, returning from his labours in the
cornfield, who should make his appearance but Scipio. He came
to place the gun in the corner from which he had taken it; but
he brought with him no trophies of victory. He had failed to
scalp his crow. The inquiry of his master as to his failure,
drew my attention to the negro, who had simply placed the
weapon
in the rest, and was about to retire, with a countenance, as
I thought, rather sullen and dissatisfied, and a hang-dog,
sneaking
manner, as if anxious to escape observation. He had
utterly
lost that air of confidence which he had worn in the
morning
.
What, Scipio! no crow? demanded his master.
I no shoot, sa, replied the negro, moving off as he spoke,
as if willing that the examination should rest there. But Mr.
Carrington, who was something of a quiz, and saw that the poor
fellow laboured under a feeling of mortified self-conceit, was not
unwilling to worry him a little further.
Ah, Scip, I always thought you a poor shot, in spite of your
bragging; now I'm sure of it. A crow comes and stares you
out of countenance, walks round you, and scarcely flies when
you pelt him, and yet, when the gun is in your hands, you do
nothing. How's that?
I tell you, mossa, I no bin shoot. Ef I bin shoot, I bin hurt
um in he head for true; but dere' no use for shoot, tel you can
get shot, enty? Wha' for trow 'way de shot?you buy 'em,
he cos' you money; well, you hab money for trow 'way?
No! Wha' denScip's a big rascal for true, ef he trow 'way
you money. Dat's trow 'way you money, wha's trow 'way you
shot,wha's trow you corn, you peas, you fodder, you hog-meat,
you chickens and eggs. Scip nebber trow 'way you property,
mossa; nobody nebber say sich ting.
Cunning dognobody accuses you, Scipio. I believe you to
be as honest as the rest, Scipio, but haven't you been throwing
away time; haven't you been poking about after this crow to the
neglect of your duty. Come, in plain language, did you get
through your task to-day?
Task done, mossa; I finish um by tree 'clock.
Well, what did you do with the rest of your time? Have
you been at your own garden, Scipio?
No, sa; I no touch de garden.
Why not? what employed you from three o'clock?
Dis same crow, mossa; I tell you, mossa, 'tis dis same dirty
nigger ob a crow I bin looking arter, ebber since I git over de
task. He's a ting da's too sassy and aggrabates me berry much.
I follow um tel de sun shut he eye, and nebber can git shot. Ef
I bin git shot, I nebber miss um, mossa, I tell you.
But why did you not get a shot? You must have bungled
monstrously, Scipio, not to succeed in getting a shot at a bird that
is always about you. Does he bother you less than he did
before
,
now that you have the gun?
I spec' he mus' know, mossa, da's de reason; but he bodder
me jis' de same. He nebber leff me all day I bin in de
cornfield
,
but he nebber come so close for be shoot. He say to he sef,
dat gun good at sixty yard, in Scip hand; I stan' sixty, I stan'
a hundred; ef he shoot so far, I laugh at 'em. Da's wha' he say.
Well, even at seventy or eighty yards, you should have tried
him, Scipio. The gun that tells at sixty, will be very apt to tell
at seventy or eighty yards, if the nerves be good that hold it,
and the eye close. Try him even at a hundred, Scipio, rather
than lose your crow; but put in your biggest shot.
CHAPTER II.
The
conference ended with this counsel of the master. The
fellow promised to obey, and the next morning he sallied forth
with the gun as before. By this time, both Mr. Carrington and
myself had begun to take some interest in the issue thus tacitly
made up between the field negro and his annoying visiter. The
anxiety which the former manifested, to destroy, in particular,
one of a tribe, of which the corn-planter has an aversion so
great as to prompt the frequent desire of the Roman tyrant
touching
his enemies, and make him wish that they had but one neck
that a single blow might despatch themwas no less ridiculous
than strange; and we both fell to our fancies to account for an
hostility, which could not certainly be accounted for by any
ordinary
anxiety of the good planter on such an occasion. It was
evident to both of us that the imagination of Scipio was not
inactive
in the strife, and, knowing how exceeding superstitious the
negroes generally are, (and indeed, all inferior people,) after
canvassing
the subject in various lights, without coming to any
rational
solution, we concluded that the difficulty arose from some
grotesque fear or fancy, with which the fellow had been inspired,
probably by some other negro, on a circumstance as casual as
any one of the thousand by which the Roman augur divined, and
the soothsayer gave forth his oracular responses. Scipio had
good authority for attaching no small importance to the flight or
stoppage of a bird; and, with this grave justification of his
troubles
,
we resolved to let the matter rest till we could join the
negro in the cornfield, and look for ourselves into the condition of
the rival parties.
This we did that very morning. 'Possum Place,for such
had been the whimsical name conferred upon his estate by the
proprietor, in reference to the vast numbers of the little animal,
nightly found upon it, the opossum, the meat of which a sagacious
negro will always prefer to that of a pig,lay upon the Santee
swamp, and consisted pretty evenly of reclaimed swamp-land, in
which he raised his cotton, and fine high pine-land hammock, on
which he made his corn. To one of the fields of the latter we
made our way about mid-day, and were happy to find Scipio in
actual controversy with the crow that troubled him.
Controversy
is scarce the word, but I can find no fitter at this moment.
The parties were some hundred yards asunder. The negro was
busy with his hoe, and the gun leaned conveniently at hand on a
contiguous and charred pine stump, one of a thousand that dotted
the entire surface of the spacious field in which he laboured.
The crow leisurely passed to and fro along the alleys, now lost
among the little hollows and hillocks, and now emerging into sight,
sometimes at a less, sometimes at a greater distance, but always
with a deportment of the most lord-like indifference to the
world around him. His gait was certainly as stately and as lazy
as that of a Castilian the third remove from a king and the tenth
from a shirt. We could discover in him no other singularity but
this marked audacity; and both Mr. Carrington's eyes and mine
were stretched beyond their orbits, but in vain, to discover that
speck of gray dirt upon he wing, which Scipio had been very
careful to describe with the particularity of one who felt that the
duty would devolve on him to brush the jacket of the intruder.
We learned from the negro that his sooty visiter had come alone
as usual,for though there might have been a sprinkling of some
fifty crows here and there about the field, we could not perceive
that any of them had approached to any more familiarity with
the one that annoyed him, than with himself. He had been able
to get no shot as yet, though he did not despair of better fortune
through the day; and, in order to the better assurance of his
hopes, the poor fellow had borne what he seemed to consider the
taunting swagger of the crow all around him, without so much
as lifting weapon, or making a single step towards him.
Give me your gun, said Mr. Carrington. If he walks no
faster than now, I'll give him greater weight to carry.
But the lazy crow treated the white man with a degree of
deference
that made the negro stare. He made off at full speed
with the first movement towards him, and disappeared from sight
in a few seconds. We lost him seemingly among the willows
and fern of a little bay that lay a few hundred yards beyond us.
What think you of that, Scip? demanded the master. I've
done more with a single motion than you've done for days, with
all your poking and pelting. He'll hardly trouble you in a hurry
again, though, if he does, you know well enough now, how to get
rid of him.
The negro's face brightened for an instant, but suddenly
changed, while he replied,
Ah, mossa, when you back turn, he will come 'genhe dah
watch you now.
Sure enough,we had not proceeded a hundred yards, before
the calls of Scipio drew our attention to the scene we had left.
The bedevilled negro had his hand uplifted with something of an
air of horror, while a finger guided us to the spot where the lazy
crow was taking his rounds, almost in the very place from whence
the hostile advance of Mr. Carrington had driven him; and with
a listless, lounging strut of aristocratic composure, that provoked
our wonder quite as much as the negro's indignation.
Let us see it out, said Mr. C., returning to the scene of
action. At him, Scipio; take your gun and do your best.
But this did not seem necessary. Our return had the effect of
sending the sooty intruder to a distance, and, after lingering some
time to see if he would reappear while we were present, but
without
success, we concluded to retire from the ground. At night,
we gathered from the poor negro that our departure was the
signal
for the crow's return. He walked the course with impunity,
though Scipio pursued him several times, and towards the close
of day, in utter desperation, gave him both barrels, not only
without fracturing a feather, but actually, according to Scip's
story, without occasioning in him the slightest discomposure or
alarm. He merely changed his place at each onset, doubled on
his own ground, made a brief circuit, and back again to the old
station, looking as impudently, and walking along as lazily as
ever.
CHAPTER III.
Some
days passed by and I saw nothing of Scipio. It appears,
however, that his singular conflict with the lazy crow was
carried
on with as much pertinacity on the one side, and as little
patience
on the other, as before. Still, daily, did he provide himself
with the weapon and munitions of war, making as much fuss in
loading it, and putting in shot as large as if he purposed warfare
on some of the more imposing occupants of the forest, rather than
a simple bird, so innocent in all respects except the single one
of corn-stealing, as the crow. A fact, of which we obtained
possession some time after, and from the other negroes,
enlightened
us somewhat on the subject of Scipio's own faith as to the true
character of his enemy. In loading his gun, he counted out his
shot, being careful to get an odd number. In using big buck he
numbered two sevens for a load; the small buck, three; and
seven times seven duck shot, when he used the latter, were
counted out as a charge, with the studious nicety of the jeweller
at his pearls and diamonds. Then followed the mystic process of
depositing the load within the tube, from which it was to issue
forth in death and devastation. His face was turned from the
sunlight; the blaze was not suffered to rest upon the bore or
barrel
;
and when the weapon was charged, it was carried into the
field only on his left shoulder. In spite of all these preparations,
the lazy crow came and went as before. He betrayed no change
of demeanour; he showed no more consciousness of danger; he
submitted to pursuit quietly, never seeming to hurry himself in
escaping, and was quite as close an overseer of Scipio's conduct,
as he had shown himself from the first. Not a day passed that
the negro failed to shoot at him; always, however, by his own
account, at disadvantage, and never, it appears, with any success.
The consequence of all this was, that Scipio fell sick. What
with the constant annoyance of the thing, and a too excitable
imagination, Scipio, a stout fellow nearly six feet high, and half
as many broad, laid himself at length in his cabin, at the end of
the week, and was placed on the sick-list accordingly. But as a
negro will never take physic if he can help it, however ready he
may be to complain, it was not till Sunday afternoon, that Jane
Carrington, taking her customary stroll on that day to the negro
quarters, ascertained the fact. She at once apprised her father,
who was something of a physician, (as every planter should be,)
and who immediately proceeded to visit the invalid. He found
him without any of the customary signs of sickness. His pulse
was low and feeble, rather than full or fast; his tongue tolerably
clean; his skin not unpleasant, and, in all ordinary respects
Scipio would have been pronounced in very good condition for his
daily task, and his hog and hominy. But he was an honest
fellow
,
and the master well knew that there was no negro-on his
plantation so little given to playing 'possum, as Scipio. He
complained of being very unwell, though he found it difficult to
designate his annoyances, and say where or in what respect his
ailing
lay. Questions only confused and seemed to vex him, and,
though really skilful in the cure of such complaints as ordinarily
occur on a plantation, Mr. Carrington, in the case before him,
was really at a loss. The only feature of Scipio's disease that
was apparent, was a full and raised expression of the eye, that
seemed to swell out whenever he spoke, or when he was required
to direct his attention to any object, or answer to any specific
inquiry
.
The more the master observed him, the more difficult it
became to utter an opinion, and he was finally compelled to leave
him for the night, without medicine, judging it wiser to let
nature
take the subject in hand until he could properly determine
in what respect he suffered. But the morrow brought no
alleviation
of Scipio's sufferings. He was still sick as before
incapable
of work,indeed, as he alleged, unable to leave his bed,
though his pulse was a little exaggerated from the night previous,
and exhibited only that degree of energy and fulness, which
might be supposed natural to one moved by sudden physical
excitement
.
His master half-suspected him of shamming, but the
lugubrious expression of the fellow's face, could scarcely be
assumed
for any purpose, and was to all eyes as natural as could
be. He evidently thought himself in a bad way. I suggested
some simple medicine, such as salts or castor oilany thing,
indeed
,
which could do no harm, and which could lessen the
patient's
apprehensions, which seemed to increase with the evident
inability of his master to give him help. Still he could scarcely
tell where it hurt him; his pains were every where, in head,
back, shoulder, heels, and strange to say, at the tips of his ears.
Mr. C. was puzzled, and concluded to avoid the responsibility of
such a case, by sending for the neighbouring physician.
Dr. C, a very clever and well-read man, soon made his
appearance, and was regularly introduced to the patient. His
replies
to the physician were as little satisfactory as those which he
had made to us; and, after a long and tedious cross examination
by doctor and master, the conclusion was still the same. Some
few things, however, transpired in the inquiry, which led us all to
the same inference with the doctor, who ascribed Scipio's
condition
to some mental hallucination. While the conversation had
been going on in his cabina dwelling like most negro houses,
made with poles, and the chinks stopped with clay,he turned
abruptly from the physician to a negro girl that brought him soup,
and asked the following question.
Who bin tell Gullah Sam for come in yer yesserday?
The girl looked confused, and made no answer.
Answer him, said the master.
Da's himwhy you no talk, nigger? said the patient
authoritatively
.
I ax you who bin tell Gullah Sam for come in
yer yesserday?
He bin come? responded the girl with another inquiry.
Sure, he bin comeenty I see um wid he dirty gray jacket,
like dirt on a crow wing. He tink I no see umhe 'tan dere in
dis corner, close de chimney, and look wha's a cook in de pot.
Oh, how my ear bu'nsomebody's a talking bad tings 'bout
Scipio now.
There was a good deal in this speech to interest Mr.
Carrington
and myself; we could trace something of his illness to his strife
with the crow; but who was Gullah Sam? This was a
question
put both by the doctor and myself, at the same moment.
You no know Gullah Sam, enty? Ha! better you don't
know 'umhe's a nigger da's more dan niggerwish he min'
he own bis'ness.
With these words the patient turned his face to the wall of his
habitation, and seemed unwilling to vouchsafe us any farther
speech. It was thought unnecessary to annoy him with farther
inquiries, and, leaving the cabin, we obtained the desired
information
from his master.
Gullah Sam, said he, is a native born African from the
Gold Coast, who belongs to my neighbour, Mr. Jamison, and was
bought by his father out of a Rhode Island slaver, some time
before
the Revolution. He is now, as you may suppose, rather an
old man; and, to all appearances, would seem a simple and silly
one enough; but the negroes all around conceive him to be a great
conjurer, and look upon his powers as a wizard, with a degree of
dread, only to be accounted for by the notorious superstition of
ignorance
.
I have vainly endeavoured to overcome their fears and
prejudices on this subject; but the object of fear is most
commonly
,
at the same time, an object of veneration, and they hold on to
the faith which has been taught them, with a tenacity like that
with which the heathen clings to the idol, the wrath of which he
seeks to deprecate, and which he worships only because he fears.
The little conversation which we have had with Scipio, in his
partial delirium, has revealed to me what a sense of shame has
kept him from declaring before. He believes himself to be
bewitched
by Gullah Sam, and, whether the African possesses any
power such as he pretends to or not, is still the same to Scipio, if
his mind has a full conviction that he does, and that he has
become
its victim. A superstitious negro might as well be
bewitched
,
as to fancy that he is so.
And what do you propose to do? was my inquiry.
Nay, that question I cannot answer you. It is a work of
philosophy, rather than of physic, and we must become the
masters
of the case, before we can prescribe for it. We must note
the fancies of the patient himself, and make these subservient to
the cure. I know of no other remedy.
CHAPTER IV.
That
evening, we all returned to the cabin of Scipio. We
found him more composedsane, perhaps, would be the proper
wordthan in the morning, and, accordingly, perfectly silent on
the subject of Gullah Sam. His master took the opportunity of
speaking to him in plain language.
Scipio, why do you try to keep the truth from me? Have
you ever found me a bad master, that you should fear to tell me
the truth?
Nebber say sich ting! Who tell you, mossa, I say you bad?
replied the negro with a lofty air of indignation, rising on his arm
in the bed.
Why should you keep the truth from me? was the reply.
Wha' trut' I keep from you, mossa?
The cause of your sickness, Scipio. Why did you not tell me
that Gullah Sam had bewitched you?
The negro was confounded.
How you know, mossa? was his demand.
It matters not, replied the master, but how came Gullah
Sam to bewitch you?
He kin 'witch den, mossa? was the rather triumphant
demand
of the negro, who saw, in his master's remark, a concession
to his faith, which had always been withheld before. Mr.
Carrington
extricated himself from the dilemma with sufficient
promptness and ingenuity.
The devil has power, Scipio, over all that believe in him. If
you believe that Gullah Sam can do with you what he pleases, in
spite of God and the Saviour, there is no doubt that he can; and
God and the Saviour will alike give you up to his power, since,
when you believe in the devil, you refuse to believe in them.
They have told you, and the preacher has told you, and I have
told you, that Gullah Sam can do you no sort of harm, if you will
refuse to believe in what he tells you. Why then do you believe
in that miserable and ignorant old African, sooner than in God,
and the preacher, and myself?
I can't help it, mossade ting's de ting, and you can't change
'um. Dis Gullah Samhe wus more nor ten debbleI jis' laugh
at 'um t'oder daytree week 'go, when he tumble in de hoss
pond, and he shake he finger at me, and ebber since he put he bad
mout' pon me. Ebber sence dat time, dat ugly crow bin stand
in my eyes, whichebber way I tu'n. He hab gray dirt on he
wing, and enty dere's a gray patch on Gullah Sam jacket?
Gullah Sam hab close 'quaintan' wid dat same lazy crow da's
walk roun' me in de cornfield, mossa. I bin tink so from de fuss;
and when he 'tan and le' me shoot at 'um, and no 'fraid, den I
sartain.
Well, Scipio, said the master, I will soon put an end to
Sam's power. I will see Mr. Jamison, and will have Sam well
flogged for his witchcraft. I think you ought to be convinced
that a wizard who suffers himself to be flogged, is but a poor
devil after all.
The answer of the negro was full of consternation.
For Chris' sake, mossa, I beg you do no sich ting. You
lick Gullah Sam, den you lose Scipio for eber and eber, amen.
Gullah Sam nebber guine take off de bad mout' he put on
Scip, once you lick em. De pains will keep in de bonesde leg
will dead, fuss de right leg, den de lef, one arter t'oder, and you
nigger will dead, up and up, till noting lef for dead but he head.
He head will hab life, when you kin put he body in de hole, and
cubbur um up wid du't. You mus' try n'oder tings, mossa, for
get you nigger cureyou lick Gullah Sam, 'tis kill um for
ebber.
A long conversation ensued among us, Scipio taking
occasional
part in it; for, now that his secret was known, he seemed
somewhat
relieved, and gave utterance freely to his fears and
superstitions
;
and determined for and against the remedies which we
severally proposed, with the authority of one, not only more
deeply
interested in the case than any one beside, but who also knew
more about it. Having unscrupulously opposed nearly every plan,
even in its inception, which was suggested, his master, out of all
patience, at last exclaimed,
PART I. 9
Well, Scipio, it seems nothing will please you. What would
you have? what course shall I take to dispossess the devil, and
send Gullah Sam about his business?
After a brief pause, in which the negro twisted from side to
side of his bed, he answered as follows:
Ef you kin trow way money on Scip, mossa, dere's a way I
tink 'pon, dat'll do um help, if dere's any ting kin help um now,
widout go to Gullah Sam. But it's a berry 'spensive way, mossa.
How much will it cost? demanded the master. I am not
unwilling to pay money for you, either to cure you when you are
sick, as you ought to know by my sending for the doctor, or by
putting more sense into your head than you seem to have at
present
.
How much money do you think it will take to send the
devil out of you?
Ha! mossa, you no speak 'spectful 'nough. Dis Gullah Sam
hard to move; more dan de lazy crow dat walk in de cornfield.
He will take money 'nough; mos' a bag ob cotton in dese hard
times.
Pshawspeak out, and tell me what you mean! said the
now thoroughly impatient master.
Dere's an old nigger, mossa, dat's an Ebo,he lib ober on
St. Matt'ew's, by de bluff, place of Major Thompson. He's mighty
great hand for cure bad mout'. He's named 'Tuselah, and he's
a witch he sef, worse more nor Gullah Sam. Gullah Sam fear'd
umberry fear'd um. You send for 'Tuselah, mossa, he cos'
you more nor twenty dollars. Scipio git well for sartin, and you
nebber yerry any more 'bout dat sassy crow in de cornfield.
If I thought so, replied Mr. Carrington, looking round upon
us, as if himself half ashamed to give in to the suggestions of the
negro; if I thought so, I would certainly send for Methuselah.
But really, there's something very ridiculous in all this.
I think not, was my reply. Your own theory will sustain
you, since, if Scipio's fancy makes one devil, he is equally
assured
,
by the same fancy, of the counter power of the other.
Besides, said the doctor, you are sustained by the
proverb
,
`set a thief to catch a thief.' The thing is really curious.
I shall be anxious to see how the St. Matthew's wizard overcomes
him of Santee; though, to speak truth, a sort of sectional interest
in my own district, would almost tempt me to hope that he may
be defeated. This should certainly be my prayer, were it not
that I have some commiseration for Scipio. I should be sorry to
see him dying by inches.
By feet rather, replied his master with a laugh. First the
right leg, then the left, up and up, until life remains to him in
his head only. But, you shall have your wish, Scipio. I will
send a man to-morrow by daylight to St. Matthew's for
Methuselah
,
and if he can overcome Gullah Sam at his own weapons, I
shall not begrudge him the twenty dollars.
Tenks, mossa, tousand tenks, was the reply of the invalid;
his countenance suddenly brightening for the first time for a
week, as if already assured of the happy termination of his
affliction
.
Meanwhile, we left him to his cogitations, each of us
musing
to himself, as well on the singular mental infirmities of a
negro, at once sober, honest, and generally sensible, and that
strange sort of issue which was about to be made up, between the
respective followers of the rival principles of African witchcraft,
the Gullah and the Ebo fetishes.
CHAPTER V.
The
indulgent master that night addressed a letter to the
owner
of Methuselah, stating all the circumstances of the case, and
soliciting permission for the wizard, of whom such high
expectations
were formed, or fancied, to return with the messenger, who
took with him an extra horse that the journey might be made
with sufficient despatch. To this application a ready assent was
given, and the messenger returned on the day after his departure,
attended by the sage personage in question.
Methuselah was an African, about sixty-five years of age, with
a head round as an owl's, and a countenance quite as grave and
contemplative. His features indicated all the marked
characteristics
of his race, low forehead, high cheek bone, small eyes, flat
nose, thick lips, and a chin sharp and retreating. He was not
more than five feet high, and with legs so bowed thatto use
Scipio's expression, when he was so far recovered as to be able
again to laugh at his neighbour,a yearling calf might easily
run between them without grazing the
calf
. There was nothing
promising in such a person but his sententiousness and gravity,
and Methuselah possessed these characteristics in remarkable
degree. When asked
Can you cure this fellow? his answer, almost insolently
expressed, was,
I come for dat.
You can cure people who are bewitched?
He no dead?
No.
Belly well; I cure em;can't cure dead nigger.
There was but little to be got out of such a character by
examination
,
direct or cross; and attending him to Scipio's wigwam, we
tacitly resolved to look as closely into his proceedings as we could,
assured, that in no other way could we possibly hope to arrive at
any knowledge of his
modus operandi
in so curious a case.
Scipio was very glad to see the wizard of St. Matthew's, and
pointing to a chair, the only one in his chamber, he left us to the
rude stools, of which there happened to be a sufficient supply.
Well, brudder, said the African abruptly, wha's matter?
Ha, Mr. 'Tuselah, I bin hab berry bad mout' put 'pon me.
I know datyou eyes run wateryou ears hotyou hab
knee shakeyou trimble in de joint.
You hit um; 'tis jis' dem same ting. I hab ears bu'n berry
much, and thus encouraged to detail his symptoms, the
garrulous
Scipio would have prolonged his chronicle to the crack of
doom, but that the wizard valued his time too much, to suffer any
unnecessary eloquence on the part of his patient.
You see two tings at a time? asked the African.
How! I no see, replied Scipio, not comprehending the
question
,
which simply meant, do you ever see double? To this,
when explained, he answered in a decided negative.
'Tis a man den, put he had mout' 'pon you, said the
African.
Gor-a-mighty, how you know dat? exclaimed Scipio.
Hush, my brudderwha' beas' he look like?
He's a dn black nigger ob a crowa dirty crow, da's lazy
for true.
Ha! he lazyyou sure he ain't lame?
He no lame.
Scipio then gave a close description of the crow which had
pestered him, precisely as he had given it to his master, as
recorded
in our previous pages. The African heard him with
patience
,
then proceeded with oracular gravity.
'Tis old man wha's trouble you!
Da's a trute!
Hush, my brudder. Whay you bin see dis crow?
Crow in de cornfiel', Mr. 'Tuselah; he can't come in de
house.
Who bin wid you all de time?
Jennyde galhe 'tan up in de corner now.
The magician turned and looked upon the person indicated by
Scipio's fingera little negro girl, probably ten years old. Then
turning again to Scipio, he asked,
You bin sick two, tree, seben day, brudderhow long you bin
on you bed?
Since Saturday nightda's six day to-day.
And you hab nobody come for look 'pon you, since you bin
on de bed, but dis gal, and de buckrah?
Scipio confessed to several of the field negroes, servants of his
own master, all of whom he proceeded to describe in compliance
with the requisitions of the wizard, who, as if still unsatisfied, bade
him, in stern accents, remember if nobody else had been in the
cabin, or, in his own language, had set he eye 'pon you.
The patient hesitated for awhile, but the question being
repeated
,
he confessed that in a half-sleep or stupor, he had fancied
seeing
Gullah Sam looking in upon him through the half-opened door;
and at another time had caught glimpses, in his sleep, of the same
features, through a chink between the logs, where the clay had
fallen.
Ha! ha! said the wizard, with a half-savage grin of mingled
delight and sagacityI hab nose,I smell. Well, brudder, I
mus' gib you physic,you mus' hab good sweat to-night, and
smood skin to-morrow.
Thus ended the conference with Scipio. The man of mystery
arose and left the hovel, bidding us follow, and carefully
fastening
the door after him.
This done, he anointed some clay, which he gathered in the
neighbourhood, with his spittle, and plastered it over the lintel.
He retired with us a little distance, and when we were about to
separate, he for the woods, and we for the dwelling-house, he said
in tones more respectful than those which he employed to Mr.
Carrington on his first coming,
You hab niggers, mossawomen is de bes'dat lub for talk
too much?
Yes, a dozen of them.
You sen' one to de plantation where dis Gullah Sam lib, but
don't sen' um to Gullah Sam; sen' um to he mossa or he missis;
and borrow sometingany tingold pot or kettleno matter if
you don't want 'em, you beg um for lend you. Da's 'nough.
Mr. Carrington would have had the wizard's reasons for this
wish, but finding him reluctant to declare them, he promised his
consent, concluding, as was perhaps the case, that the only object
was to let Gullah Sam know that a formidable enemy had taken
the field against him, and in defence of his victim.
1
1.
Since penning the above conjecture, I remember a story which was
related
to me several years ago, by a venerable country lady of South Carolina,
who, to the merit of telling a good story well, added the equally commendable
merit of always believing the story which she toldin which it was insisted
upon, in these controversies between rival wizards, and, if I mistake not, in all
cases where witch or wizard aimed to operate, that, to obtain complete success,
it was necessary that they should succeed in borrowing something out of the
house which was to be the scene of their diablerie. In this story, though a
mere boy at the time, I can well remember the importance attached by a
mother to the instructions which she gave her daughter, on going abroad, to
lend nothing out of the house, under any circumstances, or to any body,
during
her absence. She had scarcely disappeared,the story went on to relate,
before an old woman of the neighbourhood, whose intentions were already
suspected, came to borrow a sieve. The girl, without admitting her into the
house, for the door had been locked by the provident mother, answered her
demand through the window by an unvarying refusal. Baffled in her aim by
the child's firmness, the prayers and entreaties of the applicant were changed
into the bitterest abuse and execrations, clearly showing, whatever might have
been her pretensions or powers of evil, the devilish malignity of purpose which
she entertained.
This would
seem to account for his desire that the messenger should be a
woman
,
and one wha' lub for talk too much. He then obtained
directions for the nearest path to the swamp, and when we looked
that night into the wigwam of Scipio, we found him returned with
a peck of roots of sundry sorts, none of which we knew, prepared
to make a decoction, in which his patient was to be immersed from
head to heels. Leaving Scipio with the contemplation of this
steaming prospect before him, we retired for the night, not a little
anxious for those coming events which cast no shadow before us,
or one so impenetrably thick, that we failed utterly to see
through it.
CHAPTER VI.
In
the morning, strange to say, we found Scipio considerably
better, and in singularly good spirits. The medicaments of the
African, or more likely the pliant imagination of the patient
himself
,
had wrought a charm in his behalf; and instead of
groaning
at every syllable, as he had done for several days before, he
now scarcely uttered a word that was not accompanied by a grin.
The magician seemed scarcely less pleased than his patient,
particularly
when he informed us that he had not only obtained the
article the woman was sent to borrow, but that Gullah Sam had
been seen prowling, late at night, about the negro houses, without
daring, however, to venture nigh that of the invalida
forbearance
which the necromancer gave us to understand, was entirely
involuntary, and in spite of the enemy's desire, who was baffled and
kept away by the spell contained in the ointment which he had
placed on the lintel, in our presence the evening before. Still,
half-ashamed of being even quiescent parties merely to this
solemn
mummery, we were anxious to see the end of it, and our
African promised that he would do much towards relieving
Scipio from his enchantment, by the night of the same day. His
spells and fomentations had worked equally well, and Scipio was
not only more confident in mind, but more sleek and strong in
body. With his own hands, it appears, that the wizard had
rubbed
down the back and shoulders of his patient with corn-shucks
steeped in the decoction he had made, and, what was a more
strange specific still, he had actually subjected Scipio to a
smarter
punishment, with a stout hickory, than his master had given
him for many a year. This, the poor fellow not only bore
with Christian fortitude, but actually rejoiced in, imploring
additional
strokes when the other ceased. We could very well
understand
that Scipio deserved a whipping for laughing at an aged
man, because he fell into the water, but we failed to ascertain
from the taciturn wizard, that this was the rationale of an
application
which a negro ordinarily is never found to approve. This
over, Scipio was again put to bed, a green twig hung over the
door of his cabin within, while the unctuous plaster was renewed
freshly on the outside. The African then repeated certain
uncouth
sounds over the patient, bade him shut his eyes and go to
sleep, in order to be in readiness and go into the fields by the
time the sun was turning for the west.
What, exclaimed Mr. Carrington, do you think him able
to go into the field to-day? He is very weak; he has taken
little
nourishment for several days.
He mus' able, returned the imperative African; he 'trong
'nough. He mus' ablehe hab for carry gun.
With these words the wizard left us without deigning any
explanation
of his future purposes, and, taking his way towards the
swamp, he was soon lost to our eyes in the mighty depth of its
shrouding recesses.
When he returned, which was not till noon, he came at once
to the mansion-house, without seeking his patient, and entering
the hall where the family was all assembled, he challenged our
attention as well by his appearance as by his words. He had,
it would seem, employed himself in arranging his own appearance
while in the swamp; perhaps, taking one of its thousand lakes or
ponds for his mirror. His woolly hair, which was very long,
was plaited carefully up, so that the ends stuck out from his
brow, as pertly and pointedly as the tails of pigs, suddenly
aroused to a show of delightful consciousness on discovering a
forgotten corn-heap. Perhaps that sort of tobacco, known by the
attractive and characteristic title of pigtail, would be the most
fitting to convey to the mind of the reader the peculiar form of
plait which the wizard had adopted for his hair. This mode of
disposing of his matted mop, served to display the tattooed and
strange figures upon his temples,the certain signs, as he
assured
us, of princely rank in his native country. He carried a long
wand in his hand, freshly cut and peeled, at one end of which he
had tied a small hempen cord. The skin of the wand was
plaited
round his own neck. In a large leaf he brought with him a
small portion of some stuff which he seemed to preserve very
carefully, but which appeared to us to be nothing more than coarse
sand or gravel. To this he added a small portion of salt, which
he obtained from the mistress of the house, and which he stirred
together in our presence until the salt had been lost to the eye in
the sand or gravel, or whatever might have been the article which
he had brought with him. This done, he drew the shot from both
barrels of the gun, and in its place, deposited the mixture which
he had thus prepared.
Buckrah will come 'long now. Scipio guine looka for de
crow.
Such were his words, which he did not wait to hear
answered
or disputed, but taking the gun, he led the way towards
the wigwam of Scipio. Our anxiety to see the conclusion of
the adventure, did not suffer us to lose any time in following him.
To our surprise, we found Scipio dressed and up; ready, and it
would seem perfectly able, to undertake what the African
assigned
him. The gun was placed in his hands, and he was told to
take his way to the cornfield as usual, and proceed to work. He
was also informed by the wizard, with a confidence that surprised
us, that the lazy crow would be sure to be there as usual; and
he was desired to get as close as he could, and take good aim at
his head in shooting him.
You sure for hit um, brudder, said the African; so, don't
'tan too long for look. Jis' you git close, take you sight, and gib
um bot' barrel. But fuss, 'fore you go, I mus' do someting wid
you eye.
The plaster was taken from the door, as Scipio passed through
it, re-softened with the saliva of the wizard, who, with his finger,
described an arched line over each of the patient's eyes.
You go 'long by you'sef now, brudder, and shoot de crow
when you see um. He's a waiting for you now, I 'spec'.
We were about to follow Scipio to the field, but our African
kept us back; and leading the way to a little copse that divided
it from the swamp, he took us to its shelter, and required us to
remain with him out of sight of the field, until some report from
Scipio or his gun, should justify us in going forth.
CHAPTER VII.
Here
we remained in no little anxiety for the space of nearly
two hours, in which time, however, the African showed no sort
of impatience, and none of that feverish anxiety which made us
restless in body and eager, to the last degree, in mind. We
tried to fathom his mysteries, but in vain. He contented himself
with assuring us that the witchcraft which he used, and that
which he professed himself able to cure, was one that never
could affect the white man in any way. He insisted that the
respective
gods of the two races were essentially very different;
as different as the races themselves. He also admitted that
the god of the superior race was necessarily equal to the task of
governing both, while the inferior god could only govern the one
that of taking charge of his, was one of those small businesses,
with which it was not often that the former would soil his hands.
To use his own phrase, there is a god for de big house, and
another
for de kitchen.
While we talked over these topics, and strove, with a waste of
industry, to shake the faith of the African in his own peculiar
deities and demons, we heard the sound of Scipio's guna sound
that made us forget all nicer matters of theology, and set off with
full speed towards the quarter whence it came. The wizard
followed
us slowly, waving his wand in circles all the way, and
pulling
the withes from his neck, and casting them around him as he
came. During this time, his mouth was in constant motion, and
I could hear at moments, strange, uncouth sounds breaking from
his lips. When we reached Scipio, the fellow was in a state
little
short of delirium. He had fired both barrels, and had cast
the gun down upon the ground after the discharge. He was
wringing his hands above his head in a sort of phrensy of joy,
and at our approach he threw himself down upon the earth,
laughing with the delight of one who has lost his wits in a dream
of pleasure.
Where's the crow? demanded his master.
I shoot umI shoot um in he headenty I tell you, mossa,
I will hit um in he head? Soon he poke he nose ober de ground,
I gib it to um. Hope he bin large shot. He gone t'rough he
head,t'rough and t'rough. Ha! ha! ha! If dat crow be
Gullah
Sam! if Gullah Sam be git in crow jacket, ho, mossa! he
nebber git out crow jacket 'till somebody skin um. Ha! ha! ho!
ho! ho! ki! ki! ki! ki! la! ki! Oh, mossa, wonder how
Gullah
Sam feel in crow jacket!
It was in this strain of incoherent exclamation, that the
invalid
gave vent to his joyful paroxysm at the thought of having put a
handful of duck shot into the hide of his mortal enemy. The
unchristian
character of his exultation received a severe reproof
from his master, which sobered the fellow sufficiently to enable
us to get from him a more sane description of his doings. He
told us that the crow had come to bedevil him as usual, only
and the fact became subsequently of considerable importance,
that he had now lost the gray dirt from his wing, which had so
peculiarly
distinguished it before, and was now as black as the most
legitimate suit ever worn by crow, priest, lawyer, or physician.
This change in the outer aspect of the bird had somewhat
confounded
the negro, and made him loth to expend his shot, for fear of
wasting
the charmed charge upon other than the genuine Simon Pure.
But the deportment of the otherlazy, lounging, swaggering, as
usualconvinced Scipio in spite of his eyes, that his old enemy
stood in fact before him; and without wasting time, he gave him
both barrels at the same moment.
But where's the crow? demanded the master.
I knock um ober, mossa; I see um tumble; 'speck you find
um t'oder side de cornhill.
Nothing could exceed the consternation of Scipio, when, on
reaching the designated spot, we found no sign of the supposed
victim. The poor fellow rubbed his eyes, in doubt of their visual
capacities, and looked round aghast, for an explanation, to the
wizard
who was now approaching, waving his wand in long sweeping
circles as he came, and muttering, as before, those strange
uncouth
sounds, which we relished as little as we understood. He
did not seem at all astonished at the result of Scipio's shot, but
abruptly asked of himWhay's de fus' water, brudder Scip?
De water in de bay, Mass 'Tuselah, was the reply; the
speaker pointing as he spoke to the little spot of drowned land on
the very corner of the field, which, covered with thick shoots of
the small sweet bay tree,the magnolia glauca,receives its
common name among the people from its almost peculiar growth.
Push for de bay! push for de bay! exclaimed the African,
and see wha' you see. Run, Scip; run, niggersee wha' lay
in de bay!
These words, scarcely understood by us, set Scipio in motion.
At full speed he set out, and, conjecturing from his movement,
rather than from the words of the African, his expectations, off
we set also at full speed after him. Before we reached the spot,
to our great surprise, Scipio emerged from the bay, dragging
behind
him the reluctant and trembling form of the aged negro,
Gullah
Sam. He had found him washing his face, which was
covered
with little pimples and scratches, as if he had suddenly
fallen
into a nest of briars. It was with the utmost difficulty we
could prevent Scipio from pummelling the dreaded wizard to
death.
What's the matter with your face, Sam? demanded Mr.
Carrington.
Hab humour, Mass Carrington; bin trouble berry mosh wid
break out in de skin.
Da shot, mossada shot. I hit um in crow jacket; but whay's
de gray di't? Ha! mossa, look yer; dis de black coat ob Mass
Jim'son dat Gullah Sam hab on. He no wear he jacket with gray
patch. Da's make de diff'rence.
The magician from St. Matthew's now came up, and our
surprise
was increased when we saw him extend his hand, with an
appearance of the utmost good feeling and amity, to the rival he
had just overcome.
Well, brudder Sam, how you come on?
The other looked at him doubtfully, and with a countenance in
which we saw, or fancied, a mingling expression of fear and
hostility
;
the latter being evidently restrained by the other. He
gave his hand, however, to the grasp of Methuselah, but said
nothing
.
I will come take supper wid you to-night, brudder Sam,
continued
the wizard of St. Matthew's, with as much civility as if
he spoke to the most esteemed friend under the sun. Scip, boy,
you kin go to you mossa workyou quite well ob dis bus'ness.
Scipio seemed loth to leave the company while there appeared
something yet to be done, and muttered half aloud,
You no ax Gullah Sam, wha' da' he bin do in de bay.
Psha, boy, go 'long to you cornfiel'enty I know, replied
Methuselah. Gullah Sam bin 'bout he own bus'ness, I s'pose.
Brudder, you kin go home now, and get you tings ready for
supper
.
I will come see you to-night.
It was in this manner that the wizard of St. Matthew's was
disposed
to dismiss both the patient and his persecutor; but here the
master of Scipio interposed.
Not so fast, Methuselah. If this fellow, Sam, has been
playing
any of his tricks upon my people, as you seem to have taken
for granted, and as, indeed, very clearly appears, he must not be
let off so easily. I must punish him before he goes.
You kin punish um more dan me? was the abrupt, almost
stern inquiry of the wizard.
There was something so amusing as well as strange in the
whole business, something so ludicrous in the wo-begone visage
of Sam, that we pleaded with Mr. Carrington that the whole case
should be left to Methuselah; satisfied that as he had done so well
hitherto, there was no good reason, nor was it right, that he should
be interfered with. We saw the two shake hands and part, and
ascertained from Scipio that he himself was the guest of Gullah
Sam, at the invitation of Methuselah, to a very good supper that
night of pig and 'possum. Scipio described the affair as having
gone off very well, but he chuckled mightily as he dwelt upon the
face of Sam, which, as he said, by night, was completely raw
from the inveterate scratching to which he had been compelled to
subject it during the whole day. Methuselah the next morning
departed, having received, as his reward, twenty dollars from the
master, and a small pocket Bible from the young mistress of the
negro; and to this day, there is not a negro in the surrounding
countryand many of the whites are of the same way of
thinking
who
does not believe that Scipio was bewitched by Gullah
Sam, and that the latter was shot in the face, while in the shape
of a common crow in the cornfield, by the enchanted shot
provided
by the wizard of St. Matthew's for the hands of the other.
The writer of this narrative, for the sake of vitality and
dramatic
force, alone, has made himself a party to its progress. The
material has been derived as much from the information of others,
as from his own personal experience; though it may be as well to
add, that superstition among the negroes is almost as active to
this day, in the more secluded plantations, as it was prior to the
revolution. Nor is it confined to the negro only. An instance
occurred only a few years ago,the facts of which were given
me by a gentleman of unquestionable veracity,in which one of
his poor, uneducated white neighbours, labouring under a
protracted
,
and perhaps, novel form of disease, fancied himself the
victim of a notorious witch or wizard in his own district, and
summoned to his cure the rival wizard of another. Whether the
controversy was carried in the manner of that between Gullah
Sam and Methuselah, I cannot say; nor am I sure that the
conquest
was achieved by the wizard summoned. My authorities
are no less good than various, for the
procs ncromantique,
as
detailed
above. It may be that I have omitted some of the
mummery
that seemed profane or disgusting; for the rest
I vouch not for the truth, d'ye see,
But tell the tale as 'twas told to me.
CALOYA;
OR, THE LOVES OF THE DRIVER.
CHAPTER I.
When
I was a boy, it was the custom of the Catawba Indians
then reduced to a pitiful remnant of some four hundred
persons
,
all toldto come down, at certain seasons, from their far
homes in the interior, to the seaboard, bringing to Charleston a
little stock of earthen pots and pans, skins and other small
matters
,
which they bartered in the city for such commodities as
were craved by their tastes, or needed by their condition. They
did not, however, bring their pots and pans from the nation, but
descending to the low country empty-handed, in groups or
families
,
they squatted down on the rich clay lands along the Edisto,
raised their poles, erected their sylvan tents, and there established
themselves in a temporary abiding place, until their simple
potteries
had yielded them a sufficient supply of wares with which
to throw themselves into the market. Their productions had their
value to the citizens, and, for many purposes, were considered by
most of the worthy housewives of the past generation, to be far
superior to any other. I remember, for example, that it was a
confident faith among the old ladies, that okra soup was always
inferior
if cooked in any but an Indian pot; and my own
impressions
make me not unwilling to take sides with the old ladies on
this particular tenet. Certainly, an iron vessel is one of the last
which should be employed in the preparation of this truly
southern
dish. But this aside. The wares of the Indians were not ill
made, nor unseemly to the eye. They wrought with much
cleaner
hands than they usually carried; and if their vases were
sometimes unequal in their proportions, and uncouth in their forms,
these defects were more than compensated by their freedom from
flaws and their general capaciousness and strength. Wanting,
perhaps, in the loveliness and perfect symmetry of Etruscan art,
still they were not entirely without pretensions of their own. The
ornamental enters largely into an Indian's idea of the useful, and
his taste pours itself out lavishly in the peculiar decorations which
he bestows upon his wares. Among his first purchases when he
goes to the great city, are vermilion, umber, and other ochres,
together with sealing wax of all colours, green, red, blue and
yellow
.
With these he stains his pots and pans until the eye
becomes
sated with a liberal distribution of flowers, leaves, vines
and stars, which skirt their edges, traverse their sides, and
completely
illuminate their externals. He gives them the same
ornament
which he so judiciously distributes over his own face, and
the price of the article is necessarily enhanced to the citizen, by
the employment of materials which the latter would much rather
not have at all upon his purchases. This truth, however, an
Indian
never will learn, and so long as I can remember, he has still
continued to paint his vessels, though he cannot but see that the
least decorated are those which are always the first disposed of.
Still, as his stock is usually much smaller than the demand for it,
and as he soon gets rid of it, there is no good reason which he
can perceive why he should change the tastes which preside
over his potteries.
Things are greatly altered now-a-days, in these as in a
thousand
other particulars. The Catawbas seldom now descend to
the seaboard. They have lost the remarkable elasticity of
character
which peculiarly distinguished them among the aboriginal
nations, and, in declining years and numbers, not to speak of the
changing circumstances of the neighbouring country, the ancient
potteries are almost entirely abandoned. A change has taken
place among the whites, scarcely less melancholy than that which
has befallen the savages. Our grandmothers of the present day
no longer fancy the simple and rude vessels in which the old
dames took delight. We are for Svre's Porcelain, and foreign
goods wholly, and I am saddened by the reflection that I have
seen the last of the Indian pots. I am afraid, henceforward, that
PART II. 10
my okra soup will only be made in vessels from Brummagem;
nay, even now, as it comes upon the table, dark, dingy and
discoloured
to my eye, I think I see unequivocal tokens of metallic
influence upon the mucilaginous compound, and remember with
a sigh, the glorious days of Catawba pottery. New fashions, as
usual, and conceited refinements, have deprived us of old pleasures
and solid friends. A generation hence, and the fragment of an
Indian pot will be a relic, a treasure, which the lover of the
antique
will place carefully away upon the upper shelf of the
sanctum
,
secure from the assaults of noisy children and very tidy
housekeepers, and honoured in the eyes of all worthy-minded
persons, as the sole remaining trophy of a time when there was
perfection in one, at least, of the achievements of the culinary art.
I am afraid that I have seen the last of the Indian pots!
But let me avoid this melancholy reflection. Fortunately, my
narrative enables me to do so. It relates to a period when this
valuable manufacture was in full exercise, and, if not encouraged
by the interference of government, nor sought after by a foreign
people, was yet in possession of a patronage quite as large as it
desired. To arrive at this important period we have only to go
back twenty yearsa lapse made with little difficulty by most
persons, and yet one which involves many and more trying changes
and vicissitudes than any of us can contemplate with equanimity.
The spring season had set in with the sweetest of countenances,
and the Catawbas, in little squads and detachments, were soon
under way with all their simple equipments on their backs for
the lower country. They came down, scattering themselves along
the Edisto, in small bodies which pursued their operations
independently
of each other. In this distribution they were probably
governed by the well known policy of the European Gipseys,
who find it much easier, in this way, to assess the several
neighbourhoods
which they honour, and obtain their supplies without
provoking apprehension and suspicion, than if they were,
en masse,
to concentrate themselves on any one plantation. Their camps
might be found in famed loam-spots, from the Eutaws down to
Parker's Ferry, on the Edisto, and among the numerous swamps
that lie at the head of Ashley River, and skirt the Wassamasaw
country. Harmless usually, and perfectly inoffensive, they were
seldom repelled or resisted, even when they made their camp
contiguously to a planter's settlements; though, at such periods,
the proprietor had his misgivings that his poultry yard suffered
from other enemies than the Wild-cat, and his hogs from an
assailant
as unsparing as the Alligator. The overseer, in such
cases, simply kept a sharper lookout than ever, though it was not
often that any decisive consequences followed his increased
vigilance
.
If the Indians were at any time guilty of appropriation,
it was not often that they suffered themselves to be brought to
conviction
.
Of all people, they, probably, are the most solicitous to
obey the scripture injunction, and keep the right hand from any
unnecessary knowledge of the doings of the left.
CHAPTER II.
One
morning, early in this pleasant season, the youthful
proprietor
of a handsome plantation in the neighbourhood of the
Ashley
River, might have been seen taking his solitary breakfast, at
a moderately late hour, in the great hall of his family mansion.
He was a tall, fine-looking young man, with quick, keen, lively
gray eyes, that twinkled with good humour and a spirit of playful
indulgence. A similar expression marked his features in general,
and lessened the military effect of a pair of whiskers, of which
the display was too lavish to be quite becoming. He had but
recently come into possession of his property, which had been
under the guardianship of an uncle. His parents had been cut
off by country fever while he was yet a child, and, as an only son,
he found, at coming of age, that his estates were equally ample
and well managed. He was one of those unfortunate young
bachelors, whose melancholy loneliness of condition is so apt to
arrest the attention, and awaken the sympathies of disinterested
damsels, and all considerate mothers of unappropriated daughters,
who are sufficiently well-informed in scripture authority, to know
that it is not meet for man to be alone. But young Col.
Gillison
was alone, and continued, in spite of good doctrine, to be
alone for several long years after. Into the causes which led to
this strange and wilful eccentricity, it forms no part of our object
to inquire. Our story does not so much concern the master of
the plantation as one of his retainers, whom the reader will please
to imagine that he has seen, more than once, glancing his eye
impatiently
from the piazza through the window, into the apartment,
awaiting the protracted moment when his young master should
descend to his breakfast. This was a stout negro fellow, of
portly
figure and not uncomely countenance. He was well made
and tall, and was sufficiently conscious of his personal attractions,
to take all pains to exhibit them in the most appropriate costume
and attitude. His pantaloons were of very excellent nankin, and
his coat, made of seersucker, was one of the most picturesque
known to the southern country. It was fashioned after the
Indian
hunting shirt, and formed a very neat and well-fitting frock,
which displayed the broad shoulders and easy movements of
Mingofor that was the negro's nameto the happiest advantage.
Mingo was the driver of the estate. The driver is a sort of
drill-sergeant
to the overseer, who may be supposed to be the Captain.
He gets the troops in line, divides them into squads, sees to their
equipments, and prepares them for the management and
command
of the superiors. On the plantation of Col. Gillison, there
was at this time no overseer; and, in consequence, the
importance
of Mingo was not a little increased, as he found himself
acting in the highest executive capacity known to his experience.
Few persons of any race, colour, or condition, could have had
a more elevated idea of their own pretensions than our present
subject. He trod the earth very much as its Lordthe sovereign
shone out in every look and movement, and the voice of supreme
authority spoke in every tone. This feeling of superiority
imparted
no small degree of grace to his action, which, accordingly,
would have put to shame the awkward louting movements of one
half of those numbed and cramped figures which serve at the
emasculating counters of the trading city. Mingo was a
Hercules
to the great majority of these; and, with his arms akimbo,
his head thrown back, one foot advanced, and his hands, at
intervals
,
giving life to his bold, and full-toned utterance, he would
startle with a feeling not unlike that of awe, many of those bent,
bowed and mean-looking personages who call themselves freemen,
and yet have never known the use, either of mind or muscle, in
one twentieth part the degree which had been familiar to this
slave.
At length, after a delay which evidently did not diminish the
impatience of Mingo, his young master descended to the breakfast
room. His appearance was the signal for the driver to enter the
same apartment, which he accordingly did without pause or
preparation.
Well, Mingo, said the young man, with lively tones
what's the word this morning? Your face seems full of news!
and now that I consider you closely, it seems to have smitten your
body also. You look fuller than I have ever seen you before.
Out with your burden, man, before you burst. What sow's
littered
what
cow's cast her calfhow many panels in the fence
are burnthow many chickens has the hawk carried off this
morning? What! none of these? he demanded, as the shake
of the head, on the part of his hearer, which followed every
distinct
suggestion of the speaker, disavowed any subject of
complaint
from those current evils which are the usual subject of a
planter's apprehension. What's the matter, then, Mingo?
Matter 'nough, Mossa, ef we don't see to it in time,
responded
Mingo, with a becoming gravity. It's a needcessity, a
driver's
English is sometimes terribly emphatic, it's a needcessity,
Sir, to see to other cattle, besides hogs and cows. The chickens
too, is intended to, as much as they wants; and
I
ha'nt lost a
panel by fire, eber sence Col. Parker's hands let the fire get 'way
by Murray's Thick. There, we did lose a smart chance, and
put us back mightily, I reckon; but that was in old mossa's time,
and we had Mr. Groning, den, as the obersharso, you see, Sir,
I couldn't be considered bound 'sponsible for that; sence I've had
the management, there ha'nt been any loss on my plantation of
any kind. My fences ha'nt been burn, my cattle's on the rise,
and as for my hogs and chickens, I reckon there's not a
plantation
on the river that kin make so good a count at Christmas.
But
Well, well, Mingo, said the youthful proprietor, who knew
the particular virtue of the driver, and dreaded that his tongue
should get such headway as to make it unmanageableif
there's no loss, and no danger of lossif the hogs and chickens
are right, and the cattle and the fenceswe can readily defer
the business until after breakfast. Here, boy, hand up the coffee.
Stop a bit, Mossait aint rightall aint right said the
impressive Mingoit's a business of more transaction and
deportance
than the cattle and the fencesit's
Well, out with it then, Mingothere's no need for a long
preamble. What is the trouble?
Why, Sir, you mus' know, began the driver, in no degree
pleased to be compelled to give his testimony in any but his own
fashion, and drawling out his accents accordingly, so as to
increase
the impatience of his master, and greatly to elongate the
sounds of his own voicesounds which he certainly esteemed to
be among the most musical in nature.You mus' know den,
Sir, that Limping Jake came to me a while ago, tells me as how,
late last night, when he was a-hunting 'possum, he came across
an Indian camp, down by the `Red Gulley.' They had a fire,
and was a-putting up the poles, and stripping the bark to cover
them. Jake only seed two of them; but it's onpossible that they'll
stick at that. Before we know anything, they'll be spreading
like varmints all about us, and putting hands and teeth on every
thing, without so much as axing who mout be the owner.
Well, Mingo, what of all this? demanded the master, as the
driver came to a pause, and looked volumes of increased dignity,
while he concluded the intelligence which he meant to be
astounding
.
Wha' of all this, Mossa!Why, Sir, de'rs 'nough of it. Ef
the hogs and the chickens did'nt go before, they'll be very apt to
go now, with these red varmints about us.
Surely, if you don't look after them; but that's your
business
,
Mingo. You must see to the poultry houses yourself, at
night, and keep a close watch over these squatters so long as they
are pleased to stay.
But, Mossa, I aint gwine to let 'em stay! To my idee, that's
not the wisdom of the thing. Now, John Groning, the obershar
of old mossathough I don't much reprove of his onderstanding
in other expects, yet he tuk the right reason, when he druv them
off, bag and baggage, and wouldn't let hoof nor hide of 'em stretch
off upon the land. I ha'nt seen these red varmints, myself, but I
come to let you know, that I was gwine out to asperse, and send
'em off, under the shake of a cowhide, and then there's no farther
needcessity to keep a look out upon them. I'm not willing to let
such critters hang about
my
plantation.
The reader has already observed, that an established driver
speaks always of his charge as if it were a possession of his own.
With Mingo, as with most such, it was
my
horse,
my
land,
my
ox,
and
my
ass, and all that is
mine
. His tone was much subdued,
as he listened to the reply of his master, uttered in accents
something
sterner than he had been wont to hear.
I'm obliged to you, Mingo, for coming to inform me of your
intentions. Now, I command you to do nothing of this sort. Let
these poor devils remain where they are, and do you attend to
your duty, which is to see that they do no mischief. If I mistake
not, the `Red Gulley' is the place where they have been getting
their clay ever since my grandfather settled this plantation.
That's a truth, Sir, but
Let them get it there still. I prefer that they should do so,
even though I may lose a hog now and then, and suffer some
decrease
in the fowl yard. I am pleased that they should come to
the accustomed place for their clay
But, Sir, only last year, John Groning druv 'em off.
I am the better pleased then, at the confidence they repose
in me. Probably they know that John Groning can no longer
drive them off. I am glad that they give me an opportunity to treat
them more justly. They can do me little harm, and as their
fathers worked in the same holes, I am pleased that they, too,
should work there. I will not consent to their expulsion for such
small evils as you mention. But I do not mean, Mingo, that they
shall be suffered to infest the plantation, or to do any mischief.
You will report to me, if you see any thing going wrong, and to
do this while they stay; you will look very closely into their
proceedings. I, myself, will have an eye upon them, and if there
be but two of them, and they seem sober, I will give them an
allowance
of corn while they stay.
Well, but Mossa, there's no needcessity for that, and
considering
that the Corn-House aint oberfull
No more at present, Mingo. I will see into the matter
during
the day. Meanwhile, you can ride out to the `Red
Gulley
,'
see these people, and say to them, from me, that, so long as
they behave themselves civilly, they may remain. I am not
satisfied
that these poor wretches should be denied camping ground
and a little clay, on a spot which their people once possessed
exclusively
.
I shall probably see them after you, and will then be
better able to determine upon their deserts.
CHAPTER III.
Mingo
retired from the conference rather chap-fallen. He
was not so well satisfied with the result of his communication.
He had some hope to commend himself more than ever to his
youthful master by the zeal and vigilance which he had striven to
display. Disappointed in this hope, he was still further mortified
to perceive how little deference was shown him by one, whose
youthful judgment he hoped to direct, and of whose inexperience
he had possibly some hope to take advantage. He loved to
display
his authority, and sometimes seemed absolutely to fancy
himself the proprietor, whose language of command he had
habituated
himself to employ; on the present occasion, he made his
way from the presence of his master with no complacent feelings,
and his displeasure vented itself very unequivocally upon a
favourite
hound who lay at the foot of the outer steps, and whom he
kicked off with a savage satisfaction, and sent howling to his
kennel. A boy coming to him with a message from the kitchen,
was received with a smart application of his wagon whip, and
made to follow the example, if he did not exactly imitate the
peculiar
music of the hound. Mingo certainly made his exit in a
rage. Half an hour after, he might have been seen, mounted on
his marsh tacky, making tracks for the Red Gulley,
determined
,
if he was not suffered to expel the intruders, at least, to
show them that it was in his power, during their stay, to diminish
very considerably the measure of their satisfaction. His wrath
like that of all consequential persons who feel themselves in the
wrong, yet lack courage to be rightwas duly warmed by
nursing
;
and, pregnant with terrible looks and accents, he burst
upon the little encampment at Red Gulley, in a way that was
a caution to all evil doers!
The squatters had only raised one simple habitation of poles,
and begun a second which adjoined it. The first was covered in
with bushes, bark and saplings; the second was slightly
advanced
,
and the hatchet lay before it, in waiting for the hand by
which it was to be completed. The embers of a recent fire were
strewed in front of the former, and a lean curone of those gaunt,
far sighted, keen nosed animals which the Indians employed;
dock tailed, short haired, bushy eyedlay among the ashes, and
did not offer to stir at the appearance of the terror-breathing
Mingo. Still, though he moved not, his keen eyes followed the
movements of the Driver with as jealous a glance as those of his
owner would have done; while the former alighted from his
horse, peered around the wigwam, and finally penetrated it.
Here he saw nobody, and nothing to reward his scrutiny.
Reappearing
from the hut, he hallooed with the hope of obtaining
some better satisfaction, but his call was unanswered. The dog
alone raised his head, looked up at the impatient visitor, and, as
if satisfied with a single glance, at once resumed his former
luxurious
position. Such stolidity, bad enough in an Indian, was
still more impertinent in an Indian dog; and, forgetting every
thing but his consequence, and the rage with which he had set
out from home, Mingo, without more ado, laid his lash over the
animal with no measured violence of stroke. It was then that
he found an answer to his challenge. A clump of myrtles
opened
at a little distance behind him, and the swarthy red cheeks of
an Indian man appeared through the aperture, to which his voice
summoned the eyes of the assailant.
You lick dog, said the owner, with accents which were rather
soft and musical than stern, dog is good, what for you lick dog?
Such a salutation, at the moment, rather startled the imperious
driver; not that he was a timid fellow, or that his wrath had in the
least degree abated; but that he was surprised completely. Had
the voice reached him from the woods in front, he would have
been better prepared for it; but, coming from the rear, his
imagination
made it startling, and increased its solemnity. He turned
at the summons, and, at the same moment, the Indian, making
his way through the myrtles, advanced toward the negro. There
was nothing in his appearance to awaken the apprehensions of
the latter. The stranger was small and slight of person, and
evidently beyond the middle period of life. Intemperance, too,
the great curse of the Indian who has long been a dweller in
contact
with the Anglo-Saxon settler(the French,
par parenthese,
seem to have always civilized the Indian without making him a
drunkard)had made its ravages upon his form, and betrayed
itself
in every lineament of his face. His step, even while he
approached
the negro, was unsteady from the influence of liquor;
and as all these signs of feebleness became obvious to the eye of
Mingo, his courage, and with it his domineering insolence of
character
,
speedily returned to him.
Lick dog! he exclaimed, as he made a movement to the
Catawba, and waved his whip threateningly, lick dog, and lick
Indian too.
Lick Indianget knife! was the quiet answer of the savage,
whose hand, at the same instant, rested upon the horn handle of
his
couteau de chasse,
where it stuck in the deerskin belt that
girdled his waist.
Who's afeard? said Mingo, as he clubbed his whip and
threw the heavy loaded butt of it upon his shoulder. The slight
frame of the Indian moved his contempt only; and the only
circumstance
that prevented him from instantly putting his threat
into execution, was the recollection of that strange interest which
his master had taken in the squatters, and his positive command
that they should not be ill treated or expelled. While he
hesitated
,
however, the Catawba gave him a sufficient excuse, as he
fancied, for putting his original intention into execution. The
threatening attitude, partial advance of the foe, together with the
sight of the heavy handled whip reversed and hanging over him,
had, upon the mind of the savage, all the effect of an absolute
assault. He drew his knife in an instant, and flinging himself
forward to the feet of the negro, struck an upright blow with his
weapon, which would have laid the entrails of his enemy open
to the light, but for the promptitude of the latter, who, receding
at the same instant, avoided and escaped the blow. In the next
moment, levelling his whip at the head of the stooping Indian, he
would most probably have retorted it with fatal effect, but for an
unlooked for interruption. His arms were both grappled by some
one from behind, and, for the perilous moment, effectually
prevented
from doing any harm. With some difficulty, he shook off
the last comer, who, passing in front, between the hostile parties,
proved to be an Indian woman.
CHAPTER IV.
Before
this discovery was fairly made, the wrath of Mingo
had been such as to render him utterly forgetful of the commands
of his master. He was now ready for the combat to the knife;
and had scarcely shaken himself free from his second assailant,
before he advanced with redoubled resolution upon the first. He,
by the way, equally aroused, stood ready, with closed lips, keen
eye and lifted knife, prepared for the encounter. All the
peculiarities
of the Indian shone out in the imperturbable aspect,
composed
muscles, and fiery gleaming eyes of the now half-sobered
savage; who, as if conscious of the great disparity of strength
between
himself and foe, was mustering all his arts of war, all his
stratagems and subtleties, to reduce those inequalities from which
he had every thing to apprehend. But they were not permitted
to fight. The woman now threw herself between them; and, at
her appearance, the whip of Mingo fell from his shoulder, and
his mood became instantly pacific. She was the wife of the
savage, but certainly young enough to have been his daughter.
She was decidedly one of the comeliest squaws that had ever
enchanted the eyes of the Driver, and her life-darting eyes, the
emotion so visible in her face, and the boldness of her action, as
she passed between their weapons, with a hand extended toward
each, was such as to inspire him with any other feelings than
those which possessed him towards the squatters. Mingo was
susceptible of the tender influences of love. As brave as Julius
Csar, in his angry mood, he was yet quite as pliant as Mark
Antony in the hour of indulgence; and the smile of one of the
ebon damsels of his race, at the proper moment, has frequently
saved her and others from the penalties incurred by disobedience
of orders, or unfinished tasks. Nor were his sentiments towards
the sex confined to those of his master's plantation only. He
penetrated the neighbouring estates with the excursive and
reckless
nature of the Prince of Troy, and, more than once, in
consequence
of this habit, had the several plantations rung with wars,
scarcely less fierce, though less protracted than those of Ilium.
His success with the favoured sex was such as to fill him with a
singular degree of confidence in his own prowess and personal
attractions. Mingo knew that he was a handsome fellow, and
fancied a great deal more. He was presumptuous enough
surely there are no white men so!to imagine that it was scarcely
possible for any of the other sex, in their sober senses, to withstand
him. This impression grew singularly strong, as he gazed upon
the Indian woman. So bright an apparition had not met his eyes
for many days. His local associations were all stalingthe
women he was accustomed to behold, had long since lost the
charm of novelty in his sightand, with all his possessions, Mingo,
like Alexander of Macedon, was still yearning for newer
conquests
.
The first glance at the Indian woman, assured his
roving fancies that they had not yearned in vain. He saw in
her a person whom he thought destined to provoke his jaded
tastes anew, and restore his passions to their primitive ascendancy.
The expression of his eye softened as he surveyed her. War
fled from it like a discomfited lion; and if love, squatting quietly
down in his place, did not look altogether so innocent as the lamb,
he certainly promised not to roar so terribly. He now looked
nothing but complacence on both the strangers; on the woman
because of her own charms; on the man because of the charms
which he possessed in her. But such was not the expression in
the countenance of the Indian. He was not to be moved by the
changes which he beheld in his enemy, but still kept upon him a
wary watch, as if preparing for the renewal of the combat.
There was also a savage side-glance which his keen fiery eyes
threw upon the woman, which seemed to denote some little anger
towards herself. This did not escape the watchful glance of our
gay Lothario, who founded upon it some additional hope of success
in his schemes. Meanwhile, the woman was not idle nor silent.
She did not content herself with simply going between the
combatants
,
but her tongue was active in expostulation with her
sovereign, in a dialect not the less musical to the ears of Mingo
because he did not understand a word of it. The tones were
sweet, and he felt that they counselled peace and good will to the
warrior. But the latter, so far as he could comprehend the
expression of his face, and the mere sounds of his brief, guttural
replies, had, like Sempronius, a voice for war only. Something,
too, of a particular harshness in his manner, seemed addressed to
the woman alone. Her answers were evidently those of
deprecation
and renewed entreaty; but they did not seem very much
to influence her Lord and master, or to soften his mood. Mingo
grew tired of a controversy in which he had no share, and fancied,
with a natural self-complacency, that he could smooth down some
of its difficulties.
Look yer, my friend, he exclaimed, advancing, with
extended
hand, while a volume of condescension was written upon
his now benignant featuresLook yer, my friend, it's no use
to be at knife-draw any longer. I didn't mean to hurt you when I
raised the whip, and as for the little touch I gin the dog, why
that's neither here nor there. The dog's more easy to squeal
than-most dogs I know. Ef I had killed him down to the brush
at his tail eend, he could'nt ha' holla'd more. What's the sense
to fight for dogs? Herehere's my handwe won't quarrel any
longer, and, as for fighting, I somehow never could fight when
there was a woman standing by. It's onbecoming, I may say,
and so here's for peace between us. Will you shake?
The proffered hand was not taken. The Indian still kept
aloof with the natural caution of his race; but he seemed to
relax something of his watchfulness, and betrayed less of that
still and deliberate anxiety which necessarily impresses itself
upon the most courageous countenance in the moment of expected
conflict. Again the voice of the woman spoke in tones of
reconciliation
,
and, this time, words of broken English were audible, in
what she said, to the ears of the Driver. Mingo fancied that he
had never heard better Englishof which language he considered
himself no humble proficientnor more sweetly spoken by any
lips. The savage darted an angry scowl at the speaker in return,
uttered but a single stern word in the Catawba, and pointed his
finger to the wigwam as he spoke. Slowly, the woman turned
away and disappeared within its shelter. Mingo began to be
impatient of the delay, probably because of her departure, and
proceeded, with more earnestness than before, to renew his
proposition
for peace. The reply of the Indian, betrayed all the
tenacity
of his race in remembering threats and injuries.
Lick dog, lick Indian; lick Indian, get knifehah!
Who's afeard! said the Driver. Look yer, my friend:
'taint your knife, let me tell you, that's gwine to make me turn
tail on any chicken of your breed. You tried it, and what did
you git? Why, look you, if it hadn't been for the gripe of the
galmaybe she's your daughter, mout-be your sister?but it's
all oneef it hadn't been her gripe which fastened my arm, the
butt of my whip would have flattened you, until your best friend
couldn't ha' said where to look for your nose. You'd ha' been
all face after that, smooth as bottom land, without e'er a snag or
a stump; and you'd have passed among old acquaintance for
any body sooner than yourself. But I'm no brag dognor I
don't want to be a biting dog, nother; when there's nothing to
fight for. Let's be easy. P'rhaps you don't feel certain whose
plantation you're on here. Mout be if you know'd, you'd find
out it wa'nt altogether the best sense to draw knife on Mingo
Gillison.Why, look you, my old boy, I'm able to say what I
please hereI makes the law for this plantationall round
about, so far as you can see from the top of the tallest of them
'ere pine trees, I'm the master! I look 'pon the pine land field,
and I say, `Tom, Peter, Ned, Dick, Jack, Ben, Toney, Sam
boysyou must 'tack that field to-morrow.' I look 'pon the
swamp field, and I say to 'nother ten, `boys, go there!'high
land and low land, upland and swamp, corn and cotton, rice and
rye, all 'pen 'pon me for order; and jis' as Mingo say, jis' so
they do. Well, wha' after dat! It stands clear to the leetlest
eye, that 'taint the best sense to draw knife on Mingo Gillison;
here, on he own ground. 'Spose my whip can't do the mischief,
it's a needcessity only to draw a blast out of this 'ere horn, and
there'll be twenty niggers 'pon you at once, and ebery one of dem
would go off wid 'he limb. But I ain't a hard man, my fren', ef
you treat me softly. You come here to make your clay pots and
pans. Your people bin use for make 'em here for sebenty
ninemout-be forty seben yearwho knows? Well, you can
make 'em here, same as you been usen to make 'em, so long as
you 'habe you'self like a gemplemans. But none of your
knife-work, le' me tell you. I'll come ebery day and look 'pon
you. 'Mout-be, I'll trade with you for some of your pots.
Clay-pot is always best for bile hom'ny.
We have put in one paragraph the sum and substance of a
much longer discourse which Mingo addressed to his Indian
guest. The condescensions of the negro had a visible effect upor
the squatter, the moment that he was made to comprehend the
important station which the former enjoyed; and when the Indian
woman was fairly out of sight, Richard Knuckles, for such was the
English name of the Catawba, gradually restored his knife to his
belt, and the hand which had been withheld so long, was finally given
in a gripe of amity to the negro, who shook it as heartily as if
he had never meditated towards the stranger any but the most
hospitable intentions. He was now as affectionate and indulgent,
as he had before shown himself hostile; and the Indian, after a
brief space, relaxed much of the
hauteur
which distinguishes the
deportment of the Aborigines. But Mingo was pained to observe
that Richard never once asked him into his wigwam, and, while he
remained, that the squaw never once came out of it. This reserve
betokened some latent apprehension of mischief; and the whole
thoughts of our enamoured Driver were bent upon ways and
means for overcoming this austerity, and removing the doubts of
the strangers. He contrived to find out that Caloyasuch was
the woman's namewas the wife of the man; and he
immediately
jumped to a conclusion which promised favourably for his
schemes. An ole man wid young wife! said he, with a
complacent chuckle, Ah, ha! he's afeard!well, he hab' good
'casion for fear'd, when Mingo Gillison is 'pon de ground.
CHAPTER V.
But
though warmed with these encouraging fancies, our
conceited
hero found the difficulties to be much more numerous and
formidable than he had anticipated. The woman was as shy as
the most modest wife could have shown herself, and no
Desdemona
could have been more certainly true to her liege lord.
Mingo paid no less than three visits that day to the wigwam, and
all without seeing her, except at his first coming, when she was
busied with, but retired instantly from, her potteries, in which
Richard Knuckles took no part, and seemingly no interest. Lazy,
like all his race, he lay in the sun, on the edge of the
encampment
,
with an eye but half open, but that half set directly upon
the particular movements of his young wife. Indians are
generally
assumed to be cold and insensible, and some doubts have
been expressed, whether their sensibilities could ever have been
such as to make them open to the influence of jealousy. These
notions are ridiculous enough; and prove nothing half so
decidedly
as the gross ignorance of those who entertain them.
Something
,
of course, is to be allowed for the natural differences
between a civilized and savage people. Civilization is prolific,
barbarism sterile. The dweller in the city has more various
appetites and more active passions than the dweller in the camp;
and the habits of the hunter, lead, above all things, to an intense
gathering up of all things in self; a practice which tends,
necessarily
,
to that sort of independence which is, perhaps, neither
more nor less than one aspect of barrenness. But, while the
citizen is allowed to have more various appetites and intenser
passions
in general, the Indian is not without those which, indeed,
are essential to constitute his humanity. That he can love, is
undeniablethat he loves with the ardour of the white, may be
more questionable. That he can love, however, with much
intensity, may fairly be inferred from the fact that his hate is
subtle and is nourished with traditional tenacity and reverence.
But the argument against the sensibility of the savage, in his
savage state, even if true, would not apply to the same animal in
his degraded condition, as a borderer of the white settlements.
Degraded by beastly habits, and deprived by them of the fiercer
and warlike qualities of his ancestors, he is a dependent, (and
jealousy is a creature of dependence)a most wretched dependent,
and that, too, upon his womenshe who, an hundred years ago,
was little other than his slave, and frequently his victim. In his
own feebleness, he learns to esteem her strength; and, in due
degree with his own degradation, is her rise into importance in
his sight. But it does not matter materially to our present
narrative
,
whether men should, or should not agree, as to the
sensibilities
of the savage to the tender passion. It is probable, that
few warlike nations are very susceptible of love; and as for the
middle ages, which might be urged as an exception to the justice
of this remark, Sismondi is good authority to show that Burke
had but little reason to deplore their loss:
Helas! cet heroisme
universel nous avons nomme la chevalerie, n'exista jamais comme
fictions brillantes!
There were no greater brutes than the
warriors of the middle ages.
Richard Knuckles, whether he loved his young wife or not,
was certainly quite as jealous of her as Othello was of his.
Not, perhaps, so much of her affections as of her deference; and
this, by the way, was also something of the particular form of
jealousy under which the noble Moor suffered. The proud spirit
chafes that another object should stand for a moment between his
particular sunlight and himself. His jealousy had been awakened
long before, and this led to his temporary separation from his
tribe. Caloya, it may be added, yielded, without a murmur, to
the caprices of her lord, to whom she had been given by her
father. She was as dutiful as if she loved him; and, if conduct
alone could be suffered to test the quality of virtue, her affection
for him was quite as earnest, pure and eager, as that of the most
devoted woman. That she could not love him, is a conclusion
only to be drawn from the manifest inequalities between them.
He was old and brutala truly worthless, sottish savagewhile
she, if not a beauty, was yet comely to the eye, very youthful,
and, in comparison with Indian squaws in general, remarkably
tidy in person, and good humoured in disposition.
Our hero, Mingo, was not only persuaded that she could not
love Knuckles, but he equally soon became convinced that she
could be made to love himself. He left no opportunity untried to
effect this desirable result; and, after a most fatiguing trial, he
succeeded so far in a part of his scheme as to beguile the
husband
into good humour if not blindness. Returning towards
nightfall to the camp, Mingo brought with him a chunk-bottle
of whiskey, the potency of which, over the understanding of an
Indian, he well knew; and displaying his treasure to Knuckles,
was invited by him, for the first time, with a grunt of cordiality,
to enter the wigwam of the squatters. The whiskey while it
lasted convinced Knuckles, that he had no better friend in the
world than Mingo Gillison, and he soon became sufficiently
blinded by its effects, to suffer the frequent and friendly glances
of the Driver towards his wife, without discovering that they
were charged with any especial signs of intelligence. Yet never
was a more ardent expression of wilful devotion thrown into
human eyes before. Mingo was something of an actor, and
many an actor might have taken a goodly lesson of his art from
the experienced Driver. He was playing Romeo, an original
part always, to his own satisfaction. Tenderness, almost to tears,
softened the fiery ardour of his glance, and his thick lips grew
doubly thick, in the effort to throw into them an expression of
devoted languor. But all his labour seemed to go for nothing
nay, for something worse than nothingin the eyes of the
faithful wife. If her husband
could
not see the arts of the
amorous
negro, she
would
not see them; and when, at supper, it
sometimes became necessary that her eyes should look where the
lover sat, the look which she gave him was stony and inexpressive
cold to the last degree; and, having looked, it would be averted
instantly with a haste, which, to a less confident person would
have been vastly discouraging and doubtful. As it was, even
the self-assured Mingo was compelled to acknowledge, in his
mental soliloquy that night as he made his way homeward, that,
so far his progress was not a subject of brag, and scarcely of
satisfaction. The woman, he felt, had resisted his glances, or,
which was much worse, had failed to see them. But this was
owing, so he fancied, entirely to her caution and the natural
dread which she had of her fiercely minded sovereign. Mingo
retired to his couch that night to plan, and to dream of plans, for
overcoming the difficulties in the way of his own, and, as he
persisted
in believing, the natural desires of Caloya. It may be
stated in this place, that, under the new aspects which the squatters
had assumed in his eyes, he did not think it necessary to make
any very copious statement of his proceedings to his master; but,
after the fashion of certain public committees, when in difficulty
among themselves, he wisely concluded to report progress and
beg permission to sit again.
CHAPTER VI.
Dem
'ere Indians, he said the next morning to his master
dem 'ere Indiansder's only two ob 'em come yet, sirI
aint altogether sure about 'emI has'n't any exspecial
'spicion
,
sir, from what I seed yesterday, that they's very honest
in particklar, and then agen, I see no reasons that they aint
honest
.
It mout be, they might steal a hen, sir, if she was
reasonable
to come atit mout be, they mout eben go deeper into a
hog;but then agen, it mout'n't be after all, and it wouldn't be
right justice to say, tell a body knows for certain. There's no
telling yet, sir. An Indian, as I may say, naterally, is honest or
he aint honest;and there's no telling which, sir, 'tell he steals
something, or tell he goes off without stealing;and so all that
kin be done, sir, is to find out if he's a thief, or if he's not a thief;
and I think, sir, I'm in a good way to git at the rights of the matter
before worse comes to worser. As you say, Mossa, it's my
business
to see that you ain't worsened by 'em.
Without insisting that Col. Gillison entirely understood the
ingenious
speech of his driver, we can at least assert, with some
confidence, that he was satisfied with it. Of an indolent
disposition
,
the young master was not unwilling to be relieved from the
trouble of seeing himself after the intruders; and though he
dismissed
the amorous Mingo with an assurance, that he would take
an early opportunity to look into their camp, the cunning driver,
who perhaps guessed very correctly on the subject of his master's
temperament, was fully persuaded that his own movements would
suffer no interruption from the command or supervision of the
other. Accordingly, sallying forth immediately after breakfast,
he took his way to the encampment, where he arrived in time to
perceive some fragments of a Catawba
dejen,
which, while it
awakened his suspicions, did not in any measure provoke his
appetite
.
There were numerous small well-picked bones, which
might have been those of a squirrel, as Richard Knuckles
somewhat
gratuitously alleged, or which might have been those of one
of his master's brood-hens, as Mingo Gillison half suspected. But,
though he set forth with a declared resolve not to suffer his
master's
interests to be worsened, our driver did not seem to think
it essential to this resolution to utter his suspicions, or to search
more narrowly into the matter. He seemed to take for granted
that Richard Knuckles had spoken nothing but the truth, and he
himself showed nothing but civility. He had not made his visit
without bringing with him a goodly portion of whiskey in his flask,
well knowing that no better medium could be found for procuring
the confidence and blinding the jealous eyes of the Indian. But
he soon discovered that this was not his true policy, however
much he had fancied in the first instance that it might
subserve
it. He soothed the incivilities of the Catawba, and
warmed his indifference by the liquor, but he, at the same time,
and from the same cause, made him stationary in the camp. So
long as the whiskey lasted, the Indian would cling to the spot,
and when it was exhausted he was unable to depart. The
prospect
was a bad one for the Driver that day in the camp of the
squatters
,
since, though the woman went to
her
tasks without delay,
and clung to them with the perseverance of the most devoted
industry
,
the Hunter was neither able nor willing to set forth upon his.
The bow was unbent and unslung, lying across his lap, and he,
himself, leaning back against his tree, seemed to have no wish
beyond
the continued possession of the genial sunshine in which
he basked. In vain did Mingo, sitting beside him, cast his
wistful eyes towards the woman who worked at a little
distance
,
and whom, while her husband was wakeful, he did
not venture to approach. Something, he thought, might be
done by signs, but the inflexible wife never once looked up
from the clay vessel which her hands were employed to round
an inflexibility which the conceited negro ascribed not so
much to her indifference to his claims, as to her fears of her
savage husband. We must not forget to say that the tongue of
the Driver was seldom silent, however much his thoughts might be
confused and his objects baffled. He had a faith in his own
eloquence
,
not unlike that of the greater number of our young and
promising
statesmen; and did not doubt, though he could not speak
to the woman directly, that much that he did say would still
reach her senses, and make the desired impression. With this idea,
it may be readily supposed that he said a great many things
which were much better calculated to please her, than to meet the
assent of her husband.
Now, for example, continuing a long dissertation on the
physiological and psychological differences between his own and
the Indian race, in which he strove to prove to the satisfaction of
the Catawba, the infinite natural and acquired superiorities of the
former,Now, said he, stretching his hand forth towards the
toiling woman, and establishing his case, as he thought
conclusively
,
by a resort to the
argumentum ad hominem
now, you
see, if that 'ere gal was my wife instead of your'n, Knuckles, do
you think I'd let her extricate herself here in a br'iling sun, working
her fingers off, and I lying down here in the grass a-doing nothing,
and only looking on? No! I'd turn in and give her good resistance;
'cause why, Knuckles? 'Cause, you see, it's not, I may say, a
'spectable sight to see the woman doing all the work what's a
needcessity, and the man a-doing nothing. The woman warn't
made for hard work at all. My women I redulgesI never
pushes
'emI favours them all that I kin, and it goes agin me
mightily
,
I tell you, when it's a needcessity to give 'em the lash. But
I scores the men like old Harry. I gives them their desarbings;
and if so be the task ain't done, let them look out for thick
jackets
.
'Twont be a common homespun that'll keep off my cuts. I
do not say that I overwork my people. That's not the idee. My
tasks is a'most too easy, and there's not a nigger among 'em that
can't get through, if he's exposed that way, by tree o'clock in de
day. The women has their task, but they're twice as easy, and
then I don't open both eyes when I'm looking to see if they've got
through 'em. 'Tain't often you hear my women in trivilation; and,
I know, it stands to reason what I'm telling you, that a black
Gentlemen
is always more 'spectable to a woman than an Indian.
Dere's your wife now, and dere's you. She ain't leff her
business
since I bin here, and you haint gone to your'n, nor you ain't
gin her a drop of the whiskey. Not to say that a gal so young
as that ought to drink whiskey and chaw tobaccobut for the sake
of compliment now, 'twas only right that you should ha' ax her
to try a sup. But then for the working. You ain't offered to
resist
her; you ain't done a stroke since breakfast. Ef you was
under me, Knuckles, I'd a laid this green twig over your red
jacket
in a way that would ha' made a 'possum laugh.
Eh! was the only exclamation of the half drunken Indian,
at this characteristic conclusion of the negro's speech; but, though
Knuckles said nothing that could denote his indignation at the
irreverent
threat, which, though contingent only, was excessively
annoying to the
amour propre
of the Catawba, there was a gleam
of angry intelligence which flashed out for a moment from his
eyes and his thin lips parted to a grin that showed his white teeth
with an expression not unlike that of a wolf hard pressed by one
more daring cur than the rest. Either Mingo did not see this, or
he thought too lightly of the prowess of his companion to heed it.
He continued in the same strain and with increasing boldness.
Now I say, Knuckles, all that's onbecoming. A woman's a
woman, and a man's a man. A woman has her sort of work,
and it's easy. And a man has his sort of work, and that's hard.
Now, here you make this poor gal do your work and her own too.
That's not fair, it's a despisable principle, and I may say, no man's
a gempleman that believes it. Ha'n't I seed, time upon time,
Indian
men going along, stiff and straight as a pine tree, carrying
nothing but a bow and arrow, and mout be, a gun; and, same
time, the squaws walking a most double under the load. That's
a common ex-servation. Iv'e seed it a hundred times. Is that
'spectful or decent to the fair seck? I say no, and I'll stand by, and
leave it to any tree gentlemen of any complexion, ef I ain't right.
It was well, perhaps, for the maintenance of peace between the
parties, that Knuckles was too drunk and too ignorant to
comprehend
all that was spoken by the Driver. The leading idea,
however
,
was sufficiently clear for his comprehension, and to this he
answered with sufficient brevity and phlegm.
Indian woman is good for workIndian man for hunt; woman
is good for hab children; man for shootman for fight. The
Catawba man is very good for fight; and as the poor, miserable
creature spoke, the fire of a former and a better day, seemed to
kindle his cheeks and give lustre to his eye. Probably, the
memory of that traditional valour which distinguished the people
to which he belonged in a remarkable degree, in comparison
with the neighbouring nations, came over his thoughts, and
warned him with something like a kindred sentiment with those
which had been so long forgotten by his race.
Oh, go 'long! said the negro. How you talk, Knuckles!
wha make you better for fight more dan me? Ki, man! Once
you stan' afore Mingo, you tumble. Ef I was to take you in my
arms and give you one good hug, Lor' ha' massy 'pon you!
You'd neber feel yourself after that, and nothing would be lef' of
you for you wife to see, but a long greasy mark, most like a little
old man, yer, 'pon my breast and thighs. I never seed the
Indian
yet that I could'nt lick, fair up and down, hitch cross, or big
cross, hand over, hand under, arm lock and leg lock, in
seventeen
and nine minutes, by the sun. You don't know, Knuckles,
else you would'nt talk so foolish. Neber Indian kin stan' agen
black man, whedder for fight or work. That's the thing I'm
talking 'bout. You can't fight fair and you can't work. You
aint got strengt' for it. All your fighting is bush fighting and
behind tree, and you' woman does the work. Now, wha' make
you lie down here, and not go 'pon you' hunting? That's 'cause
you're lazy. You come look at my hands, see 'em plough, see
'em hoe, see 'em mak' ditch, cut tree, split rail, buil' house
when you see dem, you'll see wha' I call man. I would'nt give
tree snap of a finger for any pusson that's so redolent as an
Indian
.
They're good for nothing but eat.
Catawba man is good for fight! sullenly responded the
Indian
to a speech which the negro soon found to have been
imprudently
concerted and rashly spoken, in more respects than one.
Nigger man and squaw is good for work! continued the other
disdainfully, his thin lips curling into an expression of scorn
which did not escape the eyes of Mingo, obtuse as his vanity
necessarily made him. Catawba man is a free man, he can
sleep or he can hunt, pursued the savage, retorting decidedly
upon the condition of the slave, but without annoying the sleek,
well fed and self-complacent driver. Nigger man ain't free
manhe must work, same like Indian squaw.
Oh, skion! Oh! skion! wha's all dat, Knuckles? You don't
know wha' you say. Who make you free? wha' make you
free? How you show you got freedom, when here you expen'
'pon poor woman for work your pot, and half de time you got
not'ing to put in 'em. Now, I is free man! Cause, you see my
pot is always full, and when I does my work like a gempleman,
who cares? I laughs at mossa jist the same as I laughs at you.
You free eh?you! Whay you hab coat like mine? Whay, you
hab breeches? Why, Knuckles, you aint decent for stan' 'fore
you wife. Dat's trut' I'm telling you. How you can be free
when you aint decent? How you can be free when you no
work? How you can be free when you half-starbing all de time?
When you aint got blanket to you' backwhen you aint got fat
'pon you rib. When here, you expen' 'pon my land to get the
mud-stuff for you' pots and pans! Psho, psho, Knuckles, you
don't know wha' you talk 'bout. You aint hab sensible notion of
dem tings wha make free pusson. Nebber man is freeman, ef
he own arm can't fill he stomach. Nebber man is freeman if he
own work can't put clothes 'pon he back. Nebber man is
freeman
no,
nor gempleman neider, when he make he purty young
wife do all de work, him lying same time, wid he leg cross and
he eye half shut, in de long grass smelling ob de sunshine. No,
no, Knuckles, you must go to you' work, same as I goes to mine,
ef you wants people to desider you a freeman. Now you' work
is huntingmy work is for obersee my plantation. It's a trut',
your work aint obermuch'taint wha' gempleman kin call work
altogedder, but nebber mind, it's someting. Now, wha for you no
go to you' work? Come, I gwine to mine. You strike off now
'pon your business. I reckon you' wife can make he pots, same
as ef we bin' stan' look 'pon 'em. Woman don't like to be
obershee, and when I tink 'pon de seck, I don't see any
needcessity
for it.
The Indian darted a fierce glance at the authoritative negro,
and simply exclaiming, Eh! Eh! rose from his position, and
tottering towards the spot where the woman was at work, uttered
a few brief words in her ear which had the immediate effect of
sending her out of sight, and into the hovel. He then returned
quietly to his nest beneath the tree. Mingo was somewhat
annoyed
by the conviction that he had overshot his object, and had
provoked the always eager suspicions of the savage. Knuckles
betrayed no sort of intention to go on the hunt that day; and his
fierce glances, even if he had no words to declare his feelings,
sufficiently betrayed to the negro the jealousies that were awakened
in his mind. The latter felt troubled. He fancied that, in the
pursuit of his desires, were the woman alone concerned, he should
have no difficulty, but he knew not what to do with the man. To
scare him off was impossibleto beguile him from his treasure
seemed equally difficult, and, in his impatience, the dogmatical
driver, accustomed to have his will instantly obeyed, could
scarcely
restrain himself from a second resort to the whip. A moment's
reflection brought a more prudent resolution to his mind, and
seeing
that the squatters were likely to go without food that day, he
determined to try the effect which the presentation of a flitch of
his master's bacon would have, upon the jealousy of the husband,
and the affections of the wife. With this resolution, he retired from
the ground, though without declaring his new and gracious
purpose
to either of the parties whom it was intended especially to
benefit.
CHAPTER VII.
The
flitch was brought, boiled, and laid before the squatters.
It was accompanied by a wholesome supply of corn bread; and
this liberality, which had, for its sanction, in part, the expressed
determination of the master, had for its effect, the restoration of
Mingo to that favour in the mind of the savage, which his
imprudent
opinions had forfeited. Even a jealous Indian, when so very
hungry as our Catawba, and so utterly wanting in resources of
his own, cannot remain insensible to that generosity, however
suspicious, which fills his larder with good cheer in the happy
moment. He relaxed accordingly, Mingo was invited into the
hovel, and made to partake of the viands which he had provided.
A moderate supply of whiskey accompanied the gift, enough to
give a flavour to the meal, yet not enough to produce intoxication.
Mingo was resolved henceforth, to do nothing which would keep
himself and Knuckles from an uninterrupted pursuit of their
several
game. But while the meal lasted, he saw but few results,
beyond the thawing of Knuckles, which promised him success in
his object. Caloya was, if possible, more freezing than ever.
She never deigned him the slightest acknowledgment for his
numerous
civilities, which were not merely profitless, but which
had the additional disadvantage of attracting the eyes, and finally
re-awakening the jealous apprehensions of Knuckles; still, the
good cheer was so good, and the facility with which it had been
procured, so very agreeable to a lazy Indian, that he swallowed
his dissatisfaction with his pottage, and the meal passed over
without any special outbreak. Mingo, so near the object of his
desire, was by no means disposed to disputation with her husband,
and contented himself with only an occasional burst of
declamation
,
which was intended rather for her ears than for those of her
lord. But he strove to make amends for their forbearance, by
addressing
the most excruciating glances across the table to the fair
glances which she did not requite with favour, and which she
did not often seem to see.
Mingo was in hopes, when dinner was over, that Knuckles
would take up his bow and arrows, and set forth on the hunt.
To this he endeavoured, in an indirect manner, to urge the
savage
.
He told him that game was plenty in the neighbouring
woods and swampsthat deer might be found at all hours, and
even proceeded to relate several marvellous stories of his own
success, which failed as well to persuade as to deceive the hunter.
The whiskey being exhausted by this time, and his hunger being
pacified, the jealous fit of the latter returned upon him with all the
vigour of an ague. Why, he asked himself, should this negro
steal his master's bacon to provide Richard Knuckles with a
dinner
?
Because Richard Knuckles has a young wife, the
youngest
and handsomest of the whole tribe. Why should he urge me
to go hunting, and take such pains to show me where the buck
stalks, and the doe sleeps, but that he knows I must leave my
doe behind me? Why should he come and sit with me half a
dozen times a day, but that he may see and sit with my young
wife also? An Indian reasons very much like every body else,
and jumps very rationally to like conclusions. The reserve of
Knuckles grew with his reflections, and Mingo had sense enough
to perceive that he could hope for no successful operations that
day. The woman was sent from the presence, and her husband
began to exhibit very decided symptoms of returning sulks. He
barely answered the civilities of the driver, and a savage grin
displayed his white teeth, closely clenched, whenever his thin
lips parted to reply. The parting speech of the negro was not
precisely the D. I. O. of the rattle-dandy of fashionable life, but
was very much like it. If he did not swear like a trooper at
bidding
adieu, he marked every step on his way homewards with a
most bitter oath.
But success is no ripe fruit to drop at the first opening of the
mouth of the solicitous. Mingo was not the person to forego his
efforts, and he well knew from old experience, that a woman is
never so near won, as when she seems least willing. He was
not easily given to despair, however he might droop, and the next
day, and the next, and the next, found him still a frequent visitor
at the camp of Knuckles; and still he provided the corn, the
bacon
,
and the whiskey, and still he found the Catawba a patient
recipient
of his favours. The latter saw no reason to leave home
to hunt venison when his larder was so easily provided, and the
former could not, but at some discredit, discontinue the liberal
practices which he had so improvidently begun.
But if Knuckles was not unwilling to be fed after this
fashion
,
he was not altogether insensible to some of the conditions
which it implied. He could not but perceive that the negro had
his objects, and those objects his jealous blood had led him
long before to conjecture with sufficient exactness. He raged
inwardly
with the conviction that the gallant, good looking, and
always
well dressed Driver sought to compass his dishonour; and
he was not without the natural fears of age and brutality that,
but for his own eminent watchfulness, he might be successful.
As there was no equality in the conditions of himself and wife,
there was but little confidence between themcertainly none on
his part;and his suspicionsschooled into silence in the
presence
of Mingo, as well because of the food which he brought, as
of the caution which the great physical superiority of the latter
was calculated to inspirebroke out with unqualified violence
when the two were alone together. The night of the first day
when Mingo provided the table of the squatters so bountifully,
was distinguished by a concussion of jealousy, on the part of
Knuckles, which almost led the poor woman to apprehend for her
life. The effects of the good cheer and the whiskey had
subsided
and the departure of Mingo was the signal for the domestic
storm.
Hah! hah! nigger is come for see Ingin wife. Ingin wife
is look 'pon niggerhah?
It was thus that he begun the warfare. We have endeavoured
to put into the Indian-English, as more suitable to the subject, and
more accessible to the reader, that dialogue which was spoken in
the most musical Catawba. The reply of the woman, though
meekly expressed, was not without its sting.
Ingin man eats from nigger hand, drinks from nigger bottle,
and sits down by nigger side in the sunshine. Is Caloya to say,
nigger go to the cornfieldIngin man go look for meat?
The husband glared at the speaker with fiery eyes, while his
teeth gleamed maliciously upon her, and were suddenly gnashed
in violence, as he replied:
Hah! Ingin man must not look pon his wife! Hah! Ingin
woman says`go hunt, man, gothat no eyes may follow
nigger
when he crawls through the bush. Hah!'
Caloya is blind when the nigger comes to the camp. Caloya
looks not where he lies in the sunshine with the husband of
Caloya
.
Is Enefisto (the Indian name for Knuckles) afraid of
nigger
?is
he afraid of Caloya?let us go: Caloya would go to
her people where they camp by the Edisto.
Hah! What said Chickawa, to Caloya? Did he say, come
to our people where they camp by the Edisto? Wherefore should
Caloya go beside the EdistoHah?
This question declared another object of the husband's jealousy.
The woman's reply was as wild as it was immediate.
Caloya sees not Chickawashe sees not the niggershe sees
the clay and she sees the pansand she sees EnefistoEnefisto
has said, and her eyes are shut to other men.
Caloya lies!
Ah!
Caloya lies!
The woman turned away without another word, and
re-entering
the miserable wigwam, slunk out of sight in the darkest
corner
of it. Thither she was pursued by the inveterate old man,
and there, for some weary hours, she suffered like language of
distrust and abuse without uttering a sentence either of denial or
deprecation. She shed no tears, she uttered no complaints, nor
did her tormentor hear a single sigh escape from her bosom; yet,
without question, her poor heart suffered quite as much from his
cruelty and injustice, as if her lips had betrayed all the
extravagant
manifestations known to the sorrows of the civilized.
CHAPTER VIII.
It
is at least one retributive quality of jealousy, to torment the
mind of the tormentor quite as much, if not more, than it does
that of the victim. The anger of Richard Knuckles kept him
awake the better part of the night; and, in his wakefulness, he
meditated little else than the subject of his present fears. The
indirect reproaches of his wife stung him, and suggested, at the
same time, certain additional reasons for his suspicions. He
reflected
that, while he remained a close sentinel at home, it was
impossible that he should obtain sufficient evidence to convict the
parties whom he suspected, of the crime which he feared; for,
by so doing, he must deprive the sooty Paris, who sought his
hovel, of every opportunity for the prosecution of his design.
With that morbid wilfulness of temper which marks the passions
of man aroused beyond the restraints of right reason, he
determined
that the negro should have his opportunity; and, changing
his plans, he set forth the next morning before day-peep, obviously
for the purpose of hunting. But he did not remain long absent.
He was fortunate enough just after leaving his cabin to shoot a
fat wild turkey from his roost, on the edge of a little
bay
that
stood about a mile from his camp; and with this on his shoulder,
he returned stealthily to its neighbourhood, and, hiding himself in
the covert, took such a position as enabled him to keep a keen
watch over his premises and all the movements of Caloya.
Until
ten o'clock in the day he saw nothing to produce
dissatisfaction
or to alarm his fears. He saw the patient woman come
forth according to custom, and proceed instantly to the Red
Gulley
,
where she resumed her tasks, which she pursued with quite
as much industry, and, seemingly, much more cheerfulness than
when she knew that he was watching. Her lips even broke forth
into song while she pursued her tasks, though the strain was
monotonous
and the sentiment grave and melancholy. At ten o'clock,
however, Knuckle's ague returned as he saw the negro make
his appearance with wonted punctuality. The Indian laid his
heaviest shaft upon the string of his bow, and awaited the
progress
of events. The movements of Mingo were made with due
circumspection. He did not flatter himself, at first, that the field
was clear, and looked round him with grave anxiety in
momentary
expectation of seeing the husband. His salutation of the
wife was sufficiently distant and deferential. He began by
asking
after the chief, and received an answer equally cold and
unsatisfactory
.
He gathered from this answer, however, that
Knuckles was absent; but whether at a distance or at hand, or
for how long a period, were important items of intelligence, which,
as yet, he failed to compass; and it was only by a close
cross-examination
of the witness that he arrived at the conclusion, that
Knuckles had at length resumed the duties of the hunter. Even
this conclusion reached him in a negative and imperfect form.
Shall Ingin woman say to Ingin man, when he shall hunt and
where, and how long he shall be gone? demanded the woman in
reply to the eager questioning of the negro.
Certainly not, most angelical! was the elevated response of
the black, as his lips parted into smiles, and his eyes shot forth
the glances of warmer admiration than ever. The arrow of
Knuckles trembled meanwhile upon the string.
Certainly not, most angelical!but Ingin man, ef he lob
and respects Indian woman, will tell her all about his consarns
without her axing. I'm sure, most lubly Caloya, ef you was wife
of mine, you should know all my outgivings and incomings, my
journeyings and
backslidings,
to and fro,my ways and my
wishes;there shouldn't be nothing that I wouldn't let you know.
But there's a mighty difference, you see, twixt an old husband
and a young one. Now, an old man like Knuckles, he's mighty
closehe don't talk out his mind like a young fellow that's full
of infectionsa young fellow like me, that knows how to look
'pon a handsome young wife, and treat her with proper
respectableness
.
Do you think now, ef you was wife of mine, that I'd
let you do all that work by yourself? No! not for all the pots
and jars twixt this and Edisto forks! Ef I did ask you to do the
pans, and round 'em, and smooth 'em, and put the red stain 'pon
em, why that wouldn't be onreasonable, you see, 'cause sich
delical
PART II. 12
and slim fingers as woman's has, kin always manage them
despects better than man'sbut then, I'd dig the clay for you,
my galI'd work it, ef I hadn't horse, I'd work it with my own
legsI'd pile it up 'pon the board, and cut the wood to make the
fire, and help you to burn it; and when all was done, I'd bend
my own shoulders to the load, and you should follow me to
Charleston, like a Lady, as you is. That's the way, my gal, that
I'd treat wife of mine. But Ingin don't know much 'bout
woman
,
and old Ingin don't care;now, black Gempleman always
has strong infections for the seckhe heart is tenderhe eye is
lub for look 'pon beautyhe hab soul for consider 'em in de right
way, and when he sees 'em bright eye, and smood, shiny skin,
and white teet', and long arm, and slender wais', and glossy black
hair, same like you's, ah, Caloya, he strengt' is melt away widin
'em, and he feels like not'ing only so much honey, lub and
infections
.
He's all over infections, as I may say. Wha' you tink?
Here the Driver paused, not so much from having nothing more
to say, as from a lack of the necessary breath with which to say
it. Knuckles heard every word, though it would be an error to
assume that he understood one half. Still, the liquorish
expression
in the face of the negro sufficiently illustrated his meaning,
to satisfy the husband that the whole speech was pregnant with
the most audacious kind of impertinence. The reflection upon
his weight of years, and the exulting reference to his own
youth and manhood, which Mingo so adroitly introduced, was,
however, sufficiently intelligible and insulting to the Catawba,
and he hesitated whether to draw the arrow to its head at once
and requite this second Paris for his affront, even in the midst of
it, or to await until farther wrong should yield him a more
perfect
justification for the deed. He reflected upon the danger of
the attempt, and his resolution was already taken as to the mode
and direction of his flight. But a morbid wish to involve Caloya
in the same fatea lingering desire to find a sanction in her
weakness and guilt for all his own frequent injustice and
brutality
,
determined him to await her answer, and see to what
extremities
the negro would be permitted to carry his presumption.
Strange to say, the answer of the wife, which was such as must
have satisfied a husband that loved truly, gave him no
gratification
.
Black man is too foolish! said the woman with equal
brevity
and scorn in reply to the long speech of the Driver.
Don't say so, most lubly of all the Catawba galsyou don't
mean what you say for sartain. Look youyer is as nice a
pullet as ever was roasted, and yer is some hard biled eggs, and
hoecake. I reckon that old fellow, your husband, aint brung in
your breckkus yet; so you must be mighty hungry by this time,
and there's no better stay-stomach in the worl than hard biled
eggs. It's a mighty hard thing to work tell the sun stands atop
of your head, afore getting any thing to go 'pon: I guessed how
'twould be, and so I
brung
you these few eatables.
He set down a small basket as he spoke, but the woman did
not seem to perceive it, and manifested no sort of disposition to
avail herself of his gift and invitation.
What! you wont take a bite?
Enefisto will thank you when he come, was the answer,
coldly spoken, and the woman toiled more assiduously, while she
spoke, at her potteries.
Enefisto!oh, that's only an Ingin name for Knuckles, I
s'pose. But who care for him, Caloya? Sure, you don't care
'bout an old fellow like thatfellow that makes you work and
gives you not eben dry hominey? Prehaps, you're feard he'll
beat you; but don't you feardneber he kin lay heaby hand
'pon you, so long as Mingo is yer.
Could Mingo have seen the grin which appeared upon the
mouth of the Indian as he heard these words, and have seen the
deliberateness with which he thrice lifted the shaft and thrust its
point between the leaves so as to bear upon his heart, he might
have distrusted his own securities and strength, and have learned
to be more respectful in estimating the powers of his foe. But
the Indian seemed to content himself with being in a state of
preparedness
and in having possession of the entire field. He did
not shoot; his worse feelings remained unsatisfiedhe saw nothing
in the deportment of Caloya which could feed the morbid passion
which prevailed over all others in his breast, and he probably
forbore wreaking his malice upon the one victim, in hopes that
by a little delay he might yet secure another.
Black man is too foolish. Why he no go to his work?
Catawba woman is do her work.
And I will help you, my gal. It's mighty hard to do all by
you self, so here goes. Lor', if I was your husband, Caloya,
instead of that old fellow, Knuckles, you should be a ladyI'd
neber let you touch a pot or a pan, and you should hab a frock
all ob seersuck jist like this.
As the negro spoke, he threw off his hunting shirt, which he
cast over a bush behind him, rolled up his shirt sleeves,
displaying
his brawny and well made arms to the womanperhaps the
chief motive for his present gallant proceedingand, advancing to
the pile of clay in which Caloya was working, thrust his hands into
the mass and began to knead with all the energy of a baker,
striving
with his dough. The woman shrank back from her place,
as she received this new accession of labour, and much to the
annoyance
of Mingo, retired to a little distance, where she seemed
to contemplate his movements in equal surprise and
dissatisfaction
.
Meanwhile, a change had taken place in the mood and
movements of Knuckles. The sight of the gaudy garment which
Mingo had hung upon the myrtle bushes behind him, awakened
the cupidity of the Catawba. For a time, a stronger passion than
jealousy seized his mind, and he yearned to be the possessor of a
shirt which he felt assured would be the envy of the tribe. It
hung in his eyes like a fascinationhe no longer saw Caloya
he no longer heeded the movements of the negro who had been
meditating so great an injury to his honour and peace of mind;
and, so long as the bright stripes of the seersucker kept waving
before him, he forgot all his own deeply meditated purposes of
vengeance. The temptation at last became irresistible. With the
stealthy movement of his race, he rose quietly from the spot
where he had been lurking, sank back in the depths of the woods
behind him, and, utterly unheard, unobserved and unsuspected
by either of the two in front, he succeeded in making a compass,
still under cover, which brought him in the rear of the myrtles
on which the coat was suspended. Meanwhile, Mingo, with his
face to the kneading trough, and his back upon the endangered
garment, was in the full stream of a new flood of eloquence, and
the favourite Seersucker disappeared in the rapid grasp of the
husband
,
while he was most earnest, though at a respectful distance,
in an endeavour to deprive the Indian of a yet dearer possession.
In this aim his arguments and entreaties were equally fond and
impudent; and with his arms buried to the elbows in the clay,
and working the rigid mass as if life itself depended upon it, he
was pouring forth a more unctuous harangue than ever, when,
suddenly
looking up to the spot where Caloya had retreated, his eye
rested only upon the woods. The woman had disappeared from
sight. He had been wasting his sweetness on the desert air
he had been talking to the wind only. Of this, at first, he was not
so perfectly assured.
Hello! he exclaimed, Whare you gone, Caloya? Hello
hello! Whoowhoowhoop!
He waited in silence until he became convinced that his
responses
were those only of the echo.
Can't be! he exclaimed, can't be, he gone and lef' me in
de middle of my talking! Caloya, Caloya,Hello, gal! hello!
whay you day? Whoo! whoop!
Utter silence followed the renewal of his summons. He stuck
his fingers, coated as they were with clay, into his wiry shock of
woola not unfrequent habit with the negro when in a quandary,
and, could the blushes of one of his colour have been seen, those
of Mingo would have been found of a scarlet beyond all
comparison
as the conviction forced itself upon him, that he was laughed
at and deserted.
Cuss de woman! he exclaimed, wha make me lub em so.
But he mus'nt tink for git 'way from me wid dis sort of
acceedint
.
'Speck he can't be too fur; ef he day in dese woods
wha' for keep me from fin' 'em. As for he husband, better he
no meet me now. Ef he stan' in my way tree minutes, I'll
tumble
em sure as a stone.
Thus soliloquizing, he darted into the woods, traversing every
opening and peeping behind every bush and tree for a goodly
hour, but without success. Man and wife had disappeared with
a success and secrecy equally inscrutable. Breathless and
angry
he emerged once more, and stood within the camp. His
anger
put on the aspect of fury, and disappointment became
desperation
.
He looked round for the dog, intending to renew the
flogging which he had administered on the first day of his
acquaintance
,
and in bestowing which he had been so seasonably
interrupted
by the owner; but the cur had departed also; and no
signs remained of any intention on the part of the squatters to
resume their temporary lodging place, but the rude specimens of
clay manufacture, some two dozen pots and pans, which stood under
a rude shelter of twigs and bushes, immediately adjoining the
wigwam
.
These, with foot and fist, Mingo demolished, trampling, with
the ingenious pains-taking of a wilful boy, the yet unhardened
vases out of all shape and character into the earth on which they
rested. Having thus vented his spleen and displayed a less
noble
nature than he usually pretended to, the driver proceeded to
resume his coat, in mood of mind as little satisfied with what he
had done in his anger as with the disappointment that had
provoked
it. But here a new wonder and vexation awaited him.
His fingers again recurred to his head, but no scratching of which
they were capable, could now keep him from the conviction that
there was magic in the web of it. He looked and lingered,
but he was equally unsuccessful in the search after his hunting
shirt, as for his good humour. He retired from the ground in some
doubt whether it was altogether safe for him to return to a spot
in which proceedings of so mysterious a character had taken
place. All the events in connection with his new acquaintance
began to assume a startling and marvellous character in his
eyes;the lazy dog;the old husband of a wife so young and
lovely! What could be more strange or unnatural! But her
flighther sudden disappearance, and that too at a time when he
was employing those charms of speech which heretofore had
never proved ineffectual! Mingo jumped to the conclusion that
Knuckles was a Catawba wizard, and he determined to have
nothing more to do with him:a determination which he
maintained
only until the recollection of Caloya's charms made him
resolve, at all hazards, to screen her from so ugly an enchanter.
CHAPTER IX.
But
a little time had passed after Mingo had left the camp
when Knuckles returned to it. He approached with stealthy
pace, keeping himself under cover until he found that the
enemy
had departed. During the search which the Driver had
made after himself and wife, he had been a quiet observer of all
his movements. He fancied that the search was instituted for
the recovery of the hunting shirt, and did not dream that his
wife had left the ground as well as himself to the single
possession
of the visitor. When he returned and found her gone,
his first impression was that she had departed with the negro.
But a brief examination of their several footsteps, soon removed
his suspicions and enabled him to pursue the route which the
woman had taken on leaving the camp. He found her without
difficulty, as she came forward, at his approach, from the copse
in which she had concealed herself. He encountered her with
the bitterest language of suspicion and denunciation. His
jealousy
had suffered no decrease in consequence of his failure to
find cause for it; but fattening from what it fed onhis own
consciousness
of unworthinessthe conviction that he did not
deserve
and could not please one, so far superior and so much
younger than himselfvented itself in coarse charges and
vindictive
threats. With the patience of Griselda, the Catawba
woman followed him in silence to the camp, where they soon
found cause for new affliction in the discovery which they there
made, of the manner in which the disappointed Driver had vented
his fury upon their wares. The wrath of Knuckles increased at
this discovery, though it did not, as it should have done, lead to
any abatement of his jealous feeling towards his wife. Perhaps,
on the contrary, it led to the farther proceeding of extremity,
which he now meditated, and which he began to unfold to her
ears. We forbear the unnecessary preliminaries in the
conversation
which followed between them, and which were given
simply
to a re-assertion, on his part, of old and groundless charges,
and on hers of a simple and effortless denial of them. Her final
reply, spoken of course in her own language, to the reiterated
accusation, was such as to show that even the exemplary patience
which she had hitherto manifested was beginning to waver.
There was something in it to sting the worthless old sinner, not
with a feeling of remorse, but of shame and vexation.
If Enefisto loves not the black man, wherefore does he take
the meat which he brings, and the poison drink from his bottle?
If he loves not the black man, wherefore takes he the garment
which wrapt his limbs? Caloya loves not the black man, and
has eaten none of his meat, has drank none of his poison water,
and has stolen none of his garments. Let Enefisto cast the shirt
over the myrtles, and now, now, let the woman go back to seek
her people that camp on the waters of the Edisto. Caloya looks
not where the black man sits; Caloya sees not where he stands,
and hears not when he speaks. Caloya hears only a snake's hissing
in her ears. Enefisto believes not the woman, and she cares not
much to speak;but let him take up the hatchet and the bow, and
she will follow where he leads. Let her go to her people, where
there is no black man. She would not stay at the `Red
Gulley
,'
where the black man comes.
But she would go to the Edisto where is Chickawa? Hah!
Caloya shall stay by the `Red Gulley,' where is Enefistoshe
shall not go to the Edisto where is Chickawa. Enefisto sees;
Enefisto knows.
Ah, and Caloya knows! Caloya knows! Enefisto sees
Chickawa and the nigger Mingo every where. But let Enefisto
take up his hatchet and go from this place. See, pointing to
the broken pottery, there is nothing to stay for. The nigger
will break the pans when she makes them.
Enefisto will take up the hatchet,he will drive it into the
head of the nigger. He will not go where Caloya may see
Chickawa
.
She shall stay by the `Red Gulley,' and when Mingo, the
nigger comes, she shall smile upon him. She shall go into the
wigwam. Then will he go to her in the wigwamHah?
What would Enefisto? demanded the squaw in some
consternation
at this seeming and very sudden change in the
disposition
of her spouse.
Mingo will say to Caloya, `come, old man is gone hunting,
come. Am I not here for Caloya, come. I love Caloya, let
Caloya love Mingo, come!'
But Caloya hates Mingo, Caloya will spit upon the nigger!
was the indignant exclamation.
Oh, no, no! was the almost musical and certainly wild
reply
of the husband, while a savage smile of scorn and suspicion
covered his features. Caloya knows not what she saysshe
means not what she says. Nigger is young manEnefisto is old
man. Nigger hab good meatEnefisto is old hunter, he cannot
see where the deer sleep, he cannot follow the deer in a long
chase, for his legs grow weary. Caloya loves young man who
can bring her 'nough venison and fine clothes, hah? Let Caloya
go into the wigwam, and nigger will say `come,' and Caloya will
come.
Never!' was the indignant answer. Caloya will never
come to the niggerCaloya will never come to Chickawa. Let
Enefisto strike the hatchet into the head of Caloya, for his words
make her very wretched. It is better she should die.
Caloya shall live to do the will of Enefisto. She shall go
where Mingo comes into the wigwam, and when he shall follow
her, she shall stay and look upon him face to face. Mingo is
young,Caloya loves to look upon young man. When he shall
put his hand upon the shoulder of Caloya then shall Caloya put
her hand upon his. So shall it bethus says Enefisto.
Wherefore shall it be so?
Thus says Enefisto. Will Caloya say no?
Let Enefisto kill Caloya ere her hand rests upon the shoulder
of Mingo. The hatchet of Enefisto
Shall sink into the head of the nigger, when his hand is upon
the shoulder of Caloya.
Ha!
It is done. Does Caloya hear?
She hears.
Will she go into the wigwam when Mingo comes?
She will go.
And when he follows her,when he puts his hand upon her
shoulder, and looks, Ha! ha! ha!looks thus, thus, into her
eyeshis own assumed an expression, or he strove at that
moment
to make them assume an expression of the most wilful love,
an attempt in which he signally failed, for hate, scorn and
jealousy predominating still, gave him a most ghastly aspect,
from which the woman shrunk with horrorwhen he looks
thus into her eyes, then will Caloya put her hand upon the
shoulder
of Mingo and hold him fast till the hatchet of Enefisto goes
deep into his head. Will Caloya do this,Ha? Will Caloya
look on him thus, and grasp him thus, until Enefisto shall strike
him thus, thus, thus, till there shall be no more life in his
forehead
?
A moment's pause ensued, ere the woman spoke.
Let Enefisto give the hatchet to Caloya. Caloya will herself
strike him in the head if he goes after her into the wigwam.
No! Caloya shall not. Enefisto will strike. Caloya shall
grasp him on the shoulder. Enefisto will see by this if Caloya
loves not that the black man should seek her always in the
wigwam
of the chief. Is Caloya readywill she do this thing?
Caloya is readyshe will do it.
Ha! ha!black man is foolish to come to the camp of
Enefisto
,
and look on the woman of Enefisto. He shall die.
CHAPTER X.
Mingo Gillison
almost stumbled over his young master that
morning, as he was returning home from his visit so full of
strange and unwonted incidents. The latter was about to visit
the camp of the squatters in compliance with his promise to that
effect, when diverted from his intention by the intelligence which
the negro gave him, that the Indians were gone from home.
Somehow, it seemed to Mingo Gillison, that it was no part of his
present policy that his master should see the intruders. A
consciousness
of guilta conviction that he had not been the faithful
custodian of the interests given to his charge, and that, in some
respects, they had suffered detriment at his hands, made him
jealously apprehensive that the mere visit of his owner to the
Red Gulley, would bring his defection to light.
But where's your coat, Mingo? was the natural question
of Colonel Gillison, the moment after meeting him. Mingo was
as ready as any other lover at a lie, and taking for granted that
Jove would laugh at this, quite as generously as at a more
dangerous
perjury, he told a long cock-and-a-bull story about his
having had it torn to such a degree in hunting cattle the evening
before, as to put it beyond the power of recovery by the
seamstress
.
A handsome coat, too, Mingo: I must give you another.
Mingo was gratified and expressed his acknowledgments quite
as warmly as it was in his power to do under the feeling of shame
and undesert which at that moment oppressed him. His master
did not fail to see that something had occurred to lessen the
assurance
of his driver, and diminish the emphasis and abridge the
eloquence of his usual speech, but being of an inert disposition of
mind, he was not curious enough to seek the solution of a
circumstance
which, though strange, was unimportant. They
separated
after a few inquiries on the part of the latter, touching
various plantation topics, to all of which the answers of Mingo
were uttered with a sufficient degree of readiness and boldness to
make them satisfactory. The master returned to the residence,
while Mingo went off to the negro quarter to meditate how to
circumvent Richard Knuckles, and win the smiles of his handsome
but haughty wife.
It was probably two hours after the supper things had been
removed
,
that the youthful proprietor of the estate of which Mingo
held the highly important office in the duties of which we have
seen him busy, was startled by the easy opening of the door of
the apartment in which he sat, groping through the newspapers
of the day, and, immediately after, by the soft treat of a female
footstep, heedfully set down upon the floor. He turned at the
unusual
interruption, for it may as well be stated passingly, that
young Gillison had set out in life with notions of such inveterate
bachelorship that his domestic establishment was not suffered to
be invaded by any of the opposite sex in any capacity. It is not
improbable, that, later in life, his rigour in this respect, may have
undergone some little relaxation, but as we are concerned with
present events only, it will be no object with us either to
speculate
upon or to inquire into the future. Sufficient for the day is
the evil thereof. Enough for us that his present regulations were
such as we have here declared them, and had been laid down with
so much emphasis in his household, on coming to his estate, that
he turned upon the servant,for such he assumed the intruder
to bewith the determination to pour forth no stinted measure of
anger upon the rash person who had shown herself so heedless of
his commands.
The reader will be pleased to express no surprise, when we tell
him that the nocturnal visitant of our young bachelor was no other
than the Indian woman, Caloya. She had threaded her way, after
nightfall, through all the mazes of the plantation, and, undiscovered
and unnoticed, even by the watch dog who lay beneath the porch,
had penetrated into the mansion and into the presence of its
master
.
She had probably never been in the same neighbourhood
before, but with that sagacity,we might almost deem it an
instinct
which
distinguishes the North American Indian, probably,
beyond all other people,she had contrived to elude every
habitation
which lay between the Red Gulley and the
dwelling-house
to
avoid contact with the negro houses of fifty slaves, and
keep herself concealed from all observation, until that moment
when she pleased to discover herself. The surprise of Gillison
was natural enough. He rose, however, as soon as he was
conscious
that the intruder was stranger, and perceiving her to be
an Indian, he readily concluded that she must be one of the
squatters
at the Red Gulley, of whom the eloquent Mingo had given
him such emphatic warning. With that due regard for the sex
which always distinguishes the true gentleman, even when the
particular object which calls for it may be debased and inferior,
Gillison motioned her to a chair, and, with a countenance
expressing
no other feelings than those of kindness and consideration,
inquired
into her wants and wishes. His language, to one of a tribe
whom it is customary to regard as thieves and beggars, would
have proved him to be something less hostile to the sex, than his
household regulations would altogether seem to indicate.
Caloya advanced with firmness, and even dignity, into the
apartment
.
Her deportment was equally respectful and unconstrained.
Her face was full of sadness, however, and when she spoke, it
might have been observed that her tones were rather more
tremulous
than usual. She declined the proffered seat, and proceeded
to her business with the straightforward simplicity of one having
a single purpose. She began by unfolding a small bundle which
she carried beneath her arm, and in which, when unrolled and
laid upon the table, Col. Gillison fancied he discovered a strong
family likeness to that hunting shirt of his driver, of the fate of
which he had received such melancholy intelligence a few hours
before. But for the particularity of Mingo, in describing the
rents and rips, the slits and slashes of his favourite garment, the
youthful proprietor would have rashly jumped to the conclusion
that this had been the same. His large confidence in the
veracity
of Mingo, left him rather unprepared for the narrative which
followed. In this narrative, Caloya did not exhibit the greatest
degree of tenderness towards the amorous driver. She freely
and fully declared all the particulars of his forced intimacy with
herself and husband from the beginning; and though, with
instinctive
feminine delicacy, she suppressed every decided overture
which the impudent Mingo had made to herself
par amours,
still
there was enough shown, to enable his master to see the daring
game which his driver, had been playing. Nor, in this
narrative
,
did the woman omit to inform him of the hams and eggs, the
chickens and the corn, which had been brought by the devoted
negro in tribute to her charms. Up to this point, the story had
assumed
none but a ludicrous aspect in the sight of the young
planter. The petty appropriations of his property of which
Mingo
had been guilty, did not awaken any very great degree of
indignation
,
and, with the levity of youth, he did not seem to regard
in the serious light which it merited, the wanton pursuit and
lascivious
purposes of the driver. But as the woman quietly
proceeded
in her narrative, and described the violence which had
destroyed her pottery, the countenance of the master darkened.
This act seemed one of such determined malignity, that he inly
determined to punish it severely. The next statement of Caloya
led him to do more justice to virtue, and make a darker estimate
yet of the doings of his driver. She did not tell him that her
husband
was jealous, but she unfolded the solemn requisition which
he had last made of her to secure the arms of Mingo in her
embrace
,
while he revenged himself for the insults to which he had
been subjected with the sharp edge of the hatchet. The young
planter started as he heard the statement. His eye was fixed
intently
and inquiringly upon the calm, resolute, and seemingly
frozen features of the speaker. She ceased to speak, and the
pause of a few seconds followed ere Gillison replied:
But you and your husband surely mean not to murder the
fellow, my good woman? He has done wrong and I will have
him punished; but you must not think to use knife and hatchet
upon him.
When Enefisto says `strike' to CaloyaCaloya will strike!
Caloya is the woman of Enefisto. Let not Mingo come into the
wigwam of the Indian.
Gillison could not doubt her resolution as he heard the
deliberate
and subdued accents of her voice, and surveyed the
composed
features of her countenance. The determination to do the
bidding of her husband was there expressed in language the least
equivocal. His own countenance was troubled; he had not
resolved what course to pursue, and the woman, having fulfilled
her mission, was about to depart. She had brought back the
stolen coat, though, with the proper tenderness of a wife, she
omitted to say that it had been stolen. According to her story
Mingo had left it behind him on the myrtles. Her second object
had been to save the driver from his fate, and no more effectual
mode suggested itself to her mind than by revealing the whole
truth to the master. This had been done and she had no further
cause to stay. The young planter, after he had instituted a series
of inquiries from which he ascertained what were the usual
periods when Mingo visited the encampment, how he made his
approaches, and in what manner the hovel was built, and where
it lay, did not seek to delay her longer. His own knowledge of
the Red Gulleya knowledge obtained in boyhoodenabled
him to form a very correct notion of all the circumstances of the
place; and to determine upon the particulars of a plan which
had risen in his mind, by which to save his driver from the
danger which threatened him. This done, he begged her to await
for a few moments his return, while he ascended to an upper
chamber, from whence he brought and offered her a piece of
bright calico, such as he well knew would be apt to provoke the
admiration of an Indian woman; but she declined it, shaking her
head mournfully as she did so, and moving off hurriedly as if to
lose the temptation from her sight as quickly as possible.
Gillison
fancied there was quite as much of despondency as pride in
her manner of refusing the gift. It seemed to say that she had
no heart for such attractions now. Such indeed was the true
exposition of her feelings. What pride could she have in
gorgeous
apparel, allied to one so brutal, so cruel, so worthless as
her husband; and why should she care for such display, when,
by his jealous policy, she was withdrawn from all connection
with her people, in whose eyes alone she might desire to appear
attractive. But the young planter was not to be refused. He
would have forced the gift upon her, and when she suffered it to
drop at her feet, he expressed himself in words of remonstrance,
the tones of which were, perhaps, of more influence than the sense.
Why not take the stuff, my good woman? You have well
deserved it, and much more at my hands. If you do not take it,
I will think you believe me to be as bad as Mingo.
She looked at him with some earnestness for a few seconds,
then stooping, picked up the bundle, and immediately placed it
beneath her arm.
No, no! she said, white man is good. Black man is bad.
Does the master remember? Let not Mingo come into the
wigwam
of Enefisto.
Colonel Gillison promised that he would endeavour to prevent
any further mischief, and, with a sad smile of gratitude upon her
countenance, the woman retired from his presence as stealthily as
she came. He had enjoined her, if possible, to avoid being seen
on leaving the settlement, and it was not hard for one of Catawba
birth to obey so easy an injunction. She succeeded in gaining
the Red Gulley undiscovered, but there, to her consternation,
who should she encounter, at the very first glance, but the
impudent
and formidable Mingo, sitting, cheek-by-jowl, with her
jealous husband, each, seemingly, in a perfect mood of equal
and christian amity. It was a sight to gratify the credulous, but
Caloya was not one of these.
CHAPTER XI.
Meanwhile,
the youthful master of the veteran Mingo,
meditated
in the silence of his hall, the mode by which to save that
amorous personage from the threatened consequences of his
impertinence. Not that he felt any desire to screen the fellow
from chastisement. Had he been told that husband and wife had
simply resolved to scourge him with many stripes, he would have
struck hands and cried cheer as loudly as any more indifferent
spectator. But the vengeance of the Catawba Othello, promised
to be of a character far too extreme, and, the inferior moral sense
and sensibility of both Indian and negro considered, too greatly
disproportioned
to the offence. It was therefore necessary that what
he proposed to do should be done quickly; and, taking his hat,
Colonel Gillison sallied forth to the negro quarter, in the centre
of which stood the superior habitation of the Driver. His object
was simply to declare to the unfaithful servant that his evil
designs and deeds were discovered, as well by himself as by the
Catawbato promise him the due consequences of his falsehood
to himself, and to warn him of what he had to fear, in the event
of his again obtruding upon the privacy of the squatters. To
those who insist that the working classes in the South should enjoy
the good things of this world in as bountiful a measure as the
wealthy proprietors of the soil, it would be very shocking to see
that they lived poorly, in dwellings which, though rather better than
those of the Russian boor, are yet very mean in comparison with
those built by Stephen Girard, John Jacob Astor, and persons of that
calibre. Nay, it would be monstrous painful to perceive that the
poor negroes are constantly subjected to the danger of ophthalmic
and other diseases, from the continued smokes in which they live,
the fruit of those liberal fires which they keep up at all seasons, and
which the more fortunate condition of the poor in the free States,
does not often compel them to endure at any. It would not
greatly lessen the evil of this cruel destiny, to know that each
PART II. 13
had his house to himself, exclusively; that he had his little garden
plat around it, and that his cabbages, turnips, corn and potatoes,
not to speak of his celery, his salad, &c., are, in half the number
of cases, quite as fine as those which appear on his master's
table. Then, his poultry-yard, and pig-penare they not there
also?but then, it must be confessed that his stock is not quite
so large as his owner's, and there, of course, the parallel must
fail. He has one immunity, however, which is denied to the
owner. The hawk, (to whose unhappy door most disasters of the
poultry yard are referred,) seldom troubles his chickenshis
hens lay more numerously than his master's, and the dogs always
prefer to suck the eggs of a white rather than those of a black
proprietor. These, it is confessed, are very curious facts,
inscrutable
,
of course, to the uninitiated; and, in which the irreverent
and sceptical alone refuse to perceive any legitimate cause of
wonder. You may see in his hovel and about it, many little
additaments which, among the poor of the South, are vulgarly
considered
comforts; with the poor of other countries, however, as
they are seldom known to possess them, they are no doubt
regarded as burthens, which it might be annoying to take care of
and oppressive to endure. A negro slave not only has his own
dwelling, but he keeps a plentiful fire within it for which he pays
no taxes. That he lives upon the fat of the land you may readily
believe, since he is proverbially much fatter himself than the
people of any other class. He has his own grounds for
cultivation
,
and, having a taste for field sports, he keeps his own dog for
the chasean animal always of very peculiar characteristics,
some of which we shall endeavour one day to analyse and
develope
.
He is as hardy and cheerful as he is fat, and, but for one
thing, it might be concluded safely that his condition was very
far before that of the North American Indianhis race is more
prolific, and, by increasing rather than diminishing, multiply
necessarily, and unhappily the great sinfulness of mankind.
This, it is true, is sometimes urged as a proof of improving
civilization
,
but then, every justly-minded person must agree with
Miss Martineau, that it is dreadfully immoral. We suspect we
have been digressing.
Col. Gillison soon reached the negro quarter, and tapping at the
door of the Driver's wigwam, was admitted, after a brief
parley
,
by the legitimate spouse of that gallant. Mingo had been
married to Diana, by the Reverend Jonathan Buckthorn, a
preacher of the Methodist persuasion, who rode a large circuit,
and had travelled, with praiseworthy charity, all the way from
Savannah River, in all weathers, and on a hard going nag, simply
to unite this worthy couple in the holy bonds of wedlock. At
that time, both the parties were devout members of the Church,
but they suffered from frequent lapses; and Mingo, having been
engaged in sundry
liaisons
which, however creditable to, and
frequent among the French, Italian and English nobility, are
highly censurable in a slave population, and a decisive proof of
the demoralizing tendency of such an institutionwas, at the
formal complaint of the wife, suspended from the enjoyment
of the Communion Table, and finally, on a continuance of this
foreign and fashionable practice, fully expelled from all the
privileges
of the brotherhood. Diana had been something of a
termagant, but Mingo had succeeded in outstorming her. For
the first six months after marriage, the issue was considered
very doubtful; but a decisive battle took place at the close of
that period, in which the vigorous woman was compelled to give
in and Mingo remained undisputed master of the field. But
though overthrown and conquered, she was not quiescent; and
her dissatisfaction at the result, showed itself in repeated
struggles
,
which, however, were too convulsive and transient, to render
necessary any very decided exercise of the husband's energies.
She growled and grumbled still, without cessation, and though
she did not dare to resent his frequent infidelities, she
nevertheless
pursued them with an avidity, and followed the movements
of her treacherous lord with a jealous watchfulness, which proved
that she did not the less keenly feel them. Absolute fear alone
made her restrain the fury which was yet boiling and burning in
her soul. When her master declared his desire to see Mingo,
what was her answer? Not, certainly, that of a very dutiful or
well satisfied spouse.
Mingo, mossa? Whay him dey? Ha! mossa, you bes'ax
ebbry woman on de plantation 'fore you come to he own wife. I
bin marry to Mingo by Parson Buckthorn, and de Parson bin make
Mingo promis' for lub and 'bey me, but he forget all he promise
tree day after we bin man and wife. He nebber bin lub 't all;
and as for 'bey,lor' ha' massy 'pon me, mossa, I speak noting
but de trute when I tell you,he 'bey ebbry woman from yer to
town 'fore he 'bey he own dear wife. Der's not a woman, mossa,
'pon de tree plantation, he aint lub more dan Di. Sometime he
gone to Misser Jacks placehe hab wife dere! Sometime he
gone to Misser Gabeauhe hab wife dere! Nex' time, he gone
to Squir' Collins,he hab wife dere! Whay he no hab wife,
mossa? Who can tell? He hab wife ebbry which whay, and
now, he no
sacrify,
he goneyou aint gwine to bleeb me, mossa,
I know you ainthe gone and look for wife at Indian camp,
whay down by de `Red Gulley.' De trute is, mossa, Mingo is a
mos' powerful black rascal of a nigger as ebber lib on gentleman
plantation.
It was fortunate for young Gillison that he knew something of
the nature of a termagant wife, and could make allowances for
the injustice of a jealous one. He would otherwise have been
persuaded by what he heard that his driver was one of the most
uncomely of all the crow family. Though yielding no very
credulous faith to the complaints of Diana, he still found it
impossible
to refuse to hear them; and all that he could do by dint of
perseverance, was to diminish the long narratives upon which she
was prepared to enter to prove her liege lord to be no better than
he should be. Having exhausted all his efforts and his patience
in the attempt to arrive at some certain intelligence of the
husband's
whereabouts, without being able to divert the stream of
her volubility from the accustomed channels, he concluded by
exclaiming
Well, dn the fellow, let him take the consequences. He
stands a chance of having his throat cut before twenty-four hours
are over, and you will then be at liberty, Di., to get a husband
who will be more faithful. Should Mingo not see me by ten
o'clock to-morrow, he's a dead man. So, you had better stir
your stumps, my good woman, and see after him, unless you are
willing to be a widow before you have found out a better man for
your husband. Find Mingo and send him to me to-night, or he's
a dead man to-morrow.
Le' 'em deadwho care? He d'zarb for dead. I sure he
no care if Di bin dead twenty tousand time. Le' 'em dead!
Gillison left the hut and proceeded to other parts of the
settlement
where he thought it not improbable that the driver might be
found; but a general ignorance was professed by all the negroes
with respect to the particular movements of that worthy; and he
soon discovered that his search was fruitless. He gave it up in
despair, trusting that he should be able to succeed better at an
hour seasonably early in the morning, yet half disposed, from
his full conviction of his roguery, to leave the fellow to his fate.
Strange to say, such was not the determination of the
dissatisfied
Diana. Wronged and neglected as she had been, and was,
there was still a portion of the old liking left, which had first
persuaded her to yield her youthful affections to the keeping of
this reckless wooer; and though she had avowed her willingness
to her young master, that the powerful black rascal of a nigger
should go to the dogs, and be dog's meat in twenty-four hours,
still, better feelings came back to her, after due reflection, to soften
her resolves. Though not often blessed with his kind words and
pleasant looks, now-a-days, still, she could not but remember
such things were, and were most percious to her.
Left to herself, she first began to repeat the numberless
conjugal
offences of which he had been guilty; but the memory of
these offences did not return alone. She remembered that these
offences brought with them an equal number of efforts at
atonement
on the part of the offender; and when she thought of his
vigorous frame, manly, dashing and graceful carriage, his
gorgeous
coat, his jauntily worn cap, his white teeth, and the
insinuating
smile of his voluminous lips, she could not endure the idea
of such a man being devoted to a fate so short and sudden as that
which her young master had predicted. She had not been told, it is
true, from what quarter this terrible fate was to approach. She
knew not under what aspect it would come, but the sincerity of her
master was evident in his looks, words, and general air of anxiety,
and she was convinced that there was truth in his assurance.
Perhaps
,
her own attachment for the faithless husbanddisguised as
it was by her continual grumbling and discontentwas sufficiently
strong to bring about this conviction easily. Diana determined
to save her husband, worthless and wicked as he was,and
possibly
,
some vague fancy may have filled her mind as she came
to this resolution, that, gratitude alone, for so great a service,
might effect a return of the false one to that allegiance which
love had hitherto failed to secure. She left her dwelling to seek
him within half an hour after the departure of her master. But
the worst difficulty in her way was the first. She trembled with
the passion of returning jealousy when she reflected that the most
likely place to find him would be at the Red Gulley in instant
communion with a hateful rivala red Indiana dingy squaw,
whose colour, neither white nor black, was of that sort, which,
according to Diana in her jealous mood, neither gods nor men
ought to endure. Her husband's admiration she naturally
ascribed
to Catawba witchcraft. She doubtedshe hesitatedshe
almost re-resolved against the endeavour. Fortunately, however,
her better feelings prevailed. She resolved to go forwardto
save her husbandbut, raising her extended hands and parted
fingers, as she came to this determination, and gnashing her teeth
with vindictive resolution as she spoke, she declared her equal
resolve to compensate herself for so great a charity, by sinking
her ten claws into the cheeks of any copper coloured damsel
whom she should discover at the Red Gulley in suspicious
propinquity
with that gay deceiver whom she called her lord.
Having thus, with due solemnity, registered her oath in Heaven
and she was not one under such circumstances to lay perjury upon
her soulshe hurried away under the equal impulse of a desire
to save Mingo, and to capper-claw Caloya. It was not long
after, that young Gillison, who was more troubled about the fate
of his driver than he was willing to acknowledge even to himself,
came to a determination also to visit the Red Gulley. A little
quiet reflection, after he had reached home, led him to fear that he
might not be in season to prevent mischief if he waited till the
morning for Mingo's appearance; and a sudden conjecture that,
at that very moment, the audacious negro might be urging his
objects in the wigwam of the squatters, made him fearful that
even his instant interference would prove too late. As soon as
this conjecture filled his mind, he seized his cap, and grasping his
rifle, and calling his favourite dog, set forth with all possible
speed towards the spot, destined to be memorable forever after, in
all local chronicles, in consequence of these events.
CHAPTER XII.
The
horror and vexation of Caloya may be imagined, when,
on returning from her visit to the master of the impudent Mingo,
she discovered him, cheek-by-jowl, with her husband. The poor
woman was miserable in the extreme from various causes.
Resolved
steadfastly and without scruple to do the will of her
jealous
spouse, she yet shrank from the idea of perpetrating the bloody
deed which the latter contemplated, and which was so suitable to
the fierce character of Indian vindictiveness. She was, in fact,
a gentle, though a firm, simple, and unaffected woman, and had
not this been the prevailing nature of her heart, the kindness with
which Gillison had received, and the liberality with which he had
treated her, would have been sufficient to make her reluctant to
do any thing which might be injurious to his interests.
But, taught in the severe school of the barbarian those lessons
which insist always upon the entire subordination of the woman,
she had no idea of avoiding, still less of rebelling against, the
authority
which prescribed her laws. To hear was to obey, and
with a deep sigh she advanced to the wigwam, with a firm
resolution
to do as she had been commanded, though, with a prayer
in her mind, not the less fervent because it remained unspoken by
her lips, that the fearful necessity might pass away, and her
husband
be prevented, and she be spared, the commission of the
threatened deed.
It was deemed fortunate by Caloya, that, observing the habitual
caution of the Indian, she had kept within the cover of the woods
until the moment when she came within sight of the wigwam.
This caution enabled her still to keep from discovery, and
fetching
a compass in the covert so as to pass into the rear of the hut,
she succeeded by pulling away some fragments of the bark which
covered it, in entering its narrow precincts without having been
perceived. With a stealthy footstep and a noiseless motion, she
deposited her bundle of calicoes in a corner of the hut, and
sinking
down beside it, strove to still even those heavings of her
anxious
bosom, which she fancied, in her fears, might become audible
to the persons without.
To account for the return of Mingo Gillison to the spot where
he had been guilty of so much impertinence, and had done so
much mischief, is not a difficult matter. It will here be seen that
he was a fellow whom too much authority had helped to madden
that he was afflicted with the disease of intense self-consequence,
and that his passions, accordingly, were not always to be
restrained
by prudence or right reason. These qualities necessarily led
to frequent errors of policy and constant repentings. He had not
many moral misgivings, however, and his regrets were solely
yielded to the evil results, in a merely human and temporary
point of view, which followed his excesses of passion and frequent
outbreaks of temper. He had not well gone from the Red
Gulley
after annihilating the pottery thereof, without feeling what a
fool he had been. He readily conceived that his rashness would
operate greatly, not only against his success with the woman, but
against his future familiarity with the man. It was necessary
that he should heal the breach with the latter if he hoped to win
any favours from the former; and, with this conviction, the rest
of the day was devoted to a calm consideration of the
modus
operandi
by which he might best succeed in this desire. A rough
investigation of the moral nature of an Indian chief, led Mingo to
the conclusion that the best defence of his conduct, and the
happiest
atonement which he could offer, would be one which was
addressed
to his appetites rather than to his understanding.
Accordingly
,
towards nightfall, having secured an adequate supply
of whiskeythat bane equally of negro and Indianhe prepared
with some confidence, to re-appear before the parties whom he
had so grievously offended. He had his doubts, it is true, of the
sort of reception which he should meet;he was not altogether
sure of the magical effect of the whiskey, in promoting christian
charity, and leading the savage to forgiveness; but none of the
apprehensions of Mingo were of personal danger. He would have
laughed to scorn a suggestion of harm at the hands of so infirm
and insignificant a person as Richard Knuckles; and looking
upon his own stout limbs and manly frame, he would have found
in the survey, a sufficient assurance that Mingo Gillison was
equally irresistible to man and wife. It was with a boldness of
carriage, therefore, that corresponded adequately with the degree
of confidence which he felt in his equal powers of persuasion, and
the whiskey, rather than his personal prowess, that he appeared
that night before the hovel of the squatters. He found Knuckles
alone, and seated a little in advance of his habitation. The
Indian
was sober from the necessity of the case. The policy of the
negro had not lately allowed him liquor, and he had not himself
any means for procuring it. He watched the approach of the
enemy without arising from the turf, and without betraying in his
look any of that hostility which was active in his bosom. His
face, indeed, seemed even less grave than usual, and a slight
smile upon his lips, in which it would have tasked a far more
suspicious eye than that of Mingo to have discovered anything
sinister, betrayed, seemingly, a greater portion of good humour
than usually softened his rigid and coarse features. Mingo
approached
with a conciliating grin upon his visage, and with hands
extended in amity. As the Indian did not rise to receive him, he
squatted down upon his haunches on the turf opposite, and setting
down the little jug which he brought between them, clapped the
Indian on his shoulders with a hearty salutation, which was meant
to convey to the other a pleasant assurance of his own singular
condescension.
Knuckles, my boy, how you does? You's bex with me, I
reckons, but there's no needcessity for that. Say I did kick over
the pots and mash the pans?well! I can pay for 'em, can't I?
When a man has got the coppers he's a right to kick; there's no
use to stand in composition with a fellow that's got the coppers.
He kin throw down and he kin pick uphe kin buy and he kin
sell; he kin break and he kin men'; he kin gib and he kin tak';
he kin kill and he kin eatdere's no'ting he can't do ef he hab
moneyhe's mossa to all dem dd despisable rackrobates, what's
got no coppers. I once bin' ye'r a sarmint from Parson
Buckthorn
,
and he tink on dis object jis' as you ye'r me tell you. He
tex' is take from de forty-seben chapterI 'speck it's de
forty-seben
which
say, `what he gwine to profit a gempleman what's
mak' de best crop in de world, if he loss he soul,'which is de
same t'ing, Knuckles, you know, as ef I was to ax you, wha's
de difference ef Mingo Gillison kick over you' pans and pots, and
bre'k 'em all to smash, and ef he pick 'em, like he pick up eggs,
widout bre'k any, so long as he pay you wha' you ax for 'em.
You sell 'em, you git you money, wha' matter wha' I do wid 'em
arter dat? I bre'k 'em or I men' 'em, jis' de same t'ing to you.
'Spose I eat 'em, wha's de difference? He stick in Mingo
stomach
,
he no stick in your'n; and all de time de coppers is making
purty jingle in you' pocket. Well, my boy, I come to do de t'ing
now. I bre'k you' pots, I 'tan ye'r to pay you for 'em. But you
mus' be t'irsty, my old fellow, wid so much talkingtak' a drink
'fore we exceed to business.
The Catawba needed no second invitation. The flavour of the
potent beverage while the negro had been so unprofitably
declaiming
,
ascended to his nostrils with irresistible influence, in spite of
the stopper of corn cob which imperfectly secured it, and which,
among the negroes of the Southern plantations, makes a more
common
than seemly apology for a velvet cork. The aroma of the
beverage soon reconciled Knuckles to the voice of his enemy, and
rendered those arguments irresistible, which no explanations of
Mingo could ever have rendered clear. As he drank, he became
more and more reconciled to the philosophy of his comrade, and,
strengthened by his draughts, his own became equally explicit
and emphatic.
Ha! Ha! Biskey good too much! was the long drawn and
fervent exclamation which followed the withdrawal of the
reluctant
vessel from his lips.
You may say dat wid you' own ugly mout', Dick, and tell no
lie nother, was the cool response. Any biskey is good 'nough,
but dat's what I calls powerful fine. Dat' fourt' proof,
gennywine
,
and 'trong like Sampson, de Philistian. Der's no better in
all Jim Hollon's 'stablishment.
We
gin a mighty great price for
it, so it ought to be good, ef ther's any justice done. But don't
stan', Knucklesef you likes it, sup at it again. It's not like
some women's I knowit gives you smack for smack, and holds
on as long as you let it.
Huh!woman's is fool! responded the savage with an air
of resentment which his protracted draught of the potent beverage
did not altogether dissipate. The reference to the sex reminded
him of his wife, and when he looked upon the speaker he was also
reminded of his presumptuous passions, and of the forward steps
which he had taken for their gratification. But his anger did not
move him to any imprudence so long as the power of reflection was
left him. It was only as his familiarity with the bottle advanced
that his jealous rage began to get the better of his reason and lead
him into ebullitions, which, to a more acute or less conceited
person
than Mingo, would have certainly betrayed the proximity of
that precipice in the near neighbourhood of which he stood. The
savage grew gradually eloquent on the subject of woman's
worthlessness
,
weakness, folly, &c.; and as the vocabulary of broken
and imperfect English which he possessed was any thing but
copious
,
his resort to the Catawba was natural and ready to give
due expression to his resentment and suspicions.
Huh! woman is foolIngin man spit 'pon womanehketee
boozamogettee!dn,dn,damn! tree dn for
woman
!he
make for cuss. Caloya Ganchacha!he dog,he
wuss dan dogromonda!tree time dog! anaporee,
toos-wa-nedah
!
Ingin man say to woman, go! fill you mout' wid grass,
woman is dog for cuss!
The English portion of this blackguardism is amply sufficient
to show the spirit of the speaker, without making necessary any
translation of that part of the speech, which, in his own dialect,
conceals matter far more atrocious. Enough was understood by
Mingo, as well from the action and look of the Catawba, as from
the vulgar English oath which he employed in connection with
his wife's sex and name, to convince the negro that Caloya was an
object rather of hate than of suspicion to her worthless husband.
As this notion filled his sagacious cranium, new hopes and fancies
followed it, and it was with some difficulty that he could suppress
the eager and precipitate utterance of a scheme, which grew out
of this very grateful conjecture.
You no lub woman, Knuckles,eh?
Huh! woman is dog. Ingin man say to doggo! and he
go!say to dog, come, and he come! Dog hunt for meat,
woman's
put meat in de pot! Woman is dog and dog is woman.
Nomonda-yaw-eedn tree timewassireewoman is tree
time dn!
Well, Knuckles, old boy! take a drink! You don't seem to
defections womans no how!
Heh?inquiringly.
Prehaps you don't altogether know what I mean by
defections
?
Well, I'll tell you. Defections means a sort of
chicken-lub
;
as if you only had it now and then, and something leetler
than common. It aint a pow'rful attack,it don't take a body
about de middle as I may say, and gib 'em an up and down h'ist.
It's a sort of lub that lets you go off when you chooses, and come
back when you wants to, and don't keep you berry long about it.
That's to say, it's a sort of defections.
A monosyllable from the Indian, like the last, attested any thing
but his mental illumination in consequence of the very elaborate
metaphysical distinctions which Mingo had undertaken. But
the latter was satisfied that Knuckles should have become wiser
if he had not; and he proceeded, making short stages toward the
point which he desired to attain.
Well, now, Knuckles, if so be you don't affections womans,
what makes you keeps her 'bout you? Ef she's only a dog in
your sight, why don't you sen' her a-packing? Ingin man kin
find somebody, I 'speck, to take care ob he dog for 'em.
Heh? Dogwha' dog?
Dat is to saybut take a drink, old fellow! Take a long
pulldat jug's got a long body, an' you may turn it upside
down heap o' times 'fore you'll git all the life out of it. It
gin my arm a smart tire, I kin tell you, to tote it all the way
here! Dat is to saybut sup at it agin, Knuckles,please de
pigs, you don't know much about what's good, or you would'nt
put it down, tell the red water begins to come into you' eyes.
Awyawyaw! Biskey good too much!
Was the exclamation, accompanied with a long drawn, hissing
sound, of equal delight and difficulty, which issued spontaneously
from the Indian's mouth, as he withdrew the jug from his lips.
The negro looked at him with manifest satisfaction. His eyes
were suffused with water, and exhibited a hideous stare of
excitement
and imbecility. A fixed glaze was overspreading them
fast, revealing some of those fearful aspects which distinguish
the last fleeting gleams of consciousness in the glassy gaze of
the dying. Portions of the liquor which, in his feebleness he had
failed to swallow, ran from the corners of his mouth; and his
fingers, which still clutched the handle of the jug, were
contracted
about it like the claws of a vulture in the spasms of a mortal
agony. His head, as if the neck were utterly unsinewed, swung
from side to side in his repeated efforts to raise it to the usual
Indian
erectness, and, failing in this attempt, his chin sunk at last
and settled down heavily upon his breast. He was evidently in
prime condition for making a bargain, and, apprehensive that he
might have overdone the matter, and that the fellow might be too
stupid even for the purposes of deception, Mingo hastened with
due rapidity to make the proposition which he had conceived,
and which was of a character with the audacity of his previous
designs.
Well, Knuckles, my frien', what's to hender us from a trade?
Ef so be you hates woman's and loves Biskeyef woman's is
a dn dog, and biskey is de only ting dat you most defections
in dis life,den gib me you dn dog, and I'll gib you 'nough
and plenty of de ting you lub. You yerry me?
Aw, yaw, yaw, yaw! Biskey berry good! A torrent of
hiccoughs concluded the reply of the Indian, and for a brief
space rendered the farther accents of the negro inaudible even
to himself.
To be sure,da's trute! Biskey is berry good, and da's
wha' I'm sayin' to you, ef you'd only pay some detention. I'm
a offering you, KnucklesI'm offering to buy you dog from you.
I'll gib you plenty biskey for you dog. Wha' you say, man?
eh?
Aw, yaw! Black man want Ingin dog! The question was
concluded by a faint attempt to whistle. Drunkenness had made
the Catawba more literal than usual, and Mingo's apprehensions
increased as he began to apprehend that he should fail entirely in
reaching the understanding of his companion.
Psho! git out, Knuckles, I no want you' four-legged dog
it's you' two-legged dog I day arter. Enty you bin call you
woman a dog? Enty you bin say, dat you wife, Caloya, is dn
dog?
Ya-ou! ramonda yau-ee, Caloya! woman is tree time dn
dog!
To be sure he is. Da's wha we bin say. Now, I want dog,
Knuckles; and you hab dog wha's jis suit me. You call him
Caloyayou dog! You sell me Caloya, I gie you one whole
barrel biskey for da same dog, Caloya.
Hah! was the sudden exclamation of the Indian, as this
impudent
but liberal offer reached his senses; but, whether in
approbation
or in anger, it was impossible, in the idiot
inexpressiveness
of his drunken glance, for the negro to determine. He
renewed his offer with certain additional inducements in the
shape of pipes and tobacco, and concluded with a glowing
eulogy
upon the quality of his powerful, fine, gennywine, fourt'
proof, the best in Holland's establishment, and a disparaging
reference
to the small value of the dog that he was prepared to buy
with it. When he finished, the Indian evidently comprehended
him better, and laboured under considerable excitement. He
strove to speak, but his words were swallowed up in hiccoughs,
which had been increasing all the while. What were his
sentiments
,
or in what mind he received the offer, the negro vainly strove,
by the most solicitous watchfulness, to ascertain; but he had too
completely overdosed his victim, and the power of speech seemed
entirely departed. This paralysis did not, however, extend entirely
to his limbs. He struggled to rise, and, by the aid of a hickory
twig which grew beside him, he succeeded in obtaining a
doubtful
equilibrium, which he did not, however, very long preserve.
His hand clutched at the knife within his belt, but whether the
movement was designed to vindicate his insulted honour, or was
simply spasmodic, and the result of his condition, could not be
said. Muttering incoherently at those intervals which his
continual
hiccoughing allowed, he wheeled about and rushed
incontinently
towards the hovel, as if moved by some desperate design.
He probably knew nothing definitely at that moment, and had no
precise object. A vague and flickering memory of the
instructions
he had given to his wife, may have mingled in with his
thoughts in his drunken mood, and probably prompted him to the
call which he thrice loudly made upon her name. She did not
answer, but, having heard in her place of concealment the
offensive
proposition which the negro had made her husband, she now
crouched doubly closely and cautious, lest the latter, under this
novel form of provocation, might be moved to vent his wrath
upon her head. Perhaps, too, she fancied, that by remaining
quiet, she might escape the necessity of contributing in any wise
to the execution of the bloody plot in which his commands had
engaged her. Whatever may have been her fear, or the
purposes
of the husband, Caloya remained silent. She moved not
from the corner in which she lay, apprehensively waiting events,
and resolved not to move or show herself unless her duty
obviously
compelled her.
Mingo, meanwhile, utterly blinded by his prodigious
self-esteem
,
construed all the movements of the Catawba into
favourable
appearances in behalf of his desires; and when Knuckles
entered the hovel calling upon his wife, he took it for granted
that the summons had no other object than to deliver the
precious
commodity into his own hands. This conviction warmed
his imagination to so great a degree, that he forgot all his
prudence
,
and following Knuckles into the wigwam, he prepared to
take possession of his prize, with that unctuous delight and
devotedness
which should convince her that she too had made an
excellent bargain by the trade. But when he entered the hovel,
he was encountered by the savage with uplifted hatchet.
Hello, Knuckles, wha' you gwine to do wid you' hatchet?
You wouldn't knock you bes' frien' 'pon de head, eh?
Nigger is dn dog! cried the savage, his hiccoughs
sufficiently
overcome by his rage to allow him a tolerable clear
utterance
at last. As he spoke the blow was given full at the head
of the driver. Mingo threw up his left hand to ward off the
stroke, but was only partially successful in doing so. The keen
steel smote the hand, divided the tendon between the fore-finger
and thumb, and fell with considerable force upon the forehead.
Oh you dn black red-skin, you kill mossa best
nigger
!
shrieked the driver, who fancied, in the first moment of
his pain, that his accounts were finally closed with the world.
The blood, streaming freely from the wound, though it lessened
the stunning effects of the blow, yet blinded his eyes and
increased
his terrors. He felt persuaded that no surgeon could do him
service now, and bitterly did he reproach himself for those
amorous
tendencies which had brought him to a fate so unexpected
and sudden. It was the very moment when the exhortations of
the Rev. Jonathan Buckthorn would have found him in a blessed
state of susceptibility and saving grace. The evil one had not
suffered so severe a rebuke in his present habitation for a very
long season. But as the Reverend Jonathan was not nigh to take
advantage of the circumstance, and as the hapless Mingo felt the
continued though impotent struggle of his enemy at his feet, his
earthly passions resumed their sway, and, still believing that he
had not many hours to live, he determined to die game and have
his revenge in his last moments. The Catawba had thrown his
whole remaining strength into the blow, and the impetus had
carried
him forward. He fell upon his face, and vainly striving and
striking at the legs of his opponent, lay entirely at his mercy;
his efforts betraying his equal feebleness and fury. At first
Mingo doubted his ability to do anything. Though still standing,
he was for some time incapable of perceiving in that circumstance
any strong reason for believing that he had any considerable
portion
of vitality left, and most certainly doubted his possession of
a sufficient degree of strength to take his enemy by the throat.
But with his rage came back his
resolution
his vigour.
Ef I don't stop your kicking arter dis, you red sarpent,
my name's Blind Buzzard. Ef Mingo mus' dead, you shall
dead too, you dn crooked, little, old, red rascal. I'll squeeze
you t'roat, tell you aint got breat' 'nough in you body to scar'
'way musquito from peeping down your gullet. Lor' ha'
massey
!to
'tink Mingo mus' dead 'cause he git knock on de head
by a poor, little, shrinkle up Injun, dat he could eat up wid he
eyes and no make tree bite ob he carcass.
This reflection increased the wrath of the negro, who prepared
with the most solemn deliberation to take the Indian's life by
strangling him. With this design he let his knee drop upon the
body of the prostrate Knuckles, while his hand was extended in
order to secure an efficient grasp upon his throat. But his
movements
had been closely watched by the keen-eyed Caloya from the
corner where she crouched, who, springing forward at the
perilous
moment, drew the hatchet from the hand of the sprawling
and unconscious savage and took an attitude of threatening
which effectually diverted the anger of the negro. Surprised at
her appearance, rather than alarmed at her hostility, he began to
conjecture, in consequence of the returning passion which he felt,
that his danger was not so great as he had at first fancied. The
sight of those charms which had led him into the danger, seemed
to induce a pleasant forgetfulness of the hurts which had been
the result of his rashness; and with that tenacity of purpose
which distinguishes a veteran among the sex, the only thought of
Mingo was the renewal of his practices of evil. He thought no
more of dying, and of the Reverend Jonathan Buckthorn, but
with a voice duly softened to the gentler ears which he was
preparing
to address, he prefaced his overtures by a denunciation of
the dead-drunk dog what was a-lying at his foot. A wretch,
as he loudly declared, who was no more worthy of such a
woman
than he was worthy of life.
But der's a man wha's ready to tak' you, my lubly one, and
tak' care ob you, and treat you as you d'zarb. He's a
gempleman
he's
no slouch, nor no sneak. He's always dress in de
bes'he's always hab plenty for eat and plenty for drinkder's
no scarcity where he hab de mismanagement; and nebber you'll
hab needcessity for work, making mud pot and pan, ef he tak' you
into his defections. I reckon, Caloya, you's want for know who
is dat pusson I tell you 'bout. Who is dat gempleman wha's ready
for do you so much benefactions? Well! look a' yer, Caloya,
and I reckon you'll set eye on de very pusson in perticklar.
The woman gave him no answer, but still, with weapon uplifted,
kept her place, and maintained a watch of the utmost
steadfastness
upon all his movements.
Wha'! you won't say not'ing? Can't be you care someting
for dis bag of feaders, wha's lie at my foot!
With these words the irreverent negro stirred the body of
Knuckles with his foot, and Caloya sprang upon him in the same
instant, and with as determined a hand as ever her husband's had
been, struck as truly, though less successfully, at the forehead of
PART II. 14
her wooer. This time, Mingo was rather too quick to suffer harm
from a feebler arm than his own. His eye detected her design
the moment she moved, and he darted aside in season to avoid the
blow. With equal swiftness he attempted to seize her in his arms
the instant after, but, eluding his grasp, she backed towards the
entrance of the wigwam, keeping her weapon uplifted, and
evidently
resolved to use it to the best advantage as soon as an
opportunity
offered. Mingo was not to be baffled in this fashionthe
difficulties in the way of his pursuit seemed now reduced to a
single
issuethe husband was
hors de combat,
and the wifeshe
certainly
held out only because she was still in his presence. To
this moment, Mingo never doubted that his personal prowess and
pretensions had long since impressed Caloya with the most
indulgent
and accessible emotions. He advanced, talking all the while
in the most persuasive accents, but without inducing any relaxation
of watchfulness or resolution on the part of the woman. He was
prepared to rush upon, and wrest the hatchet from her handand
farther ideas of brutality were gathering in his mindwhen he
was arrested by the presence of a new and annoying object which
suddenly showed itself at the entrance and over the shoulder of
the Indian woman. This was no other than his lawful spouse,
Diana.
Hello, Di! what de dibble you come for, eh?
I come for you, to be sure. Wha' de dibble you is doing yer,
wid Injun woman?
Surprised at the strange voice, and feeling herself somewhat
secure in the presence of a third person, Caloya ventured to look
round upon the new comer. The sight of her comely features
was a signal of battle to the jealous wife, who, instantly, with a
fearful shriek, struck her talons into the cheeks of her innocent
rival
,
and followed up the assault by dashing her head into her face.
The hatchet fell involuntary upon the assailant, but the latter had
too successfully closed in, to receive much injury from the blow,
which, however, descended upon her back, between the shoulders,
and made itself moderately felt. Diana, more vigorous than the
Indian woman, bore her to the earth, and, doubtlessly, under her
ideas of provocation, would have torn her eyes from their sockets,
but for the prompt interposition of her husband, who, familiar with
the marital rights sanctioned by the old English law, prostrated her
to the earth with a single blow of his fist. He might have
followed
up this violence to a far less justifiable extent, for the audacity
which his wife had shown had shocked all his ideas of domestic
propriety, but that he was interrupted before he could proceed
further by a hand which grasped tightly his neckcloth from
behind
,
and giving it a sudden twist, curtailed his powers of
respiration
to a most annoying degree. He turned furiously though
with difficulty upon the new assailant, to encounter the severe
eyes of his young master.
Here was an explosion! Never was an unfaithful steward more
thoroughly confounded. But the native impudence of Mingo did
not desert him. He had one of the fairest stories in the world to
tell. He accounted for every thing in the most rational and
innocent
mannerbut in vain. Young Gillison had the eye of a
hawk when his suspicions were awakened, and he had already
heard the testimony of the Indian woman, whom he could not
doubt. Mingo was degraded from his trust, and a younger negro
put over him. To compensate the Indian woman for the injuries
which she received, was the first care of the planter as he came
upon the ground. He felt for her with increased interest as she
did not complain. He himself assisted her from the ground and
conducted her into the wigwam. There, they found Knuckles
almost entirely insensible. The liquor with which the negro had
saturated him, was productive of effects far more powerful than
he had contemplated. Fit had succeeded to fit, and paralysis
was the consequence. When Gillison looked upon him, he saw
that he was a dying man. By his orders, he was conveyed that
night to the settlement, where he died the next day.
Caloya exhibited but little emotion, but she omitted no attention.
She observed the decorum and performed all the duties of a wife.
The young planter had already learned to esteem her, and when,
the day after the funeral, she prepared to return to her people,
who were upon the Edisto, he gave her many presents which she
received thankfully, though with reluctance.
A year after, at the same season, the Red Gulley was
occupied
by the whole tribe, and the evening following their arrival,
Col. Gillison, sitting within the hall of his family mansion, was
surprised by the unexpected appearance of Caloya. She looked
younger than before, comelier, and far more happy. She was
followed by a tall and manly looking hunter, whom she introduced
as her husband, and who proved to be the famous Chickawa, of
whom poor old Knuckles had been so jealous. The grateful
Caloya
came to bring to the young planter a pair of moccasins and
leggins, neatly made and fancifully decorated with beads, which,
with her own hands, she had wrought for him. He received them
with a sentiment of pleasure, more purely and more enduringly
sweet than young men are often apt to feel; and, esteeming her
justly, there were few articles of ordinary value in his
possession
with which he would not sooner have parted, than the
simple
present of that Catawba woman.
LUCAS DE AYLLON.
A HISTORICAL NOUVELLETTE.
2
2.
The three chapters which constitute this narrative, originally formed part
of a plan which I meditated of dealing with the early histories of the South,
somewhat after the manner of Henry Neele, in his Romance of English
History
.
Of course I did not mean to follow slavishly in the track pointed out by
him, nor, indeed, would the peculiar and large difference between our
respective
materials, admit of much similarity of treatment. The reader must
understand
that the essential facts, as given in these sketches, are all historical, and
that he is in
fact
engaged in the perusal of the real adventures of the Spanish
voyager, enlivened only by the introduction of persons of whom history says
nothing in detailspeaking vaguely, as is but too much her wont, of those
whose deficient stature fails to inform or to influence her sympathies. It is
the true purpose of fiction to supply her deficiencies, and to correct her
judgments
.
It will be difficult for any chronicler to say, of what I have written,
more than that he himself knows nothing about it. But his ignorance suggests
no good reason why better information should not exist in my possession.
CHAPTER I.
THE SNARE OF THE PIRATE.
Sebastian Cabot
is supposed to have been the first European
voyager who ever laid eyes upon the low shores of Carolina.
He sailed along the coast and looked at it, but did not attempt to
land,nor was such a proceeding necessary to his objects. His
single look, according to the laws and morals of that day, in
civilized
Europe, conferred a sufficient right upon the nation by which
he was employed, to all countries which he might discover, and
to all people, worshipping at other than Christian altars, by whom
they might be occupied. The supposed right, however, thus
acquired
by Cabot, was not then asserted by the English whom he
served. It was reserved for another voyager, who, with greater
condescension, surveyed the coast and actually set foot upon it.
This was Lucas Velasquez de Ayllon, whose adventures in
Carolina
we propose briefly to relate. Better for him that he had
never seen it!or, seeing it, if he had posted away from its shores
for ever. They were the shores of destiny for him. But he
was a bad man, and we may reasonably assume that the Just
Providence had ordained that his crimes should there meet with
that retribution which they were not likely to encounter any where
else. Here, if he found paganism, he, at the same time, found
hospitality; and here, if he brought cunning, he encountered
courage! Fierce valour and generous hospitality were the
natural
virtues of the Southern Indians.
But we must retrace our steps for a brief period. Some
preliminaries
,
drawn from the history of the times, are first
necessary
to be understood.The feebleness of the natives of Hayti,
as is well known, so far from making them objects of pity and
indulgence in the sight of other Spanish conquerors, had the
contrary
effect of converting an otherwise brave soldiery into a
reckless
band of despots, as brutal in their performances as they
were unwise in their tyrannies. The miserable Indians sunk
under their domination. The blandness of their climate, its
delicious
fruits, the spontaneous gifts of nature, had rendered them
too effeminate for labour and too spiritless for war. Their
extermination
was threatened; and, as a remedial measure, the
benevolent
father, Las Casas,whose humanity stands out conspicuously
in contrast with the proverbial cruelty and ferocity of his
countrymen
,suggested
the policy of making captures of slaves, to
take the places of the perishing Haytians, from the Caribbean
Islands and from the coasts of Florida. The hardy savages of
these regions, inured to war, and loving it for its very dangers
and exercises, were better able to endure the severe tasks which
were prescribed by the conquerors. This opened a new branch
of business for these bold and reckless adventurers. Predatory
incursions were made along the shores of the Gulf, and seldom
without profit. In this way one race was made to supersede
another
,
in the delicious country which seems destined never to
rear a population suited to its characteristics. The stubborn and
sullen Caribbean was made to bend his shoulders to the burden,
but did not the less save the feeble Haytian from his doom. The
fierce tribes of Apalachia took the place of the delicate limbed
native of the Ozama; and, in process of years, the whole southern
coasts of North America became tributary, in some degree, to
the novel and tyrannical policy which was yet suggested by a
spirit of the most genuine benevolence.
The business of slave capture became somewhat more
profitable
than the fatiguing and protracted search after golda search
much more full of delusions than of any thing substantial. It
agreed better with the hardy valour of those wild adventurers.
Many bold knights adopted this new vocation. Among these
was one Lucas Velasquez de Ayllon, already mentioned as
succeeding
Cabot in his discovery of Carolina. He was a stern,
cold man, brave enough for the uses to which valour was put in
those days; but having the narrow contracted soul of a miser, he
was incapable of noble thoughts or generous feelings. The love
of gold was the settled passion of his heart, as it was too much
the passion of his countrymen. He soon distinguished himself
by his forays, and was among the first to introduce his people to
a knowledge of Carolina, where they subsequently made
themselves
notorious by their atrocities. Some time in the year 1520,
he set forth, in two ships, on an expedition of this nature. He
seems to have been already acquainted with the region.
Wending
north, he soon found himself in smooth water, and gliding
along by numberless pleasant islands, that broke the billows of
the sea, and formed frequent and safe harborages along the coasts
of the country. Attracted by a spacious opening in the shores,
he stood in for a prominent headland, to which he gave the
name of Cape St. Helena; a name which is now borne by the
contiguous sound. The smoothness of the waters; the placid
and serene security of this lovely basin; the rich green of the
verdure which encountered the eyes of the adventurers on all sides,
beguiled them onward; and they were at length rejoiced at the sight,
more grateful to their desire than any other, as it promised them
the spoils which they soughtof numerous groups of natives
that thronged the lands-ends at their approach. They cast anchor
near the mouth of a river, which, deriving its name from the
Queen of the country, is called, to this day, the Combahee.
The natives were a race as unconscious of guile as they were
fearless of danger. They are represented to have been of very
noble stature; graceful and strong of limb; of bright, dark,
flashing eyes, and of singularly advanced civilization, since they
wore cotton clothes of their own manufacture, and had even
made considerable progress in the arts of knitting, spinning and
weaving. They had draperies to their places of repose; and
some of the more distinguished among their women and warriors,
wore thin and flowing fringes, by way of ornament, upon which
a free and tasteful disposition of pearls might occasionally be seen.
Like many other of the native tribes, they were governed by a
queen whose name has already been given. The name of the
country they called Chicora, or, more properly, Chiquola.
Unsuspecting as they were brave, the savages surrounded the
vessels in their boats, and many of them even swam off from
shore to meet them; being quite as expert in the water as upon
the land. The wily Spaniard spared no arts to encourage and
increase this confidence. Toys and implements of a kind likely
to attract the eyes, and catch the affections, of an ignorant
people
,
were studiously held up in sight; and, by little and little,
they grew bold enough, at length, to clamber up the sides of the
ships, and make their appearance upon the decks. Still, with
all their arts, the number of those who came on board was small,
compared with those who remained aloof. It was observed by
the Spaniards that the persons who forbore to visit them were
evidently the persons of highest consequence. Those who came,
as constantly withdrew to make their report to others, who either
stayed on the land, or hovered in sight, but at a safe distance, in
their light canoes. De Ayllon shrewdly conjectured that if he
could tempt these more important persons to visit his vessels, the
great body of the savages would follow. His object was
numbers
;
and his grasping and calculating soul scanned the crowds
which were in sight, and thought of the immense space in his
hold, which it was his policy and wish to fill. To bring about
his object, he spared none of the customary modes of temptation.
Beads and bells were sparingly distributed to those who came,
and they were instructed by signs and sounds to depart, and
return with their companions. To a certain extent, this policy
had its effect, but the appetite of the Spaniard was not easily
glutted.
He noted, among the hundred canoes that darted about the
bay, one that was not only of larger size and better construction
than the rest, but which was fitted up with cotton stuffs and
fringes like some barge of state. He rightly conjectured that
this canoe contained the Cassique or sovereign of the country.
The canoe was dug from a single tree, and was more than forty
feet in length. It had a sort of canopy of cotton stuff near the
stern, beneath which sat several females, one of whom was of
majestic demeanour, and seemed to be an object of deference with
all the rest. It did not escape the eyes of the Spaniards that her
neck was hung with pearls, others were twined about her brows,
and gleamed out from the folds of her long glossy black hair,
which, streaming down her neck, was seen almost to mingle with
the chafing billows of the sound. The men in this vessel were
also most evidently of the better order. All of them were clad
in fringed cotton stuffs of a superior description to those worn by
the gathering multitude. Some of these stuffs were dyed of a
bright red and yellow, and plumes, similarly stained, were
fastened
in many instances to their brows, by narrow strips of
coloured
fringe, not unfrequently sprinkled artfully with seed pearl.
The eyes of De Ayllon gloated as he beheld this barge, from
which he did not once withdraw his glance. But, if he saw the
importance of securing this particular prize, he, at the same time,
felt the difficulty of such a performance. The Indians seemed
not unaware of the special value of this canoe. It was kept
aloof, while all the rest ventured boldly alongside the Spanish
vessels. A proper jealousy of strangers,though it does not
seem that they had any suspicion of their particular object
restrained
the savages. To this natural jealousy, that curiosity
which is equally natural to ignorance, was opposed. De Ayllon
was too sagacious to despair of the final success of this superior
passion. He redoubled his arts. His hawk's bells were made
to jingle from the ship's side; tinsel, but bright crossesthe
holiest
sign in the exercise of his religious faithwere hung in view,
abused as lures for the purposes of fraud and violence. No toy,
which had ever yet been found potent in Indian traffic, was
withheld
from sight; and, by little and little, the unconscious arms of
the Indian rowers impelled the destined bark nearer and nearer
to the artful Spaniards. Still, the approach was slow. The
strokes of the rowers were frequently suspended, as if in
obedience
to orders from their chiefs. A consultation was evidently
going on among the inmates of the Indian vessels. Other canoes
approached it from the shore. The barge of state was surrounded.
It was obvious that the counsellors were averse to the
unnecessary
exposure of their sovereigns.
It was a moment of anxiety with De Ayllon. There were not
twenty Indians remaining on his decks; at one time there had
been an hundred. He beheld the hesitation, amounting to
seeming
apprehension, among the people in the canoes; and he now
began to reproach himself with that cupidity, which, grasping at
too much, had probably lost all. But so long as curiosity
hesitates
there is hope for cupidity. De Ayllon brought forth other
lures: he preferred fraud to fighting.
Look! said a princely damsel in the canoe of state, as a
cluster of bright mirrors shone burningly in the sunlight. Look!
and every eye followed her finger, and every feminine tongue
in the vessel grew clamorous for an instant, in its own language,
expressing the wonder which was felt at this surpassing display.
Still, the canoe hung, suspended on its centre, motionless. The
contest was undecided: a long, low discussion was carried on
between
a small and select number in the little vessel. De Ayllon
saw that but from four to five persons engaged in this discussion.
One of these, only, was a womanthe majestic but youthful
woman, of whom we have already given a brief description.
Three others were grave middle-aged men; but the fourth was
a tall, bright-eyed savage, who had scarcely reached the term of
manhood, with a proud eager aspect, and a form equally
combining
strength and symmetry. He wore a coronet of eagle
feathers, and from his place in the canoe, immediately next that
of the queen, it was inferred correctly by the Spanish captain
that he was her husband. He spoke earnestly, almost angrily;
pointed several times to the ships, whenever the objects of
attraction
were displayed; and, from his impatient manner, it was
very clear that the counsel to which he listened did not
correspond
with the desires which he felt. But the discussion was soon
ended. De Ayllon waved a bright scimitar above his head, and
the young chief in the canoe of state started to his feet, with an
unrestrainable impulse, and extended his hand for the gift. The
brave soul of the young warrior spoke out without control when
he beheld the true object of attraction. De Ayllon waved the
weapon encouragingly, and bowed his head, as if in compliance
with his demand. The young savage uttered a few words to his
people, and the paddles were again dipped in water; the bark
went forward, and, from the Spanish vessel, a rope was let down
to assist the visitors as soon as they were alongside.
The hand of the young chief had already grasped the rope,
when the fingers of Combahee, the queen, with an equal mixture
of majesty and grace, were laid upon his arm.
Go not, Chiquola she said, with a persuasive, entreating
glance of her deep, dark eyes. He shook off her hand
impatiently
,
and, running up the sides of the vessel, was already safely
on the deck, before he perceived that she was preparing to follow
him. He turned upon her, and a brief expostulation seemed to
follow from his lips. It appeared as if the young savage was
only made conscious of his imprudence, by beholding hers. She
answered him with a firmness of manner, a dignity and sweetness
so happily blended, that the Spanish officers, who had, by this
time, gathered round them, looked on and listened with surprise.
The young chief, whom they learned to call by the name of
Chiquola
which
they soon understood was that of the country, also
appeared dissatisfied, and renewed his expostulations, but with
the same effect. At length he waved his hand to the canoe, and,
speaking a few words, moved once more to the side of the ship at
which she had entered. The woman's eye brightened; she
answered
with a single word, and hurried in the same direction.
De Ayllon, fearing the loss of his victims, now thought it time to
interfere. The sword, which had won the eyes of the young
warrior at first, was again waved in his sight, while a mirror of the
largest size was held before the noble features of the Indian
princess
.
The youth grasped the weapon, and laughed with a delighted
but brief chuckle as he looked on the glittering steel, and shook
it hurriedly in the air. He seemed to know the use of such an
instrument by instinct. In its contemplation, he forgot his own
suspicions and that of his people; and no more renewing his
suggestions
to depart, he spoke to Combahee only of the beauties and
the use of the new weapon which had been given to his hands.
The woman seemed altogether a superior person. There was
a stern mournfulness about her, which, while it commanded
respect
,
did not impair the symmetry and sweetness of her very
intelligent
and pleasing features. She had the high forehead of our
race, without that accompanying protuberance of the cheek bones,
which distinguished hers. Her mouth was very small and sweet,
like that which is common to her people. Her eyes were large,
deeply set, and dark in the extreme, wearing that pensive
earnestness
of expression which seems to denote presentiment of many
pangs and sorrows. Her form, we have already said, was large
and majestical; yet the thick masses of her glossy black hair
streamed even to her heels. Superior to her companions, male
as well as female, the mirror which had been put into her hands
a glance at which had awakened the most boisterous clamours
of delight among her female attendants, all of whom had followed
her into the Spanish vesselwas laid down, after a brief
examination
,
with perfect indifference. Her countenance, though not
uninformed with curiosity, was full of a most expressive anxiety.
She certainly felt the wonder which the others showed, at the
manifold strange objects which met their eyes; but this feeling
was entertained in a more subdued degree, and did not display
itself in the usual language of surprise. She simply seemed to
follow the footsteps of Chiquola, without participating in his
pleasures
,
or in that curiosity which made him traverse the ship in every
accessible quarter, from stem to stern, seeking all objects of
novelty
,
and passing from one to the other with an appetite which
nothing seemed likely soon to satiate.
Meanwhile, the example set by their Queen, the Cassiques, the
Iawas, or Priests, and other headmen of the Nation, was soon
followed
by the common people; and De Ayllon had the satisfaction,
on exchanging signals with his consort, to find that both ships
were crowded with quite as many persons as they could possibly
carry. The vessel under his immediate command was scarcely
manageable from the multitudes which thronged her decks, and
impeded, in a great measure, all the operations of the crew. He
devised a remedy for this evil, and, at the same time, a measure
very well calculated to give complete effect to his plans.
Refreshments
were provided in the hold; wines in abundance; and
the trooping savages were invited into that gloomy region, which
a timely precaution had rendered more cheerful in appearance
by the introduction of numerous lights. A similar arrangement
conducted the more honourable guests into the cabin, and a free
use of the intoxicating beverages, on the part of the great body
of the Indians, soon rendered easy all the remaining labours of
the wily Spaniard. The hatches were suddenly closed when the
hold was most crowded, and two hundred of the unconscious and
half stupid savages were thus entrapped for the slave market of
the City of Columbus.
In the cabin the same transaction was marked by some
distinguishing
differences. The wily De Ayllon paid every
attention
to his guests. A natural homage was felt to be the due of
royalty and rank, even among a race of savages; and this
sentiment
was enforced by the obvious necessity of pursuing that course
of conduct which would induce the confidence of persons who had
already shown themselves so suspicious. De Ayllon, with his
officers, himself attended Chiquola and the Queen. The former
needed no persuasion. He freely seated himself on the cushions
of the cabin, and drank of the proffered wines, till his eyes danced
with delight, his blood tingled, and his speech, always free,
became
garrulity, to the great annoyance of Combahee. She had
followed him with evident reluctance into the interior of the
vessel
;
and now, seated with the rest, within the cabin, she watched
the proceedings with a painful degree of interest and
dissatisfaction
,
increasing momently as she beheld the increasing effect upon
him of the wine which he had taken. She herself utterly
declined
the proffered liquor; holding herself aloof with as much
natural dignity as could have been displayed by the most polished
princess of Europe. Her disquiet had made itself understood by
her impatience of manner, and by frequent observations in her own
language, to Chiquola. These, of course, could be understood
only by themselves and their attendants. But the Spaniards were
at no loss to divine the purport of her speech from her tones, the
expression of her face, and the quick significant movements of
her hands.
At length she succeeded in impressing her desires upon
Chiquola
,
and he rose to depart. But the Spaniards had no intention
to suffer this. The plot was now ready for execution. The
signal
had been made. The entrance to the cabin was closed, and
a single bold and decisive movement was alone necessary to end
the game. De Ayllon had taken care silently to introduce
several
stout soldiers into the cabin, and these, when Chiquola took a
step forward, sprang upon him and his few male companions and
bore them to the floor. Chiquola struggled with a manful
courage
,
which, equally with their forests, was the inheritance of the
American Indians; but the conflict was too unequal, and it did
not remain doubtful very long. De Ayllon saw that he was
secure
,
and turned, with an air of courteous constraint, to the spot
where Combahee stood. He approached her with a smile upon
his countenance and with extended arms; but she bestowed upon
him a single glance; and, in a mute survey, took in the entire
extent of her misfortune. The whole proceeding had been the
work of an instant only. That she was taken by surprise, as
well as Chiquola, was sufficiently clear; but her suspicions had
never been wholly quieted, and the degree of surprise which she
felt did not long deprive her of her energies. If her eye betrayed
the startled apprehension of the fawn of her native forests, it
equally expressed the fierce indignation which flames in that of
their tameless eagle. She did not speak as De Ayllon
approached
;
and when, smiling, he pointed to the condition of
Chiquola
,
and with extended arms seemed to indicate to her the
hopelessness of any effort at escape, she hissed at him, in reply,
with the keen defiance of the angry coppersnake. He advanced
his hand was stretched forth towards her personwhen she
drew up her queenly form to its fullest height; and, with a
single
word hurriedly spoken to the still struggling Chiquola, she
turned, and when De Ayllon looked only to receive her
submission
,
plunged suddenly through the stern windows of the cabin,
and buried herself in the deep waters of the sea.
CHAPTER II.
CHIQUOLA, THE CAPTIVE.
Now mounts he the ocean wave, banished, forlorn,
Like a limb from his country cast bleeding and torn.
Campbell
.
The
flight of Combahee, and her descent into the waters of the
bay, were ominous of uproar. Instantly, the cry of rage arose
from a thousand voices. The whole body of the people, as with
a common instinct, seemed at once to comprehend the national
calamity. A dozen canoes shot forth from every quarter,
with the rapidity of arrows in their flight, to the rescue of the
Queen. Like a bright mermaid, swimming at evening for her
own green island, she now appeared, beating with familiar skill
the swelling waters, and, with practised hands, throwing behind
her their impelling billows. Her long, glossy, black hair was
spread out upon the surface of the deep, like some veil of
network
meant to conceal from immodest glances the feminine form
below. From the window of the cabin whence she disappeared,
De Ayllon beheld her progress, and looked upon the scene with
such admiration as was within the nature of a soul so mercenary.
He saw the fearless courage of the man in all her movements, and
never did Spaniard behold such exquisite artifice in swimming
on the part of any of his race. She was already in safety. She
had ascended, and taken her seat in one of the canoes, a dozen
contending, in loyal rivalry, for the privilege of receiving her
person.
Then rose the cry of war! Then sounded that fearful whoop
of hate, and rage, and defiance, the very echoes of which have
made many a faint heart tremble since that day. It was
probably
,
on this occasion, that the European, for the first time, listened
to this terrible cry of war and vengeance. At the signal, the
canoes upon the bay scattered themselves to surround the ships;
the warriors along the shore loosened the fasts of the boats, and
pushed off to join the conflict; while the hunter in the forests,
stopped sudden in the eager chase, sped onward, with all the
feeling of coercive duty, in the direction of those summoning
sounds.
The fearless Combahee, with soul on fire, led the van. She
stood erect in her canoe. Her form might be seen from every
part of the bay. The hair still streamed, unbound and dripping,
from her shoulders. In her left hand she grasped a bow such as
would task the ability of the strong man in our day. Her
right hand was extended, as if in denunciation towards that
fatal bark
Built in the eclipse and rigged with curses dark,
in which her husband and her people were held captive. Truly,
hers was the form and the attitude for a high souled painter;
one, the master of the dramatic branches of his art. The
flashing
of her eye was a voice to her warriors;the waving of her
hand was a summons that the loyal and the brave heart sprang
eager to obey! A shrill signal issued from her half parted lips,
and the now numerous canoes scattered themselves on every side
as if to surround the European enemy, or, at least, to make the
assault on both vessels simultaneous.
The Spaniard beheld, as if by magic, the whole bay covered
with boats. The light canoes were soon launched from the
shore, and they shot forth from its thousand indentations as fast
as the warriors poured down from the interior. Each of these
warriors came armed with the bow, and a well filled quiver of
arrows. These were formed from the long canes of the adjacent
swamps; shafts equally tenacious and elastic, feathered with
plumes from the eagle or the stork, and headed with triangular
barbs of flint. broad but sharp, of which each Indian had always
a plentiful supply. The vigour with which these arrows were
impelled from the string was such, that, without the escaupil or
cotton armour which the Spaniards generally wore, the shaft has
been known to pass clean through the body of the victim. Thus
armed and arranged, with numbers constantly increasing, the
people of Combahee, gathering at her summons, darted boldly
from the shore, and, taking up positions favourable to the attack,
awaited only the signal to begin.
Meanwhile, the Spanish ships began to spread forth their broad
wings for flight. Anticipating some such condition of things as
the present, the wily De Ayllon had made his preparations for
departure at the same time that he had planned the scheme for
his successful treachery. The one movement was devised to
follow
immediately upon the footsteps of the other. His sails were
loosened and flapping in the wind. To trim them for the breeze,
which, though light, was yet favourable to his departure, was the
work of a moment only; and ere the word was given for the attack,
on the part of the Indians, the huge fabrics of the Spaniards
began
to move slowly through the subject waters. Then followed
the signal. First came a shaft from Combahee herself; well
aimed and launched with no mean vigour; that, striking full on
the bosom of De Ayllon, would have proved fatal but for the
plate mail which was hidden beneath his coat of buff. A wild
whoop succeeded, and the air was instantly clouded by the close
flight of the Indian arrows. Nothing could have been more
decided
,
more prompt and rapid, than this assault. The shaft had
scarcely been dismissed from the string before another supplied its
place; and however superior might have been the armament of
the Spanish captain, however unequal the conflict from the greater
size of his vessels, and the bulwarks which necessarily gave a
certain degree of protection, it was a moment of no
inconsiderable
anxiety to the kidnappers! De Ayllon, though a base, was
not a bloody-minded man. His object was spoil, not slaughter.
Though his men had their firelocks in readiness, and a few pieces
of cannon were already prepared and pointed, yet he hesitated to
give the word, which should hurry into eternity so many ignorant
fellow beings upon whom he had just inflicted so shameful an
injury. He commanded his men to cover themselves behind the
bulwarks, unless where the management of the ships required
their unavoidable exposure, and, in such cases, the persons
employed
were provided with the cotton armour which had been
usually found an adequate protection against arrows shot by the
feeble hands of the Indians of the Lucayos.
But the vigorous savages of Combahee were a very different
PART II. 15
race. They belonged to the great family of the Muscoghees;
the parent stock, without question, of those indomitable tribes
which, under the names of Yemassee, Stono, Muscoghee,
Mickasukee
,
and Seminole, have made themselves remembered and
feared, through successive years of European experience,
without
having been entirely quelled or quieted to the present hour.
It was soon found by De Ayllon that the escaupil was no
protection
against injury. It baffled the force of the shaft but could not
blunt it, and one of the inferior officers, standing by the side of
the commander, was pierced through his cotton gorget. The
arrow penetrated his throat, and he fell, to all appearance,
mortally
wounded. The Indians beheld his fall. They saw the
confusion that the event seemed to inspire, and their delight was
manifested in a renewed shout of hostility, mingled with screams,
which denoted, as clearly as language, the delight of savage
triumph
.
Still, De Ayllon forbore to use the destructive weapons
which he had in readiness. His soldiers murmured; but he
answered
them by pointing to the hold, and asking:
Shall we cut our own throats in cutting theirs? I see not
present enemies but future slaves in all these assailants.
It was not mercy but policy that dictated his forbearance.
But it was necessary that something should be done in order to
baffle and throw off the Indians. The breeze was too light and
baffling, and the movements of the vessels too slow to avoid
them. The light barks of the assailants, impelled by vigorous
arms, in such smooth water, easily kept pace with the progress of
the ships. Their cries of insult and hostility increased. Their
arrows were shot, without cessation, at every point at which an
enemy was supposed to harbour himself; and, under the
circumstances
,
it was not possible always to take advantage of a cover in
performing the necessary duties which accrued to the seamen of
the ships. The Indians had not yet heard the sound of European
cannon. De Ayllon resolved to intimidate them. A small piece,
such as in that day was employed for the defence of castles,
called
a falconet, was elevated above the canoes, so that the shot,
passing over the heads of their inmates, might take effect upon
the woods along the shore. As the sudden and sullen roar of this
unexpected thunder was heard, every Indan sunk upon his
knees; every paddle was dropped motionless in the water; while
the uplifted bow fell from the half-paralyzed hands of the
warrior
,
and he paused, uncertain of safety, but incapable of flight.
The effect was great, but momentary only. To a truly brave
people, there is nothing more transient than the influence of panic.
When the Indian warriors looked up, they beheld one of their
people still erectunalarmed by the strange thunderstill
looking
the language,still acting the part of defiance,and, oh!
shame to their manhood, this person was their Queen. Instead
of fear, the expression upon her countenance was that of scorn.
They took fire at the expression. Every heart gathered new
warmth at the blaze shining from her eyes. Besides, they
discovered
that they were unharmed. The thunder was a mere
sound. They had not seen the bolt. This discovery not only
relieved their fears but heightened their audacity. Again they
moved forward. Again the dart was clapt upon the string.
Singing one chorus, the burden of which, in our language, would
be equivalent to a summons to a feast of vultures, they again set
their canoes in motion; and now, not as before, simply content
to get within arrow distance, they boldly pressed forward upon
the very course of the ships; behind, before, and on every side;
sending their arrows through every opening, and distinguishing,
by their formidable aim, every living object which came in sight.
Their skill in the management of their canoes; in swimming;
their great strength and agility, prompted them to a thousand acts
of daring; and some were found bold enough to attempt, while
leaping from their boats, beneath the very prow of the slowly
advancing
vessels, to grasp the swinging ropes and thus elevate
themselves to individual conflict with their enemies. These
failed
,
it is true, and sank into the waters; but such an event
implied
no sort of risk to these fearless warriors. They were soon
picked up by their comrades, only to renew, in this or in other
forms, their gallant but unsuccessful efforts.
But these efforts might yet be successful. Ships in those days
were not the monstrous palaces which they are in ours. An
agile form, under favouring circumstances, might easily clamber
up their sides; and such was the equal activity and daring of
the savages, as to make it apparent to De Ayllon that it would
need something more decisive than had yet been done, on his
part, to shake himself free from their inveterate hostility. At a
moment when their fury was redoubled and increased by the
impunity
which had attended their previous assaults,when every
bow was uplifted and every arrow pointed under the eye of their
Queen, as if for a full application of all their strength, and skill
and courage;her voice, now loud in frequent speech, inciting
them to a last and crowning effort; and she herself, erect in her
bark as before, and within less than thirty yards of the Spanish
vessel;at this moment, and to avert the storm of arrows which
threatened his seamen who were then, perforce, busy with the
rigging in consequence of a sudden change of wind;De Ayllon
gave a signal to bring Chiquola from below. Struggling
between
two Spanish officers, his arms pinioned at the elbows, the
young Cassique was dragged forward to the side of the vessel
and presented to the eyes of his Queen and people, threatened
with the edge of the very weapon which had beguiled him to the
perfidious bark.
A hollow groan arose on every hand. The points of the
uplifed
arrows were dropped; and, for the first time, the proud
spirit passed out of the eyes of Combahee, and her head sunk
forward, with an air of hopeless self-abandonment, upon her breast!
A deep silence followed, broken only by the voice of Chiquola.
What he said, was, of course, not understood by his captors; but
they could not mistake the import of his action. Thrice, while
he spoke to his people, did his hand, wresting to the utmost the
cords upon his arms, smite his heart, imploring, as it were, the
united arrows of his people to this conspicuous mark. But the
Amazon had not courage for this. She was speechless! Every
eye was turned upon her, but there was no answering response in
hers; and the ships of the Spaniard proceeded on their way to
the sea with a momently increasing rapidity. Still, though no
longer assailing, the canoes followed close, and kept up the same
relative distance between themselves and enemies, which had
been observed before. Combahee now felt all her feebleness, and
as the winds increased, and the waves of the bay feeling the
more immediate influence of the ocean, rose into long heavy
swells, the complete conviction of her whole calamity seemed to
rush upon her soul. Chiquola had now been withdrawn from
sight. His eager adjurations to his Queen and people, might, it
was feared, prompt them to that Roman sort of sacrifice which
the captive himself seemed to implore; and perceiving that the
savages had suspended the assault, De Ayllon commanded
his removal. But, with his disappearance, the courage of his
Queen revived. Once more she gave the signal for attack in a
discharge of arrows; and once more the captive was set before
their eyes, with the naked sword above his head,
in terrorem,
as
before. The same effect ensued. The arm of hostility hung
suspended and paralyzed. The cry of anguish which the cruel
spectacle extorted from the bosom of Combahee, was echoed by
that of the multitude; and without a purpose or a hope, the
canoes hovered around the course of the retreating ships, till the
broad Atlantic, with all its mighty billows, received them.
The vigorous breath of the increasing wind, soon enabled them to
shake off their hopeless pursuers. Yet still the devoted savages
plied their unremitting paddles; the poor Queen straining her
eyes along the waste, until, in the grey of twilight and of distance,
the vessels of the robbers were completely hidden from her sight.
Meanwhile, Chiquola was hurried back to the cabin, with his
arms still pinioned. His feet were also fastened and a close
watch was put upon him. It was a courtesy which the Spaniards
considered due to his legitimacy that the cabin was made his
place of imprisonment. With his withdrawal from the presence
of his people, his voice, his eagerness and animation, all at once
ceased. He sunk down on the cushion with the sullen, stolid
indifference
which distinguishes his people in all embarrassing
situations
.
A rigid immobility settled upon his features; yet De
Ayllon did not fail to perceive that when he or any of his
officers
approached the captive, his eyes gleamed upon them with
the fury of his native panther;gleamed bright, with irregular
flashes, beneath his thick black eye-brows, which gloomed
heavily
over their arches with the collected energies of a wild and
stubborn soul.
He is dangerous, said De Ayllon, be careful how you
approach
him.
But though avoided he was not neglected. De Ayllon himself
proffered him food; not forgetting to tender him a draught of that
potent beverage by which he had been partly overcome before.
But the sense of wrong was uppermost, and completely subdued
the feeling of appetite. He regarded the proffer of the Spaniard
with a keen, but composed look of ineffable disdain; never lifted
his hand to receive the draught, and beheld it set down within his
reach without indicating, by word or look, his consciousness of
what had been done. Some hours had elapsed and the wine and
food remained untouched. His captor still consoled himself with
the idea that hunger would subdue his stubbornness;but when
the morning came, and the noon of the next day, and the young
savage still refused to eat or drink, the case became serious; and
the mercenary Spaniard began to apprehend that he should lose
one of the most valuable of his captives. He approached the
youth and by signs expostulated with him upon his rejection of
the food; but he received no satisfaction. The Indian remained
inflexible, and but a single glance of his large, bright eye,
requited
De Ayllon for his selfish consideration. That look
expressed
the hunger and thirst which in no other way did Chiquola
deign to acknowledge; but that hunger and thirst were not for
food but for blood;revenge, the atonement for his wrongs and
shame. Never had the free limbs of Indian warrior known such
an indignitynever could indignity have been conceived less
endurable
.
No words can describe, as no mind can imagine, the
volume of tumultuous strife, and fiercer, maddening thoughts
and feelings, boiling and burning in the brain and bosom of the
gallant but inconsiderate youth;thoughts and feelings so
strangely subdued, so completely hidden in those composed
muscles
,only
speaking through that dilating, but fixed, keen,
inveterate
eye!
De Ayllon was perplexed. The remaining captives gave him
little or no trouble. Plied with the liquors which had seduced
them at first, they were very generally in that state of
drunkenness
,
when a certainty of continued supply reconciles the
degraded
mind very readily to any condition. But with Chiquola
the case was very different. Here, at least, was characterthe
pride of self-dependence; the feeling of moral responsibility;
the ineradicable consciousness of that shame which prefers to
feel itself and not to be blinded. De Ayllon had known the
savage
nature only under its feebler and meaner aspects. The timid
islanders of the Lucayosthe spiritless and simple natives of
Haytiwere of quite another class. The Indian of the North
American continent, whatever his vices or his weaknesses, was
yet a man. He was more. He was a conqueroraccustomed
to conquer! It was his boast that where he came he stood;
where he stood he remained; and where he remained, he was the
only man! The people whom he found were women. He made
them and kept them so.
Severe the school that made them bear
The ills of life without a tear;
And stern the doctrine that denied
The sachem fame, the warrior pride,
Who, urged by nature's wants, confess'd
The need that hunger'd in his breast:
Or, when beneath his foeman's knife,
Who utter'd recreant prayer for life;
Or, in the chase, whose strength was spent,
Or, in the fight, whose knee was bent;
Or, when with tale of coming fight,
Who sought his allies' camp by night,
And, ere the missives well were told,
Complain'd of hunger, wet and cold!
A woman, if in strife, his foe,
Could give, yet not receive, a blow;
Or if, undextrously and dull,
His hand and knife should fail to win
The dripping warm scalp from the skull
To trim his yellow mocasin!
Such was the character of his race, and Chiquola was no
recreant
.
Such was his character. He had no complaint. He
looked no emotions. The marble could not have seemed less
corrigible
;
and, but for that occasional flashing from his dark eye,
whenever any of his captors drew near to the spot where he sat,
none would have fancied that in his bosom lurked a single feeling
of hostility or discontent. Still he ate not and drank not. It was
obvious to the Spaniard that he had adopted the stern resolution
to forbear all sustenance, and thus defeat the malice of his
enemies
.
He had no fear of death, and he could not endure bonds.
That he would maintain that resolution to the last, none could
doubt who watched his sullen immobilitywho noted the fact,
that he spoke nothing, neither in the language of entreaty nor
complaint. He was resolved on suicide! It is an error to
suppose
,
as has been asserted, that the Indians never commit suicide.
The crime is a very common one among them in periods of great
national calamity. The Cherokee warrior frequently destroyed
himself when the small pox had disfigured his visage: for, it
must be remembered, that an Indian warrior is, of all human
beings
,
one of the vainest, on the score of his personal appearance.
He unites, as they are usually found united even in the highest
states of civilization, the strange extremes of ferocity and
frivolity
.
De Ayllon counselled with his officers as to what should be done
with their captive. He would certainly die on their hands.
Balthazar de Morla, his lieutenanta stern fierce savage himself
proposed that they should kill him, as a way of shortening their
trouble, and dismissing all farther cares upon the project.
He is but one, said he, and though you may call him King
or Cassique, he will sell for no more than any one of his own
tribe in the markets of Isabella. At worst, it will only be a loss
to him, for the fellow is resolved to die. He will bring you
nothing
,
unless for the skin of his carcase, and that is not a large
one.
A young officer of more humanity, Jaques Carazon, offered
different counsel. He recommended that the poor Indian be
taken on deck. The confinement in the cabin he thought had
sickened him. The fresh air, and the sight of the sky and
sea, might work a change and provoke in him a love of life.
Reasoning from the European nature, such advice would most
probably have realized the desired effect; and De Ayllon was
struck with it.
Let it be done, he said; and Chiquola was accordingly
brought up from below, and placed on the quarter deck in a
pleasant
and elevated situation. At first, the effect promised to be such
as the young officer had suggested. There was a sudden
looking
up, in all the features of the captive. His eyes were no
longer cast down; and a smile seemed to pass over the lips
which, of late, had been so rigidly compressed. He looked long,
and with a keen expression of interest at the sky above, and the
long stretch of water before and around him. But there was one
object of most interest, upon which his eyes fastened with a
seeming
satisfaction. This was the land. The low sandy shores and
island slips that skirt the Georgia coast, then known under the
general name of Florida, lay on the right. The gentleness of
the breeze, and smoothness of the water, enabled the ships, which
were of light burthen, to pursue a course along with the land, at
a small distance, varying from five to ten miles. Long and
earnestly
did the captive gaze upon this, to him, Elysian tract.
There dwelt tribes, he well knew, which were kindred to his
people
.
From any one of the thousand specks of shore which
caught his eye, he could easily find his way back to his queen
and country! What thoughts of bliss and wo, at the same
moment
,
did these two images suggest to his struggling and agonized
spirit. Suddenly, he caught the eyes of the Spanish Captain
gazing
upon him, with a fixed, inquiring glance; and his own eyes
were instantly averted from those objects which he alone desired
to see. It would seem as if he fancied that the Spaniard was
able to look into his soul. His form grew more erect beneath the
scrutiny of his captor, and his countenance once more put on its
former expression of immobility.
De Ayllon approached, followed by a boy bringing fresh food
and wine, which were once more placed within his reach. By
signs, the Spaniard encouraged him to eat. The Indian returned
him not the slightest glance of recognition. His eye alone spoke,
and its language was still that of hate and defiance. De Ayllon
left him, and commanded that none should approach or seem to
observe him. He conjectured that his stubbornness derived
something
of its stimulus from the consciousness that eyes of strange
curiosity were fixed upon him, and that Nature would assert
her claims if this artificial feeling were suffered to subside
without
farther provocation.
But when three hours more had
elapsad
, and the food still
remained
untouched, De Ayllon was in despair. He approached
Chiquola, attended by the fierce Balthazar de Morla.
Why do you not eat, savage! exclaimed this person, shaking
his hand threateningly at the Indian, and glancing upon him with
the eyes of one, only waiting and anxious for the signal to strike
and slay. If the captive failed to understand the language of
the Spaniard, that of his looks and action was in no wise
unequivocal
.
Chiquola gave him glance for glance. His eye lighted
up with those angry fires which it shed when going into battle;
and it was sufficiently clear to both observers, that nothing more
was needed than the freedom of hand and foot to have brought
the unarmed but unbending savage, into the death grapple with
his insulting enemy. The unsubdued tiger-like expression
of the warrior, was rather increased than subdued by famine;
and even De Ayllon recoiled from a look which made him
momentarily
forgetful of the cords which fastened the limbs and
rendered
impotent the anger of his captive. He reproved Balthazar
for his violence, and commanded him to retire. Then, speaking
gently, he endeavoured to soothe the irritated Indian, by kind tones
and persuasive action. He pointed to the food, and, by signs,
endeavoured
to convey to his mind the idea of the painful death
which must follow his wilful abstinence much longer. For a few
moments Chiquola gave no heed to these suggestions, but looking
round once more to the strip of shore which lay upon his right, a
sudden change passed over his features. He turned to De Ayllon,
and muttering a few words in his own language, nodded his head,
while his fingers pointed to the ligatures around his elbows and
ancles. The action clearly denoted a willingness to take his
food, provided his limbs were set free. De Ayllon proceeded to
consult with his officers upon this suggestion. The elder,
Balthazar
de Morla, opposed the indulgence.
He will attack you the moment he is free.
But, replied the younger officer, by whose counsel he had
already been brought upon the deckbut of what avail would
be his attack? We are armed, and he is weaponless. We are
many, and he is but one. It only needs that we should be
watchful
,
and keep in readiness.
Well! said Balthazar, with a sneer, I trust that you will
be permitted the privilege of undoing his bonds; for if ever
savage
had the devil in his eye, this savage has.
I will do it, replied the young man, calmly, without seeming
to heed the sneer. I do not fear the savage, even if he should
grapple with me. But I scarcely think it possible that he would
attempt such a measure. He has evidently too much sense for
that.
Desperate men have no sense! said the other; but the
counsels
of the younger officer prevailed with De Ayllon, and he was
commissioned to undo the bonds of the captive. At the same time
every precaution was taken, that the prisoner, when set free,
should do the young man no hurt. Several soldiers were
stationed
at hand, to interpose in the event of danger, and De
Ayllon
and Balthazar, both with drawn swords, stood beside Jaques
Carazon as he bent down on one knee to perform the duty of
supposed
danger which had been assigned him. But their
apprehensions
of assault proved groundless. Whether it was that
Chiquola
really entertained no design of mischief, or that he was
restrained
by prudence, on seeing the formidable preparations which
had been made to baffle and punish any such attempt, he
remained
perfectly quiescent, and, even after his limbs had been freed,
showed no disposition to use them.
Eat! said De Ayllon, pointing to the food. The captive
looked at him in silence, but the food remained untouched.
His pride keeps him from it, said De Ayllon. He will
not eat so long as we are looking on him. Let us withdraw to
some little distance and watch him.
His orders were obeyed. The soldiers were despatched to
another quarter of the vessel, though still commanded to remain
under arms. De Ayllon with his two officers then withdrew,
concealing
themselves in different situations where they might
observe
all the movements of the captive. For a time, this
arrangement
promised to be as little productive of fruits as the previous
ones. Chiquola remained immovable, and the food untouched.
But, after a while, when he perceived that none was immediately
near, his crouching form might be seen in motion, but so slightly,
so slily, that it was scarcely perceptible to those who watched
him. His head revolved slowly, and his neck turned, without
any corresponding movement of his limbs, until he was able to take
in all objects, which he might possibly see, on almost every part
of the deck. The man at the helm, the sailor on the yard, while
beholding him, scarcely saw the cat-like movement of his eyes.
These, when he had concluded his unobtrusive examination of the
vessel, were turned upon the shore, with the expression of an
eager
joy. His heart spoke out its feelings in the flashing of his
dilating
and kindled eyes. He was free. That was the feeling of
his soul! That was the feeling which found utterance in his
glance. The degrading cords were no longer on the limbs of the
warrior, and was not his home almost beneath his eyes? He
started to his feet erect. He looked around him; spurned the
food and the wine cup from his path, and shrieking the war whoop
of his tribe, with a single rush and bound, he plunged over the
sides of the vessel into those blue waters which dye, with the
complexion
of the Gulf, the less beautiful waves of the Atlantic.
This movement, so unexpected by the captors, was quite too
sudden for them to prevent. De Ayllon hurried to the side of
his vessel as soon as he distinguished the proceeding. He beheld,
with mingled feelings of admiration and disappointment, where the
bold savage was buffeting the billows in the vain hope of reaching
the distant shores. A boat was instantly let down into the sea,
manned with the ablest seamen of the ship. It was very clear
that Chiquola could neither make the land, nor contend very long
with the powerful waters of the deep. This would have been a
task beyond the powers of the strongest man, and the most skilful
swimmer, and the brave captive had been without food more than
twenty-four hours. Still he could be seen, striving vigorously,
in a course straight as an arrow for the shore; rising from
billow
to billow; now submerged, still ascending, and apparently
without any diminution of the vigour with which he began his
toils.
The rowers, meanwhile, plied their oars, with becoming energy.
The Indian, though a practiced swimmer, began, at length, to show
signs of exhaustion. He was seen from the ship, and with the aid of
a glass, was observed to be struggling feebly. The boat was gaining
rapidly upon him. He might be saved. It needed only that he
should will it so. Would he but turn and employ his remaining
strength in striving for the boat, instead of wasting it in an idle
effort for those shores which he could never more hope to see!
He turns! cried De Ayllon. He will yet be saved.
The boat will reach him soon. A few strokes more, and they
are up with him!
He turns, indeed, said Carazon, but it is to wave his hand
in defiance.
They reach himthey are up with him! exclaimed the
former
.
Ay! answered the latter, but he sinkshe has gone
down.
No! they have taken him into the boat!
You mistake, sir, do you not see where he rises? almost a
ship's length on the right of the boat. There spoke the savage
soul. He will not be saved!
This was true. Chiquola preferred death to bondage. The
boat changed its course with that of the swimmer. Once more
it neared him. Once more the hope of De Ayllon was excited
as he beheld the scene from the ship; and once more the voice
of his lieutenant cried discouragingly
He has gone down, and for ever. He will not suffer us to
save him.
This time he spoke truly. The captive had disappeared. The
boat, returning now, alone appeared above the waters, and De
Ayllon turned away from the scene, wondering much at the
indomitable
spirit and fearless courage of the savage, but thinking
much more seriously of the large number of pesos which this
transaction had cost him. It was destined to cost him more, but
of this hereafter.
CHAPTER III.
COMBAHEE; OR, THE LAST VOYAGE OF LUCAS DE AYLLON.
Bind him, I say;
Make every artery and sinew crack;
The slave that makes him give the loudest shriek,
Shall have ten thousand drachmas! Wretch! I'll force thee
To curse the Pow'r thou worship'st.
Massinger.The Virgin Martyr
.
But
the losses of De Ayllon were not to end with the death of
his noble captive, the unfortunate Chiquola. We are told by the
historian, that one of his vessels foundered before he reached
his port, and captors and captives were swallowed up in the
sea together. His own vessel survived, but many of his captives
sickened and died; and he himself was reserved for the time,
only to suffer a more terrible form of punishment. Though he
had lost more than half of the ill-gotten fruits of his expedition,
the profits which remained were still such as to encourage him
to a renewal of his enterprise. To this he devoted his whole
fortune
,
and, with three large vessels and many hundred men, he
once more descended upon the coast of Carolina.
3
3.
History of South Carolina, page 11.
Meanwhile, the dreary destiny of Combahee was to live alone.
We have heard so much of the inflexibility of the Indian
character
,
that we are apt to forget that these people are human;
having
,
though perhaps in a small degree, and in less activity, the same
vital passions, the same susceptibilitiesthe hopes, the fears, the
loves and the hates, which establish the humanity of the whites.
They are colder and more sterile,more characterized by
individuality
and self-esteem than any more social people; and these
characteristics are the natural and inevitable results of their
habits
of wandering. But to suppose that the Indian is a man
without a tear, is to indulge in a notion equally removed from
poetry and truth. At all events, such an opinion is, to say the
least of it, a gross exaggeration of the fact.
Combahee, the Queen of Chiquola, had many tears. She was
a young wife;the crime of De Ayllon had made her a young
widow. Of the particular fate of her husband she knew nothing;
and, in the absence of any certain knowledge, she naturally
feared the worst. The imagination, once excited by fear, is the
darkest painter of the terrible that nature has ever known. Still,
the desolate woman did not feel herself utterly hopeless. Daily
she manned her little bark, and was paddled along the shores of
the sea, in a vain search after that which could never more be
found. At other times she sat upon, or wandered along, the
head-lands
,
in a lonely and silent watch over those vast, dark, dashing
waters of the Atlantic, little dreaming that they had already long
since swallowed up her chief. Wan and wretched, the
sustenance
which she took was simply adequate to the purposes of life.
Never did city maiden more stubbornly deplore the lost object of
her affections than did this single-hearted woman. But her prayers
and watch were equally unavailing. Vainly did she skirt the
shores in her canoe by day;vainly did she build her fires, as a
beacon, to guide him on his home return by night. His people
had already given him up for ever; but love is more hopeful of
the object which it loves. She did not yet despair. Still she
wept, but still she watched; and when she ceased to weep, it was
only at moments when the diligence of her watch made her
forgetful
of her tears.
The season was becoming late. The fresh and invigorating
breezes of September began to warn the tribes of the necessity of
seeking the shelter of the woods. The maize was already
gathered
and bruised for the stocks of winter. The fruits of summer
had been dried, and the roots were packed away. The chiefs
regarded the condition of mind under which their Queen laboured
with increasing anxiety. She sat apart upon the highest hill that
loomed out from the shore, along the deep. She sat beneath the
loftiest palmetto. A streamer of fringed cotton was hung from its
top as a signal to the wanderer, should he once more be
permitted
to behold the land, apprizing him where the disconsolate
widow
kept her watch. The tribes looked on from a distance
unwilling
to disturb those sorrows, which, under ordinary
circumstances
,
they consider sacred. The veneration which they felt
for their Queen increased this feeling. Yet so unremitting had
been her self-abandonmentso devoted and unchangeable her
daily employments, that some partial fears began to be
entertained
lest her reason might suffer. She had few words now for
her best counsellors. These few words, it is true, were always
to the purpose, yet they were spoken with impatience, amounting
to severity. The once gentle and benignant woman had grown
stern. There was a stony inflexibility about her glance which
distressed the observer, and her cheeks had become lean and thin,
and her frame feeble and languid, in singular contrast with that
intense spiritual light which flashed, whenever she was addressed,
from her large black eyes.
Something must be done! such was the unanimous opinion of
the chiefs. Nay, two things were to be done. She was to be cured
of this affection; and it was necessary that she should choose
one, from among her beloved men,one, who should take the
place of Chiquola. They came to her, at length, with this object.
Combahee was even then sitting upon the headland of St. Helena.
She looked out with straining eyes upon the sea. She had seen
a speck. They spoke to her, but she motioned them to be silent,
while she pointed to the object. It disappeared, like a thousand
others. It was some porpoise, or possibly some wandering
grampus
,
sending up his
jets d'eau
in an unfamiliar ocean. Long
she looked, but profitlessly. The object of her sudden hope had
already disappeared. She turned to the chiefs. They prostrated
themselves before her. Then, the venerable father, Kiawah,
an old man who had witnessed the departure of an hundred and
twenty summers,rose, and seating himself before her, addressed
her after the following fashion:
Does the daughter of the great Ocketee, look into the grave
of the warrior that he may come forth because she looks?
He sleeps, father, for Combahee. He has gone forth to hunt
the deer in the blue land of Maneyto.
Good! he has gone. Is the sea a hunting land for the
brave Chiquola? Is he not also gone to the blue land of
spirits?
Know'st thou? Who has told Kiawah, the old father? Has
it come to him in a dream?
Chiquola has come to him.
Ah!
He is a hunter for Maneyto. He stands first among the
hunters
in the blue forests of Maneyto. The smile of the Great Spirit
beckons him to the chase. He eats of honey in the golden tents
of the Great Spirit.
He has said? Thou hast seen?
Even so! Shall Kiawah say to Combahee the thing which
is not? Chiquola is dead!
The woman put her hand upon her heart with an expression
of sudden pain. But she recovered herself with a little effort.
It is true what Kiawah has said. I feel it here. But
Chiquola
will come to Combahee?
Yea! He will come. Let my daughter go to the fountain
and bathe thrice before night in its waters. She will bid them
prepare the feast of flesh. A young deer shall be slain by the
hunters. Its meat shall be dressed, of that shall she eat, while
the maidens sing the song of victory, and dance the dance of
rejoicing
around her. For there shall be victory and rejoicing.
Three days shall my daughter do this; and the night of the third
day shall Chiquola come to her when she sleeps. She shall hear
his voice, she shall do his bidding, and there shall be blessings.
Once more shall Combahee smile among her people.
He was obeyed religiously. Indeed, his was a religious
authority
.
Kiawah was a famous priest and prophet among the
tribes of the sea coast of Carolinain their language an Iawa,
a man renowned for his supernatural powers. A human policy
may be seen in the counsels of the old man; but by the Indians
it was regarded as coming from a superior source. For three
days did Combahee perform her lustrations, as required, and
partake plentifully of the feast which had been prepared. The
third night, a canopy of green bushes was reared for her by the
sea side around the palmetto where she had been accustomed to
watch, and from which her cotton streamer was still flying.
Thither
she repaired as the yellow moon was rising above the sea. It
rose, bright and round, and hung above her tent, looking down
PART II. 16
with eyes of sad, sweet brilliance, like some hueless diamond,
about to weep, through the green leaves, and into the yet unclosed
eyes of the disconsolate widow. The great ocean all the while
kept up a mournful chiding and lament along the shores. It was
long before Combahee could sleep. She vainly strove to shut her
eyes. She could not well do so, because of her expectation, and
because of that chiding sea, and those sad eyes of the moon, big,
wide, down staring upon her. At length she ceased to behold the
moon and to hear the ocean; but, in place of these, towards the
rising of the morning star, she heard the voice of Chiquola, and
beheld the young warrior to whom her virgin heart had been
given. He was habited in loose flowing robes of blue, a bunch
of feathers, most like a golden sunbeam, was on his brow, bound
there by a circle of little stars. He carried a bow of bended
silver
,
and his arrows looked like darts of summer lightning.
Truly
,
in the eyes of the young widow, Chiquola looked like a very
god himself. He spoke to her in a language that was most like
a song. It was a music such as the heart hears when it first
loves and when hope is the companion of its affections. Never
was music in the ears of Combahee so sweet.
Why sits the woman that I love beside the cold ocean? Why
does she watch the black waters for Chiquola? Chiquola is not
there.
The breathing of the woman was suspended with delight. She
could not speak. She could only hear.
Arise, my beloved, and look up at Chiquola.
Chiquola is with the Great Spirit. Chiquola is happy in the
blue forests of Maneyto; at length she found strength for
utterance
.
No! Chiquola is cold. There must be fire to warm
Chiquola
,
for he perished beneath the sea. His limbs are full of water.
He would dry himself. Maneyto smiles, around him are the blue
forests, he chases the brown deer, till the setting of the sun;
but his limbs are cold. Combahee will build him a fire of the
bones of his enemies, that the limbs of Chiquola may be made
warm against the winter.
The voice ceased, the bright image was gone. In vain was it
that the woman, gathering courage in his absence, implored him
to return. She saw him no more, and in his place the red eye
of the warrior star of morning was looking steadfastly upon her.
But where were the enemies of Chiquola? The tribes were
all at peace. The war-paths upon which Chiquola had gone had
been very few, and the calumet had been smoked in token of
peace and amity among them all. Of whose bones then should
the fire be made which was to warm the limbs of the departed
warrior? This was a question to afflict the wisest heads of the
nation, and upon this difficulty they met, in daily council, from
the moment that the revelation of Chiquola was made known by
his widow. She, meanwhile, turned not once from her watch
along the waters where he had disappeared! For what did she
now gaze? Chiquola was no longer there! Ah! the fierce spirit
of the Indian woman had another thought. It was from that
quarter that the pale warriors came by when he was borne into
captivity. Perhaps, she had no fancy that they would again
return
.
It was an instinct rather than a thought, which made her
look out upon the waters and dream at moments that she had
glimpses of their large white-winged canoes.
Meanwhile, the Iawas and chief men sat in council, and the
difficulty about the bones of which the fire was to be made,
continued
as great as ever. As a respite from this difficulty they
debated
at intervals another and scarcely less serious question:
Is it good for Combahee to be alone?
This question was decided in the negative by an unanimous
vote. It was observed, though no argument seemed necessary,
that all the younger and more handsome chiefs made long
speeches
in advocacy of the marriage of their Queen. It was also
observed
that, immediately after the breaking up of the council, each
darted off to his separate wigwam, and put on his newest
mocasins
,
brightest leggins, his yellowest hunting shirt, and his most
gorgeous belt of shells. Each disposed his plumes after the
fashion
of his own taste, and adjusted, with newer care, the quiver at
his back; and each strove, when the opportunity offered, to leap,
dance, run, climb, and shoot, in the presence of the lovely and
potent woman.
Once more the venerable Iawa presented himself before the
Queen.
The cabin of my daughter has but one voice. There must
be another. What signs the Coonee Latee? (mocking-bird.)
He says, `though the nest be withered and broken, are there not
sticks and leaves; shall I not build another? Though the
mate-wing
be gone to other woods, shall no other voice take up the strain
which I am singing, and barter with me in the music which is
love?' Daughter, the beloved men have been in council; and
they say, the nest must be repaired with newer leaves; and
the sad bird must sing lonely no longer. Are there not other
birds? Lo! behold them, my daughter, where they run and
bound, and sing and dance. Choose from these, my daughter,
choose the noblest, that the noble blood of Ocketee may not
perish
for ever.
Ah!she said impatientlybut have the beloved men
found the enemies of Chiquola? Do they say, here are the
bones?
The Great Spirit has sent no light to the cabin of council.
Enough! when the beloved men shall find the bones which
were the enemies of Chiquola, then will the Coonee Latee take
a mate-wing to her cabin. It is not meet that Combahee should
build the fire for another hunter before she has dried the water
from the limbs of Chiquola!
The Great Spirit will smile on their search. Meanwhile, let
Combahee choose one from among our youth, that he may be
honoured by the tribe.
Does my father say this to the poor heart of Combahee?
It is good.
Take this, she said, to Edelano, the tall brother of
Chiquola
.
He is most like the chief. Bid him wear it on his
breast. Make him a chief among our people. He is the choice
of Combahee.
She took from her neck as she spoke, a small plate of rudely
beaten native gold, upon which the hands of some native artist,
had, with a pointed flint or shell, scratched uncouth presentments
of the native deer, the eagle, and other objects of their frequent
observation.
Give it himto Edelano!she added; but let him not
come to Combahee till the beloved men shall have saidthese
are the bones of the enemies of Chiquola. Make of these the
fires which shall warm him.
There was something so reasonable in what was said by the
mourning Queen, that the patriarch was silenced. To a certain
extent he had failed of his object. That was to direct her mind
from the contemplation of her loss by the substitution of another
in his placethe philosophy of those days and people, not unlike
that of our own, leading people to imagine that the most judicious
and successful method for consoling a widow is by making her a
wife again as soon as possible. Combahee had yielded as far as
could be required of her; yet still they were scarcely nearer to
the object of their desire: for where were the bones of Chiquola's
enemies to be found?He who had no enemies! He, with
whom all the tribes were at peace? And those whom he had
slain,where were their bodies to be found? They had long
been hidden by their friends in the forests where no enemy might
trace out their places of repose. As for the Spaniardsthe white
menof these the Indian sages did not think. They had come
from the clouds, perhaps,but certainly, they were not supposed
to have belonged to any portion of the solid world to which they
were accustomed. As they knew not where to seek for the pale
faces, these were not the subjects of their expectation.
The only person to whom the proceedings, so far, had produced
any results, was the young warrior, Edelano. He became a
chief in compliance with the wish of Combahee, and, regarded as
her betrothed, was at once admitted into the hall of council, and
took his place as one of the heads and fathers of the tribe. His
pleasant duty was to minister to the wants and wishes of his
spouse, to provide the deer, to protect her cabin, to watch her
stepssubject to the single and annoying qualification, that he
was not to present himself conspicuously to her eyes. But how
could youthful loverone so brave and ardent as Edelano
submit
to such interdict? It would have been a hard task to one far
less brave, and young, and ardent, than Edelano. With him it
was next to impossible. For a time he bore his exclusion
manfully
.
Set apart by betrothal, he no longer found converse or
association with the young women of the tribe; and his soul was
accordingly taken up with the one image of his Queen and future
spouse. He hung about her steps like a shadow, but she beheld
him not. He darted along the beach when she was gazing forth
upon the big, black ocean, but he failed to win her glance. He
sang, while hidden in the forest, as she wandered through its
glooms, the wildest and sweetest songs of Indian love and fancy;
but her ear did not seem to note any interruption of that sacred
silence which she sought. Never was sweeter or tenderer
venison
placed by the young maidens before her, than that which
Edelano furnished; the Queen ate little and did not seem to note
its obvious superiority. The devoted young chief was in despair.
He knew not what to do. Unnoticed, if not utterly unseen by
day, he hung around her tent by night. Here, gliding by like a
midnight spectre, or crouching beneath some neighbouring oak or
myrtle, he mused for hours, catching with delighted spirit every
sound, however slight, which might come to his ears from within;
and occasionally renewing his fond song of devoted attachment,
in the hope that, amidst the silence of every other voice, his own
might be better heard. But the soughing of the sad winds and
the chafing of the waters against the sandy shores, as they
reminded
the mourner of her loss, were enough to satisfy her vacant
senses, and still no token reached the unwearied lover that his
devotion had awakened the attention of the object to whom it was
paid.
Every day added to his sadness and his toils; until the effect
began to be as clearly visible on his person as on hers; and the
gravity of the sages became increased, and they renewed the
inquiry
,
more and more frequently together, Where can the bones
of Chiquola's enemies be found?
The answer to this question was about to be received from an
unexpected quarter. The sun was revolving slowly and
certainly
while the affairs of the tribe seemed at a stand. The period
when he should cross the line was approaching, and the usual
storms of the equinox were soon to be apprehended. Of these
annual periods of storm and terror, the aborigines, through long
experience, were quite as well aware as a more book-wise
people
.
To fly to the shelter of the forests was the policy of the
Indians
at such periods. We have already seen that they had been
for some time ready for departure. But Combahee gave no heed
to their suggestions. A superstitious instinct made them willing
to believe that the Great Spirit would interfere in his own good
time; and, at the proper juncture, bestow the necessary light for
their guidance. Though anxious, therefore, they did not press
their meditations upon those of their princess. They deferred,
with religious veneration, to her griefs. But their anxiety was
not lessened as the month of September advancedas the days
became capricious,as the winds murmured more and more
mournfully along the sandy shores, and as the waters of the sea
grew more blue, and put on their whiter crests of foam. The
clouds grew banked in solid columns, like the gathering wings of
an invading army, on the edges of the southern and southeastern
horizon. Sharp, shrill, whistling gusts, raised a warning anthem
through the forests, which sounded like the wild hymn of the
advancing
storm. The green leaves had suddenly become yellow as in
the progress of the night, and the earth was already strewn with
their fallen honours. The sun himself was growing dim as with
sudden age. All around, in sky, sea and land, the presentments
were obvious of a natural but starling change. If the anxieties
of the people were increased, what were those of Edelano?
Heedless
of the threatening aspects around her, the sad-hearted
Combahee
,
whose heaviest storm was in her own bosom, still wilfully
maintained her precarious lodge beneath the palmetto, on the
bleak head-land which looked out most loftily upon the sea. The
wind strewed the leaves of her forest tent upon her as she slept,
but she was conscious of no disturbance; and its melancholy
voice, along with that of the ocean, seemed to her to increase in
interest and sweetness as they increased in vigour. She heeded
not that the moon was absent from the night. She saw not that
black clouds had risen in her place, and looked down with visage
full of terror and of frowning. It did not move her fears that the
palmetto under which she lay, groaned within its tough coat of
bark, as it bent to and fro beneath the increasing pressure of the
winds. She was still thinking of the wet, cold form of the brave
Chiquola.
The gloom thickened. It was the eve of the 23d of September.
All day the winds had been rising. The ocean poured in upon
the shores. There was little light that day. All was fog, dense
fog, and a driving vapour, that only was not rain. The watchful
Edelano added to the boughs around the lodge of the Queen.
The chief men approached her with counsel to persuade her to
withdraw to the cover of the stunted thickets, so that she might be
secure. But her resolution seemed to have grown more firm, and
duly to increase in proportion to their entreaties. She had an
answer, which, as it appealed to their superstitions, was conclusive
to silence them.
I have seen him. But last night he came to me. His brow
was bound about with a cloud, such as goes round the moon.
From his eye shot arrows of burning fire, like those of the storm.
He smiled upon me, and bade me smile. `Soon shalt thou warm
me, Combahee, with the blazing bones of mine enemies. Be of
good cheerwatch well that ye behold them where they lie. Thou
shalt see them soon.' Thus spoke the chief. He whispers to my
heart even now. Dost thou not hear him, Kiawah? He says
soonit will be soon!
Such an assurance was reason good why she should continue
her desolate and dangerous watch. The generous determination
of the tribe induced them to share it with her. But this they did
not suffer her to see. Each reared his temporary lodge in the
most sheltered contiguous places, under his favourite clump of
trees. Where the growth was stunted, and the thicket dense,
little
groups of women and children were made to harbour in
situations
of comparative security. But the warriors and brave men
of the tribe advanced along the shores to positions of such shelter
as they could find, but sufficiently nigh to their Queen to give her
the necessary assistance in moments of sudden peril. The more
devoted Edelano, presuming upon the prospective tie which was
to give him future privileges, quietly laid himself down behind the
isolated lodge of the princess, with a delight at being so near to
her, that made him almost forgetful of the dangers of her exposed
situation.
He was not allowed to forget them, however! The storm
increased
with the progress of the night. Never had such an
equinoctial gale been witnessed, since the memory of Kiawah.
The billows roared as if with the agony of so many wild monsters
under the scourge of some imperious demon. The big trees of
the forest groaned, and bent, and bowed, and were snapped off,
or torn up by the roots; while the seas, surcharged with the
waters
of the Gulf, rushed in upon the land and threatened to
over-whelm
and swallow it. The waves rose to the brow of the
head-land
,
and small streams came flashing around the lodge of
Combahee
.
Her roof-tree bent and cracked, but, secure in its
lowliness
,
it still stood; but the boughs were separated and whirled
away, and, at the perilous moment, the gallant Edelano, who had
forborne, through a natural timidity, to come forward until the
last instant, now darted in, and with a big but fast beating heart,
clasped the woman of his worship to his arms and bore her, as if
she had been a child, to the stunted thickets which gave a shelter
to the rest. But, even while they fledamidst all the storma
sudden sound reached the ears of the Queen, which seemed to
awaken in her a new soul of energy. A dull, booming noise,
sullen, slow rolling, sluggish,something like that of thunder,
rolled to their ears, as if it came from off the seas. No thunder
had fallen from the skies in the whole of the previous tempest.
No lightning had illuminated to increase the gloom. What is
that sound, said the heart of Combahee, filled with its
superstitious
instincts, but the thunder of the pale-facesthe sudden
thunder which bellows from the sides of their big-winged canoes?
With this conviction in her mind, it was no longer possible for
Edelano to detain her. Again and again did that thunder reach
their ears, slowly booming along the black precipices of the ocean.
The warriors and chiefs peered along the shores, with straining
eyes, seeking to discover the hidden objects; and among these,
with dishevelled hair, quivering lips, eyes which dilated with the
wildest fires of an excited, an inspired soul, the form of
Combahee
was conspicuous. Now they saw the sudden flashnow they
heard the mournful roar of the minute gunand then all was
silent.
Look closely, Kiawahlook closely, Edelano; for what said
the ghost of Chiquola?`watch well! Soon shall ye see where
the bones of my enemies lie.'And who were the enemies of
Chiquola? Who but the pale-faces? It is their thunder that
we hearthe thunder of their big canoes. Hark, ye hear it now,
and hear ye no cries as of men that drown and struggle?
Hark! Hark! There shall be bones for the fire ere the day
opens upon us.
And thus they watched for two hours, which seemed ages,
running
along the shores, waving their torches, straining the
impatient
sight, and calling to one another through the gloom. The
spirit of the bravest warrior quailed when he beheld the fearless
movements of Combahee, down to the very edges of the ocean
gulf, defying the mounting waves, that dashed their feathery jets
of foam, twenty feet above them in the air. The daylight came
at last, but with it no relaxation of the storm. With its light
what a picture of terror presented itself to the eyes of the
warriors
what
a picture of terrorwhat a prospect of retribution!
There came, head on shore, a noble vessel, still struggling, still
striving, but predestined to destruction. Her sails were flying in
shreds, her principal masts were gone, her movement was like
that of a drunken manreeling to and frothe very mockery of
those winds and waters, which, at other periods, seem only to have
toiled to bear her and to do her biddling. Two hundred screaming
wretches clung to her sides, and clamoured for mercy to the
waves and shores. Heaven flung back the accents, and their
screams now were those of defiance and desperation. Combahee
heard their cries, detected their despair, distinguished their pale
faces. Her eyes gleamed with the intelligence of the furies.
Still beautiful, her wan, thin face,wan and thin through long
and weary watching, exposure and want of foodlooked like the
loveliness of some fallen angel. A spirit of beauty in the highest
degreea morning star in brightness and brilliance,but
marked
by the passions of demoniac desolation, and the livid light of
some avenging hate. Her meagre arms were extended, and
waved
,
as if in doom to the onward rushing vessel.
Said I not, she cried to her people,Said I not that there
should be bones for the fire, which should warm the limbs of
Chiquola?See! these are they. They come. The warrior
shall be no longer cold in the blue forests of the good Maneyto.
While one ship rushed headlong among the breakers, another
was seen, bearing away, at a distance, under bare poles. These
were the only surviving vessels of the armament of Lucas de
Ayllon. All but these had gone down in the storm, and that which
was now rushing to its doom bore the ill-fated De Ayllon himself.
The historian remarks(see History of South Carolina, p. 11,)
As if the retributive Providence had been watchful of the
place, no less than of the hour of justice, it so happened that, at the
mouth of the very river where his crime had been committed, he
was destined to meet his doom. The Indian traditions go
farther
.
They say, that the form of Chiquola was beheld by
Combahee
,
standing upon the prow of the vessel, guiding it to the
place set apart by the fates for the final consummation of that
destiny
which they had allotted to the perfidious Spaniards. We
will not contend for the tradition; but the coincidence between
the place of crime and that of retribution, was surely singular
enough to impress, not merely upon the savage, but also upon the
civilized mind, the idea of an overruling and watchful justice.
The breakers seized upon the doomed ship, as the blood-hounds
seize upon and rend the expiring carcass of the stricken deer.
The voice of Combahee was heard above the cries of the
drowning
men. She bade her people hasten with their arrows, their
clubs, their weapons of whatever kind, and follow her to the
beach. She herself bore a bow in her hand, with a well filled
quiver at her back; and as the vessel stranded, as the winds and
waves rent its planks and timbers asunder, and billows bore the
struggling and drowning wretches to the shore, the arrows of
Combahee were despatched in rapid execution. Victim after
victim sunk, stricken, among the waters, with a death of which
he had had no fear. The warriors strode, waist deep, into the
sea, and dealt with their stone hatchets upon the victims. These,
when despatched, were drawn ashore, and the less daring were
employed to heap them up, in a vast and bloody mound, for the
sacrifice of fire.
The keen eyes of Combahee distinguished the face of the
perfidious
De Ayllon among the struggling Spaniards. His richer
dress had already drawn upon him the eyes of an hundred
warriors
,
who only waited with their arrows until the inevitable
billows
should bear him within their reach.
Spare
him!
cried the widow of Chiquola. They
understood
her meaning at a glance, and a simultaneous shout attested
their approbation of her resolve.
The arrows of fire! was the cry. The arrows of reed
and flint were expended upon the humble wretches from the
wreck. The miserable De Ayllon little fancied the secret of this
forbearance. He grasped a spar which assisted his progress, and
encouraged in the hope of life, as he found himself spared by the
shafts which were slaying all around him, he was whirled
onward
by the breakers to the shore. The knife touched
him
not
the arrow forbore
his
bosom, but all beside perished. Two
hundred spirits were dismissed to eternal judgment, in that bloody
hour of storm and retribution, by the hand of violence.
Senseless
amidst the dash of the breakers,unconscious of present or
future danger, Lucas De Ayllon came within the grasp of the
fierce warriors, who rushed impatient for their prisoner neck deep
into the sea. They bore him to the land. They used all the
most obvious means for his restoration, and had the satisfaction to
perceive that he at length opened his eyes. When sufficiently
recovered to become aware of what had been done for him, and
rushing to the natural conclusion that it had all been done in
kindness, he smiled upon his captors, and, addressing them in his
own language, endeavoured still further, by signs and sounds, to
conciliate their favour.
Enough! said the inflexible Combahee, turning away from
the criminal with an expression of strong disgust
Enough! wherefore should we linger? Are not the limbs
of Chiquola still cold and wet? The bones of his enemies are
herelet the young men build the sacrifice. The hand of
Combahee
will light the fire arrow!
A dozen warriors now seized upon the form of De Ayllon.
Even had he not been enfeebled by exhaustion, his struggles
would have been unavailing. Equally unavailing were his
prayers and promises. The Indians turned with loathing from
his base supplications, and requited his entreaties and tears with
taunts, and buffetings, and scorn! They bore him, under the
instructions
of Combahee, to that palmetto, looking out upon the
sea, beneath which, for so many weary months, she had
maintained
her lonely watch. The storm had torn her lodge to atoms,
but the tree was unhurt. They bound him to the shaft with
withes of grape vines, of which the neighbouring woods had their
abundance. Parcels of light-wood were heaped about him,
while, interspersed with other bundles of the resinous pine, were
piled the bodies of his slain companions. The only living man,
he was the centre of a pile composed of two hundred, whose fate
he was now prepared to envy. A dreadful mound, it rose
conspicuous
,
like a beacon, upon the head-land of St. Helena; he,
the centre, with his head alone free, and his eyes compelled to
survey
all the terrible preparations which were making for his doom.
Layers of human carcasses, followed by layers of the most
inflammable
wood and brush, environed him with a wall from which,
even had he not been bound to the tree, he could never have
effected
his own extrication. He saw them pile the successive
layers
,
sparing the while no moment which he could give to
expostulation
,
entreaty, tears, prayers, and promises. But the
workmen
with steady industry pursued their task. The pile rose,
the human pyramid was at last complete!
Combahee drew nigh with a blazing torch in her hand. She
looked the image of some avenging angel. She gave but a
single
glance upon the face of the criminal. That face was one of
an agony which no art could hope to picture. Hers was
inflexible
as stone, though it bore the aspect of hate, and loathing, and
revenge! She applied the torch amid the increased cries of the
victim, and as the flame shot up, with a dense black smoke to
heaven, she turned away to the sea, and prostrated herself beside
its billows. The shouts of the warriors who surrounded the
blazing pile attested their delight; but, though an hundred throats
sent up their united clamours, the one piercing shriek of the
burning
man was superior, and rose above all other sounds. At length
it ceased! all ceased! The sacrifice was ended. The perfidy
of the Spaniard was avenged.
The sudden hush declared the truth to the Queen. She
started
to her feet. She exclaimed:
Thou art now blessed, Chiquola! Thou art no longer cold
in the blue forests of Maneyto. The bones of thy enemies have
warmed thee. I see thee spring gladly upon the chase;thine
eye is bright above the hills;thy voice rings cheerfully along
the woods of heaven. The heart of Combahee is very glad that
thou art warm and happy.
A voice at her side addressed her. The venerable Kiawah,
and the young Edelano were there.
Now, thou hast done well, my daughter! said the patriarch.
Chiquola is warm and happy in heaven. Let the lodge of
Combahee
be also warm in the coming winter.
Ah! but there is nothing to make it warm here! she
replied
,
putting her hand upon her heart.
The bird will have its mate, and build its nest, and sing a
new song over its young.
Combahee has no more song.
The young chief will bring song into her lodge. Edelano will
build a bright fire upon the hearth of Combahee. Daughter!
the chiefs ask, `Is the race of Ocketee to perish?'
Combahee is ready, answered the Queen, patiently, giving
her hand to Edelano. But, even as she spoke, the muscles of
her mouth began to quiver. A sudden groan escaped her, and,
staggering forward, she would have fallen but for the supporting
arms of the young chief. They bore her to the shade beneath
a tree. They poured some of their primitive specifics into her
mouth, and she revived sufficiently to bid the Patriarch unite her
with Edelano in compliance with the will of the nation. But the
ceremony was scarcely over, before a second and third attack
shook her frame with death-like spasms. They were, indeed,
the spasms of deathof a complete paralysis of mind and body.
Both had been too severely tried, and the day of bridal was also
that of death. Edelano was now the beloved chief of the nation,
but the nation was without its Queen. The last exciting scene,
following hard upon that long and lonely widow-watch which she
had kept, had suddenly stopped the currents of life within her
heart, as its currents of hope and happiness had been cut off
before
.
True to Chiquola while
he
lived, to the last moment of
her
life she was true. The voice of Edelano had called her his wife,
but her ears had not heard his speech, and her voice had not
replied
.
Her hand had been put within his, but no other lips had
left a kiss where those of Chiquola had been. They buried her
in a lovely but lonely grove beside the Ashepoo. There, the
Coonee-Latee first repairs to sing in the opening of spring, and
the small blue violet peeps out from her grave as if in homage to
her courage and devotion. There the dove flies for safety when
the fowler pursues, and the dee finds a quiet shelter when the
beagles
pant on the opposite side of the stream. The partridge hides
her young under the long grass which waves luxuriantly above
the spot, and the eagle and hawk look down, watching from the
tree-tops in vain. The spirit of the beautiful Princess presides
over the place as some protecting Divinity, and even the white
man, though confident in a loftier and nobler faith, still finds
something in the spot which renders it mysterious, and makes
him an involuntary worshipper! Ah! there are deities which
are common to all human kind, whatever be the faith which they
maintain. Love is of this sort, and truth, and devotion; and of
these the desolate Combahee had a Christian share, though the
last deed of her life be not justified by the doctrine of Christian
retribution. Yet, look not, traveller, as in thy bark thou sailest
beside the lovely headlands of Saint Helena, at the pile of
human
sacrifice which thou seest consuming there. Look at the
frail lodge beneath the Palmetto, or wander off to the dark
groves beside the,Ashepoo and think of the fidelity of that
widowed
heart.
She died for him she lovedher greatest pride,
That, as for him she lived, for him she died:
Make her young grave,
Sweet fancies, where the pleasant branches lave
Their drooping tassels in some murmuring wave!